The Project Gutenberg EBook of The 1995 CIA World Factbook, by 
United States Central Intelligence Agency

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net


Title: The 1995 CIA World Factbook

Author: United States Central Intelligence Agency

Posting Date: August 3, 2008 [EBook #571]
Release Date: June 1996

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE 1995 CIA WORLD FACTBOOK ***




Produced by Dr. Gregory B. Newby









To search for information on a specific country from the list below,
search for @country:  @Afganistan, for example.  You can also search
directly for one of the categories of that country as follows:

@Afganistan:Geography
@Afganistan:People
@Afganistan:Government
@Afganistan:Economy
@Afganistan:Transportation
@Afganistan:Communications
@Afganistan:Defense Forces




TABLE OF CONTENTS

Publication Information
Notes, Definitions, and Abbreviations

Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Arctic Ocean
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Ashmore and Cartier Islands
Atlantic Ocean
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan

The Bahamas
Bahrain
Baker Island
Bangladesh
Barbados
Bassas da India
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian OceanTerritory
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina
Burma
Burundi

Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Clipperton Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Coral Sea Islands
Costa Rica
Cote d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic

Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic

Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Europa Island

Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern and Antarctic Lands

Gabon
The Gambia
Gaza Strip
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Glorioso Islands
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana

Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Holy See (Vatican City)
Honduras
Hong Kong
Howland Island
Hungary

Iceland
India
Indian Ocean
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel (also see separate Gaza Strip and West Bank entries)
Italy

Jamaica
Jan Mayen
Japan
Jarvis Island
Jersey
Johnston Atoll
Jordan (also see separate West Bank entry)
Juan de Nova Island

Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kingman Reef
Kiribati
Korea, North
Korea, South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan

Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg

Macau
Macedonia, The Former Yugoslav Republic of
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Man, Isle of
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique

Namibia
Nauru
Navassa Island
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway

Oman

Pacific Ocean
Pakistan
Palau
Palmyra Atoll
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paracel Islands
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico

Qatar

Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda

Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia and Montenegro
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands
Spain
Spratly Islands
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria

Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tromelin Island
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu

Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan

Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands

Wake Island
Wallis and Futuna
West Bank
Western Sahara
Western Samoa
World

Yemen

Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe

Appendices

A. The United Nations System (a graphical file not available in the
	Project Gutenberg edition)
B. Abbreviations for International Organizations and Groups
C. International Organizations and Groups
D. Abbreviations for Selected International Environmental Agreements
E. Selected International Environmental Agreements
F. Weights and Measures
G. Estimates of Gross Domestic Product on an Exchange Rate Basis
H. Cross-Reference List of Geographic Items


________________________________________________________________________

Publication Information for The World Factbook 1995

 The printed version of the Factbook is published annually in July by
 the Central Intelligence Agency for the use of US Government
 officials, and the style, format, coverage, and content are designed
 to meet their specific requirements. Information was provided by the
 American Geophysical Union, Bureau of the Census, Central Intelligence
 Agency, Defense Intelligence Agency, Defense Mapping Agency, Defense
 Nuclear Agency, Department of State, Foreign Broadcast Information
 Service, Maritime Administration, National Science Foundation (Polar
 Information Program), Naval Maritime Intelligence Center, Office of
 Territorial and International Affairs, US Board on Geographic Names,
 US Coast Guard, and others.

 Comments and queries are welcome and may be addressed to:

 Central Intelligence Agency
 Attn.: Office of Public and Agency Information
 Washington, DC 20505
 Telephone: [1] (703) 351-2053

 US Government officials should obtain copies of The World Factbook
 directly from their own organization or through liaison channels from
 the Central Intelligence Agency. This publication is also available in
 microfiche, magnetic tape, or computer diskettes.

 This publication may be purchased by telephone (VISA or MasterCard) or
        mail from:

 Superintendent of Documents
 P.O. Box 371954
 Pittsburgh, PA 15250-7954
 Telephone: [1] (202) 512-1800

 A subscription to this publication may be purchased from:

 Document Expediting (DOCEX) Project
 Exchange and Gift Division
 Library of Congress
 Washington, DC 20540
 Telephone: [1] (202) 707-9527


 This publication may be purchased in printed form, photocopy,
        microfiche, magnetic tape, or computer diskettes from:

 National Technical Information Service
 5285 Port Royal Road
 Springfield, VA 22161
 Telephone: [1] (703) 487-4650

 This publication may be purchased in photocopy or microform from:

 Photoduplication Service Library of Congress
 Washington, DC 20540-5234
 Telephone: [1] (202) 707-5640


________________________________________________________________________

                 NOTES, DEFINITIONS, AND ABBREVIATIONS

There have been some significant changes in this edition. The Trust
Territory of the Pacific Islands became the independent nation of
Palau. The gross domestic product (GDP) of all countries is now
presented on a purchasing power parity (PPP) basis rather than on the
old exchange rate basis. There is a new entry on Age structure and the
Airports entry now includes unpaved runways. The Communications
category has been restructured and now includes the entries of
Telephone system, Radio, and Television. The remainder of the entries
in the former Communications category-Railroads, Highways, Inland
waterways, Pipelines, Ports, Merchant marine, and Airports-can now be
found under a new category called Transportation. There is a new
appendix listing estimates of gross domestic product on an exchange
rate basis for all nations. A reference map of the Republic of South
Africa is included. The electronic files used to produce the Factbook
have been restructured into a database. As a result, the formats of
some entries in this edition have been changed. Additional changes
will occur in the 1996 Factbook.

Abbreviations: (see Appendix B for abbreviations for international
organizations and groups and Appendix D for abbreviations for selected
international environmental agreements)
avdp. -- avoirdupois
    c.i.f. -- cost, insurance, and freight
    CY -- calendar year
    DWT -- deadweight ton
    est. -- estimate
    Ex-Im -- Export-Import Bank of the United States
    f.o.b. -- free on board
    FRG -- Federal Republic of Germany (West Germany); used for
    information dated before 3 October 1990 or CY91
    FSU -- former Soviet Union
    FY -- fiscal year
    FYROM -- The Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia
    GDP -- gross domestic product
    GDR -- German Democratic Republic (East Germany); used for
    information dated before 3 October 1990 or CY91
    GNP -- gross national product
    GRT -- gross register ton
    GWP -- gross world product
    km -- kilometer
    kW -- kilowatt
    kWh -- kilowatt hour
    m -- meter
    NA -- not available
    NEGL -- negligible
    nm -- nautical mile
    NZ -- New Zealand
    ODA -- official development assistance
    OOF -- other official flows
    PDRY -- People's Democratic Republic of Yemen [Yemen (Aden) or
    South Yemen]; used for information dated before 22 May 1990 or
    CY91
    sq km -- square kilometer
    sq mi -- square mile
    UAE -- United Arab Emirates
    UK -- United Kingdom
    US -- United States
    USSR -- Union of Soviet Socialist Republics (Soviet Union); used
    for information dated before 25 December 1991
    YAR -- Yemen Arab Republic [Yemen (Sanaa) or North Yemen]; used
    for information dated before 22 May 1990 or CY91

Administrative divisions: The numbers, designatory terms, and
first-order administrative divisions are generally those approved by
the US Board on Geographic Names (BGN). Changes that have been
reported but not yet acted on by BGN are noted.

Airports: Only airports with usable runways are included in this
listing. For airports with more than one runway, only the longest
runway is included. Not all airports have facilities for refueling,
maintenance, or air traffic control. Paved runways have concrete or
asphalt surfaces; unpaved runways have grass, dirt, sand, or gravel
surfaces.

Area: Total area is the sum of all land and water areas delimited by
international boundaries and/or coastlines. Land area is the aggregate
of all surfaces delimited by international boundaries and/or
coastlines, excluding inland water bodies (lakes, reservoirs, rivers).
Comparative areas are based on total area equivalents. Most entities
are compared with the entire US or one of the 50 states. The smaller
entities are compared with Washington, DC (178 sq km, 69 sq mi) or The
Mall in Washington, DC (0.59 sq km, 0.23 sq mi, 146 acres).

Birth rate: The average annual number of births during a year per
1,000 population at midyear; also known as crude birth rate. Dates of
information: In general, information available as of 1 January 1995 is
used in the preparation of this edition. Population figures are
estimates for 1 July 1995, with population growth rates estimated for
calendar year 1995. Major political events have been updated through
April 1995.

Death rate: The average annual number of deaths during a year per
l,000 population at midyear; also known as crude death rate.

Digraphs: The digraph is a two-letter "country code" that precisely
identifies every entity without overlap, duplication, or omission. AF,
for example, is the digraph for Afghanistan. It is a standardized
geopolitical data element promulgated in the Federal Information
Processing Standards Publication (FIPS) 10-3 by the National Bureau of
Standards (now called National Institute of Standards and Technology)
at the US Department of Commerce and maintained by the Office of the
Geographer at the US Department of State. The digraph is used to
eliminate confusion and incompatibility in the collection, processing,
and dissemination of area-specific data and is particularly useful for
interchanging data between databases.

Diplomatic representation: The US Government has diplomatic relations
with 184 nations, including 178 of the 185 UN members (excluded UN
members are Bhutan, Cuba, Iran, Iraq, North Korea, former Yugoslavia,
and the US itself). In addition, the US has diplomatic relations with
6 nations that are not in the UN - Holy See, Kiribati, Nauru,
Switzerland, Tonga, and Tuvalu.

Economic aid: This entry refers to bilateral commitments of official
development assistance (ODA) and other official flows (OOF). ODA is
defined as financial assistance which is concessional in character,
has the main objective to promote economic development and welfare of
LDCs, and contains a grant element of at least 25%. OOF transactions
are also official government assistance, but with a main objective
other than development and with a grant element less than 25%. OOF
transactions include official export credits (such as Ex-Im Bank
credits), official equity and portfolio investment, and debt
reorganization by the official sector that does not meet concessional
terms. Aid is considered to have been committed when agreements are
initialed by the parties involved and constitute a formal declaration
of intent.

Entities: Some of the nations, dependent areas, areas of special
sovereignty, and governments included in this publication are not
independent, and others are not officially recognized by the US
Government. "Nation" refers to a people politically organized into a
sovereign state with a definite territory. "Dependent area" refers to
a broad category of political entities that are associated in some way
with a nation. Names used for page headings are usually the short-form
names as approved by the US Board on Geographic Names. There are 266
entities in The World Factbook that may be categorized as follows:

NATIONS
184 -- UN members (excluding the former Yugoslavia, which is still
    counted by the UN)
    7 -- nations that are not members of the UN--Holy See, Kiribati,
    Nauru, Serbia and Montenegro, Switzerland, Tonga, Tuvalu

OTHER
1 -- Taiwan

DEPENDENT AREAS
6 -- Australia--Ashmore and Cartier Islands, Christmas Island, Cocos
    (Keeling) Islands, Coral Sea Islands, Heard Island and McDonald
    Islands, Norfolk Island
    2 -- Denmark--Faroe Islands, Greenland
    16 -- France--Bassas da India, Clipperton Island, Europa Island,
    French Guiana, French Polynesia, French Southern and Antarctic
    Lands, Glorioso Islands, Guadeloupe, Juan de Nova Island,
    Martinique, Mayotte, New Caledonia, Reunion, Saint Pierre and
    Miquelon, Tromelin Island, Wallis and Futuna
    2 -- Netherlands--Aruba, Netherlands Antilles
    3 -- New Zealand--Cook Islands, Niue, Tokelau
    3 -- Norway--Bouvet Island, Jan Mayen, Svalbard
    1 -- Portugal--Macau
    16 -- United Kingdom--Anguilla, Bermuda, British Indian Ocean
    Territory, British Virgin Islands, Cayman Islands, Falkland
    Islands, Gibraltar, Guernsey, Hong Kong, Jersey, Isle of Man,
    Montserrat, Pitcairn Islands, Saint Helena, South Georgia and the
    South Sandwich Islands, Turks and Caicos Islands
    14 -- United States--American Samoa, Baker Island, Guam, Howland
    Island, Jarvis Island, Johnston Atoll, Kingman Reef, Midway
    Islands, Navassa Island, Northern Mariana Islands, Palmyra Atoll,
    Puerto Rico, Virgin Islands, Wake Island

MISCELLANEOUS
6 -- Antarctica, Gaza Strip, Paracel Islands, Spratly Islands, West
    Bank, Western Sahara

OTHER ENTITIES
4 -- oceans--Arctic Ocean, Atlantic Ocean, Indian Ocean, Pacific Ocean

    1 -- World
    266 -- total

Exchange rate:
The official value of a nation's monetary unit at a given date or over
a given period of time, as expressed in units of local currency per US
dollar and as determined by international market forces or official
fiat.

GDP methodology: In the "Economy" section, GDP dollar estimates for
all countries are derived from purchasing power parity (PPP)
calculations rather than from conversions at official currency
exchange rates. The PPP method normally involves the use of
international dollar price weights, which are applied to the
quantities of goods and services produced in a given economy. In
addition to the lack of reliable data from the majority of countries,
the statistician faces a major difficulty in specifying, identifying,
and allowing for the quality of goods and services. The division of a
GDP estimate in local currency by the corresponding PPP estimate in
dollars gives the PPP conversion rate. On average, one thousand
dollars will buy the same market basket of goods in the US as one
thousand dollars - converted to the local currency at the PPP
conversion rate - will buy in the other country. Whereas PPP estimates
for OECD countries are quite reliable, PPP estimates for developing
countries are often rough approximations. Most of the GDP estimates
are based on extrapolation of numbers published by the UN
International Comparison Program and by Professors Robert Summers and
Alan Heston of the University of Pennsylvania and their colleagues.
Currency exchange rates depend on a variety of international and
domestic financial forces that often have little relation to domestic
output. In developing countries with weak currencies the exchange rate
estimate of GDP in dollars is typically one-fourth to one-half the PPP
estimate. Furthermore, exchange rates may suddenly go up or down by
10% or more because of market forces or official fiat whereas real
output has remained unchanged. On 12 January 1994, for example, the 14
countries of the African Financial Community (whose currencies are
tied to the French franc) devalued their currencies by 50%. This move,
of course, did not cut the real output of these countries by half. One
important caution: the proportion of, say, defense expenditures as a
percentage of GDP in local currency accounts may differ substantially
from the proportion when GDP accounts are expressed in PPP terms, as,
for example, when an observer tries to estimate the dollar level of
Russian or Japanese military expenditures. Note: The numbers for GDP
and other economic data can not be chained together from successive
volumes of the Factbook because of changes in the US dollar measuring
rod, revisions of data by statistical agencies, use of new or
different sources of information, and changes in national statistical
methods and practices.

Gross domestic product (GDP): The value of all final goods and
services produced within a nation in a given year.

Gross national product (GNP): The value of all final goods and
services produced within a nation in a given year, plus income earned
abroad, minus income earned by foreigners from domestic production.

Gross world product (GWP): The aggregate value of all goods and
services produced worldwide in a given year.

Growth rate (population): The annual percent change in the population,
resulting from a surplus (or deficit) of births over deaths and the
balance of migrants entering and leaving a country. The rate may be
positive or negative.

Illicit drugs: There are five categories of illicit drugs - narcotics,
stimulants, depressants (sedatives), hallucinogens, and cannabis.
These categories include many drugs legally produced and prescribed by
doctors as well as those illegally produced and sold outside medical
channels.
Cannabis (Cannabis sativa) is the common hemp plant, which provides
hallucinogens with some sedative properties, and includes marijuana
(pot, Acapulco gold, grass, reefer), tetrahydrocannabinol (THC,
Marinol), hashish (hash), and hashish oil (hash oil).
Coca (Erythroxylum coca) is a bush, and the leaves contain the
stimulant used to make cocaine. Coca is not to be confused with cocoa,
which comes from cacao seeds and is used in making chocolate, cocoa,
and cocoa butter.
Cocaine is a stimulant derived from the leaves of the coca bush.
Depressants (sedatives) are drugs that reduce tension and anxiety and
include chloral hydrate, barbiturates (Amytal, Nembutal, Seconal,
phenobarbital), benzodiazepines (Librium, Valium), methaqualone
(Quaalude), glutethimide (Doriden), and others (Equanil, Placidyl,
Valmid). Drugs are any chemical substances that effect a physical,
mental, emotional, or behavioral change in an individual. Drug abuse
is the use of any licit or illicit chemical substance that results in
physical, mental, emotional, or behavioral impairment in an
individual. Hallucinogens are drugs that affect sensation, thinking,
self-awareness, and emotion. Hallucinogens include LSD (acid,
microdot), mescaline and peyote (mexc, buttons, cactus), amphetamine
variants (PMA, STP, DOB), phencyclidine (PCP, angel dust, hog),
phencyclidine analogues (PCE, PCPy, TCP), and others (psilocybin,
psilocyn).
Hashish is the resinous exudate of the cannabis or hemp plant
(Cannabis sativa).
Heroin is a semisynthetic derivative of morphine.
Mandrax is the Southwest Asian slang term for methaqualone, a
pharmaceutical depressant.
Marijuana is the dried leaves of the cannabis or hemp plant (Cannabis
sativa).
Methaqualone is a pharmaceutical depressant, in slang referred to as
Quaaludes in North America or Mandrax in Southwest Asia Narcotics are
drugs that relieve pain, often induce sleep, and refer to opium, opium
derivatives, and synthetic substitutes. Natural narcotics include
opium (paregoric, parepectolin), morphine (MS-Contin, Roxanol),
codeine (Tylenol with codeine, Empirin with codeine, Robitussan AC),
and thebaine. Semisynthetic narcotics include heroin (horse, smack),
and hydromorphone (Dilaudid). Synthetic narcotics include meperidine
or Pethidine (Demerol, Mepergan), methadone (Dolophine, Methadose),
and others (Darvon, Lomotil).
Opium is the milky exudate of the incised, unripe seedpod of the opium
poppy. Opium poppy (Papaver somniferum) is the source for many natural
and semisynthetic narcotics. Poppy straw concentrate is the alkaloid
derived from the mature dried opium poppy.
Qat (kat, khat) is a stimulant from the buds or leaves of catha edulis
that is chewed or drunk as tea.
Quaaludes is the North American slang term for methaqualone, a
pharmaceutical depressant.
Stimulants are drugs that relieve mild depression, increase energy and
activity, and include cocaine (coke, snow, crack), amphetamines
(Desoxyn, Dexedrine), phenmetrazine (Preludin), methylphenidate
(Ritalin), and others (Cylert, Sanorex, Tenuate).

Infant mortality rate: The number of deaths to infants under one year
old in a given year per l,000 live births occurring in the same year.

International disputes: This category includes a wide variety of
situations that range from traditional bilateral boundary disputes to
unilateral claims of one sort or another. Information regarding
disputes over international boundaries and maritime boundaries has
been reviewed by the Department of State. References to other
situations involving borders or frontiers may also be included, such
as resource disputes, geopolitical questions, or irredentist issues.
However, inclusion does not necessarily constitute official acceptance
or recognition by the US Government.

Irrigated land: The figure refers to the land area that is
artificially supplied with water.

Land use: The land surface is categorized as arable land - land
cultivated for crops that are replanted after each harvest (wheat,
maize, rice); permanent crops - land cultivated for crops that are not
replanted after each harvest (citrus, coffee, rubber); meadows and
pastures - land permanently used for herbaceous forage crops; forest
and woodland - under dense or open stands of trees; and other - any
land type not specifically mentioned above (urban areas, roads,
desert).

Leaders: The chief of state is the titular leader of the country who
represents the state at official and ceremonial functions but is not
involved with the day- to-day activities of the government. The head
of government is the administrative leader who manages the day-to-day
activities of the government. In the UK, the monarch is the chief of
state, and the Prime Minister is the head of government. In the US,
the President is both the chief of state and the head of government.

Life expectancy at birth: The average number of years to be lived by a
group of people all born in the same year, if mortality at each age
remains constant in the future.

Literacy: There are no universal definitions and standards of
literacy. Unless otherwise noted, all rates are based on the most
common definition - the ability to read and write at a specified age.
Detailing the standards that individual countries use to assess the
ability to read and write is beyond the scope of this publication.

Maritime claims: The proximity of neighboring states may prevent some
national claims from being extended the full distance.

Merchant marine: All ships engaged in the carriage of goods. All
commercial vessels (as opposed to all nonmilitary ships), which
excludes tugs, fishing vessels, offshore oil rigs, etc. Also, a
grouping of merchant ships by nationality or register.
Captive register - A register of ships maintained by a territory,
possession, or colony primarily or exclusively for the use of ships
owned in the parent country; also referred to as an offshore register,
the offshore equivalent of an internal register. Ships on a captive
register will fly the same flag as the parent country, or a local
variant of it, but will be subject to the maritime laws and taxation
rules of the offshore territory. Although the nature of a captive
register makes it especially desirable for ships owned in the parent
country, just as in the internal register, the ships may also be owned
abroad. The captive register then acts as a flag of convenience
register, except that it is not the register of an independent state.
Flag of convenience register - A national register offering
registration to a merchant ship not owned in the flag state. The major
flags of convenience (FOC) attract ships to their registers by virtue
of low fees, low or nonexistent taxation of profits, and liberal
manning requirements. True FOC registers are characterized by having
relatively few of the ships registered actually owned in the flag
state. Thus, while virtually any flag can be used for ships under a
given set of circumstances, an FOC register is one where the majority
of the merchant fleet is owned abroad. It is also referred to as an
open register.
Flag state - The nation in which a ship is registered and which holds
legal jurisdiction over operation of the ship, whether at home or
abroad. Flag state maritime legislation determines how a ship is
manned and taxed and whether a foreign-owned ship may be placed on the
register.
Internal register - A register of ships maintained as a subset of a
national register. Ships on the internal register fly the national
flag and have that nationality but are subject to a separate set of
maritime rules from those on the main national register. These
differences usually include lower taxation of profits, manning by
foreign nationals, and, usually, ownership outside the flag state
(when it functions as an FOC register). The Norwegian International
Ship Register and Danish International Ship Register are the most
notable examples of an internal register. Both have been instrumental
in stemming flight from the national flag to flags of convenience and
in attracting foreign owned ships to the Norwegian and Danish flags.
Merchant ship - A vessel that carries goods against payment of
freight; commonly used to denote any nonmilitary ship but accurately
restricted to commercial vessels only.
Register - The record of a ship's ownership and nationality as listed
with the maritime authorities of a country; also, the compendium of
such individual ships' registrations. Registration of a ship provides
it with a nationality and makes it subject to the laws of the country
in which registered (the flag state) regardless of the nationality of
the ship's ultimate owner.

Money figures: All money figures are expressed in contemporaneous US
dollars unless otherwise indicated.

National product: The total output of goods and services in a country
in a given year. See GDP methodology, Gross domestic product (GDP),
and Gross national product (GNP).

Net migration rate: The balance between the number of persons entering
and leaving a country during the year per 1,000 persons (based on
midyear population). An excess of persons entering the country is
referred to as net immigration (3.56 migrants/1,000 population); an
excess of persons leaving the country as net emigration (-9.26
migrants/1,000 population).

Population: Figures are estimates from the Bureau of the Census based
on statistics from population censuses, vital statistics registration
systems, or sample surveys pertaining to the recent past, and on
assumptions about future trends. Starting with the 1993 Factbook,
demographic estimates for some countries (mostly African) have taken
into account the effects of the growing incidence of AIDS infections;
in 1993 these countries were Burkina, Burundi, Central African
Republic, Congo, Cote d'Ivoire, Kenya, Malawi, Rwanda, Tanzania,
Uganda, Zaire, Zambia, Zimbabwe, Thailand, Brazil, and Haiti.

Telephone numbers: All telephone numbers presented in the Factbook
consist of the country code in brackets, the city or area code (where
required) in parentheses, and the local number. The one component that
is not presented is the international access code which varies from
country to country. For example, an international direct dial phone
call placed from the United States to Madrid, Spain, would be as
follows:

    011 [34] (1) 577-xxxx where
    011 is the international access code for station-to-station calls
    (01 is for calls other than station-to-station calls),
    [34] is the country code for Spain,
    (1) is the city code for Madrid,
    577 is the local exchange,
    and xxxx is the local telephone number.

An international direct dial phone call placed from another country to
the United States would be as follows:

international access code + [1] (202) 939-xxxx where
    [1] is the country code for the United States,
    (202) is the area code for Washington, DC,
    939 is the local exchange,
    and xxxx is the local telephone number.

Total fertility rate: The average number of children that would be
born per woman if all women lived to the end of their childbearing
years and bore children according to a given fertility rate at each
age. Years: All year references are for the calendar year (CY) unless
indicated as fiscal year (FY). FY93/94 refers to the fiscal year that
began in calendar year 1993 and ended in calendar year 1994 as defined
in the Fiscal Year entry of the Economy section for each nation.
FY90-94 refers to the four fiscal years that began in calendar year
1990 and ended in calendar year 1994.

Note: Information for the US and US dependencies was compiled from
material in the public domain and does not represent Intelligence
Community estimates. The Handbook of International Economic
Statistics, published annually in September by the Central
Intelligence Agency, contains detailed economic information for the
Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD)
countries, Eastern Europe, the newly independent republics of the
former nations of Yugoslavia and the Soviet Union, and selected other
countries. The Handbook can be obtained wherever The World Factbook is
available.


________________________________________________________________________

AFGHANISTAN

@Afghanistan:Geography

 Location: Southern Asia, north of Pakistan

 Map references: Asia

 Area:
 total area: 647,500 sq km
 land area: 647,500 sq km
 comparative area: slightly smaller than Texas

 Land boundaries: total 5,529 km, China 76 km, Iran 936 km,
 Pakistan 2,430 km, Tajikistan 1,206 km, Turkmenistan 744 km,
 Uzbekistan 137 km

 Coastline: 0 km (landlocked)

 Maritime claims: none; landlocked

 International disputes: periodic disputes with Iran over Helmand water
 rights; Iran supports clientsin country, private Pakistani and Saudi
 sources also are active; power struggles among various groups for
 control of Kabul, regional rivalries among emerging warlords,
 traditional tribal disputes continue; support to Islamic fighters in
 Tajikistan's civil war; border dispute with Pakistan (Durand Line);
 support to Islamic militants worldwide by some factions

 Climate: arid to semiarid; cold winters and hot summers

 Terrain: mostly rugged mountains; plains in north and southwest

 Natural resources: natural gas, petroleum, coal, copper, talc,
 barites, sulphur, lead, zinc, iron ore, salt, precious and
 semiprecious stones

 Land use:
 arable land: 12%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 15%
 forest and woodland: 3%
 other: 39%

 Irrigated land: 26,600 sq km (1989 est.)

 Environment:
 current issues: soil degradation; overgrazing; deforestation (much of
 the remaining forests are being cut down for fuel and building
 materials); desertification
 natural hazards: damaging earthquakes occur in Hindu Kush mountains;
 flooding
 international agreements: party to - Endangered Species, Environmental
 Modification, Marine Dumping, Nuclear Test Ban; signed, but not
 ratified - Biodiversity, Climate Change, Hazardous Wastes, Law of the
 Sea, Marine Life Conservation
 Note: landlocked

@Afghanistan:People

 Population: 21,251,821 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 42% (female 4,342,218; male 4,507,141)
 15-64 years: 56% (female 5,406,675; male 6,443,734)
 65 years and over: 2% (female 256,443; male 295,610) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 14.47% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 42.69 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 18.53 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: 120.5 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 152.8 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 45.37 years
 male: 45.98 years
 female: 44.72 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 6.21 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Afghan(s)
 adjective: Afghan

 Ethnic divisions: Pashtun 38%, Tajik 25%, Uzbek 6%, Hazara 19%,
 minor ethnic groups (Chahar Aimaks, Turkmen, Baloch, and others)

 Religions: Sunni Muslim 84%, Shi'a Muslim 15%, other 1%

 Languages: Pashtu 35%, Afghan Persian (Dari) 50%, Turkic languages
 (primarily Uzbek and Turkmen) 11%, 30 minor languages (primarily Balochi
 and Pashai) 4%, much bilingualism

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1990 est.)
 total population: 29%
 male: 44%
 female: 14%

 Labor force: 4.98 million
 by occupation: agriculture and animal husbandry 67.8%, industry 10.2%,
 construction 6.3%, commerce 5.0%, services and other 10.7% (1980 est.)

@Afghanistan:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Islamic State of Afghanistan
 conventional short form: Afghanistan
 local long form: Dowlat-e Eslami-ye Afghanestan
 local short form: Afghanestan
 former: Republic of Afghanistan

 Digraph: AF

 Type: transitional government

 Capital: Kabul

 Administrative divisions: 30 provinces (velayat, singular - velayat);
 Badakhshan, Badghis, Baghlan, Balkh, Bamian, Farah, Faryab, Ghazni,
 Ghowr, Helmand, Herat, Jowzjan, Kabol, Kandahar, Kapisa, Konar,
 Kondoz, Laghman, Lowgar, Nangarhar, Nimruz, Oruzgan, Paktia, Paktika,
 Parvan, Samangan, Sar-e Pol, Takhar, Vardak, Zabol

 Note: there may be two new provinces of Nurestan (Nuristan) and Khowst

 Independence: 19 August 1919 (from UK)

 National holiday: Victory of the Muslim Nation, 28 April; Remembrance
 Day for Martyrs and Disabled, 4 May; Independence Day, 19 August

 Constitution: none

 Legal system: a new legal system has not been adopted but the
 transitional government has declared it will follow Islamic law
 (Shari'a)

 Suffrage: undetermined; previously males 15-50 years of age, universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: President Burhanuddin RABBANI (Interim President July-
 December 1992; President since 2 January 1993); Vice President
 Mohammad NABI MOHAMMADI (since NA); election last held 31 December
 1992 (next to be held NA); results - Burhanuddin RABBANI was elected
 to a two-year term by a national shura, later amended by multi-party
 agreement to 18 months; note - in June 1994 failure to agree on a
 transfer mechanism resulted in RABBANI's extending the term to
 28 December 1994; following the expiration of the term and while
 negotiations on the formation of a new government go on, RABBANI
 continues in office head of government: Prime Minister of the Council
 of Ministers Aleksander Gabriel MEKSI (since 10 April 1992)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers

 Note: term of present government expired 28 December 1994; factional
 fighting since 1 January 1994 has kept government officers from
 actually occupying ministries and discharging government
 responsibilities; the government's authority to remove cabinet
 members, including the Prime Minister, following the expiration of
 their term is questionable

 Legislative branch: a unicameral parliament consisting of 205 members
 was chosen by the shura in January 1993; non-functioning as of June
 1993

 Judicial branch: an interim Chief Justice of the Supreme Court has
 been appointed, but a new court system has not yet been organized

 Political parties and leaders: current political organizations include
 Jamiat-i-Islami (Islamic Society), Burhanuddin RABBANI, Ahmad Shah
 MASOOD; Hizbi Islami-Gulbuddin (Islamic Party), Gulbuddin HIKMATYAR
 faction; Hizbi Islami-Khalis (Islamic Party), Yunis KHALIS faction;
 Ittihad-i-Islami Barai Azadi Afghanistan (Islamic Union for the
 Liberation of Afghanistan), Abdul Rasul SAYYAF;
 Harakat-Inqilab-i-Islami (Islamic Revolutionary Movement), Mohammad
 Nabi MOHAMMADI; Jabha-i-Najat-i-Milli Afghanistan (Afghanistan
 National Liberation Front), Sibghatullah MOJADDEDI;
 Mahaz-i-Milli-Islami (National Islamic Front), Sayed Ahamad GAILANI;
 Hizbi Wahdat-Khalili faction (Islamic Unity Party), Abdul Karim
 KHALILI; Hizbi Wahdat-Akbari faction (Islamic Unity Party), Mohammad
 Akbar AKBARI; Harakat-i-Islami (Islamic Movement), Mohammed Asif
 MOHSENI; Jumbesh-i-Milli Islami (National Islamic Movement), Abdul
 Rashid DOSTAM; Taliban (Religious Students Movement), Mohammad OMAR

 Note: the former ruling Watan Party has been disbanded

 Other political or pressure groups: the former resistance commanders
 are the major power brokers in the countryside and their shuras
 (councils) are now administering most cities  outside Kabul; tribal
 elders and religious students are trying to wrest control from them;
 ulema (religious scholars); tribal elders; religious students (talib)

 Member of: AsDB, CP, ECO, ESCAP, FAO, G-77, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO, ICRM,
 IDA, IDB, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, INTELSAT, IOC, ITU, NAM, OIC,
 UN, NCTAD, UNESCO, UNIDO, UPU, WFTU, WHO, WMO, WTO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: (vacant); Charge d'Affaires Abdul RAHIM
 chancery: 2341 Wyoming Avenue NW, Washington, DC 20008
 telephone: [1] (202) 234-3770, 3771
 FAX: [1] (202) 328-3516
 consulate(s) general: New York
 consulate(s): Washington, DC

 US diplomatic representation:
 none; embassy was closed in January 1989

 Flag: NA; note - the flag has changed at least twice since 1992

@Afghanistan:Economy

 Overview: Afghanistan is an extremely poor, landlocked country, highly
 dependent on farming (wheat especially) and livestock raising (sheep
 and goats). Economic considerations have played second fiddle to
 political and military upheavals during more than 15 years of war,
 including the nearly 10-year Soviet military occupation (which ended
 15 February 1989). Over the past decade, one-third of the population
 fled the country, with Pakistan sheltering more than 3 million
 refugees and Iran about 3 million. About 1.4 million Afghan refugees
 remain in Pakistan and about 2 million in Iran. Another 1 million
 probably moved into and around urban areas within Afghanistan.
 Although reliable data are unavailable, gross domestic product is
 lower than 13 years ago because of the loss of labor and capital and
 the disruption of trade and transport.

National product: GDP $NA

 National product real growth rate: NA%

 National product per capita: $NA

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 56.7% (1991)

 Unemployment rate: NA%

 Budget:
 revenues: $NA
 expenditures: $NA, including capital expenditures of $NA million (1991
 est.)

 Exports: $188.2 million (f.o.b., 1991)
 commodities: fruits and nuts, handwoven carpets, wool, cotton, hides
 and pelts, precious and semi-precious gems
 partners: FSU countries, Pakistan, Iran, Germany, India, UK, Belgium,
 Luxembourg, Czechoslovakia

 Imports: $616.4 million (c.i.f., 1991)
 commodities: food and petroleum products; most consumer goods
 partners: FSU countries, Pakistan, Iran, Japan, Singapore, India,
 South Korea, Germany

 External debt: $2.3 billion (March 1991 est.)

 Industrial production: growth rate 2.3% (FY90/91 est.); accounts for
 about 25% of GDP

 Electricity:
 capacity: 480,000 kW
 production: 550 million kWh
 consumption per capita: 39 kWh (1993)

 Industries: small-scale production of textiles, soap, furniture,
 shoes, fertilizer, and  cement; handwoven carpets; natural gas, oil,
 coal, copper

 Agriculture: largely subsistence farming and nomadic animal husbandry;
 cash products - wheat, fruits, nuts, karakul pelts, wool, mutton

 Illicit drugs: an illicit cultivator of opium poppy and cannabis for
 the international drug trade; world's second-largest opium producer
 after Burma (950 metric tons in 1994) and a major source of hashish

 Economic aid:
 recipient: $450 million US assistance provided 1985-1993; the UN
 provides assistance in the form of food aid, immunization, land mine
 removal, and a wide range of aid to refugees and displaced persons

 Currency: 1 afghani (AF) = 100 puls

 Exchange rates: afghanis (Af) per US$1 - 1,900 (January 1994), 1,019
 (March 1993), 850 (1991), 700 (1989-90), 220 (1988-89); note - these
 rates reflect the free market exchange rates rather than the official
 exchange rates

 Fiscal year: 21 March - 20 March

@Afghanistan:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 24.6 km
 broad gauge: 9.6 km 1.524-m gauge from Gushgy (Turkmenistan) to
 Towraghondi; 15 km 1,524-m gauge from Termiz (Uzbekistan) to Kheyrabad
 transshipment point on south bank of Amu Darya

 Highways:
 total: 21,000 km
 paved: 2,800 km
 unpaved: gravel 1,650 km; earth 16,550 km (1984)

 Inland waterways: total navigability 1,200 km; chiefly Amu Darya,
 which handles vessels up to about 500 metric tons

 Pipelines: petroleum products - Uzbekistan to Bagram and Turkmenistan
 to Shindand; natural gas 180 km

 Ports: Keleft, Kheyrabad, Shir Khan

 Airports:
 total: 48
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 3
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 5
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 2
 with paved runways under 914 m: 15
 with unpaved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 3
 with unpaved runways 1,524 to 2,438 m: 14
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 6

@Afghanistan:Communications

 Telephone system: 31,200 telephones; limited telephone, telegraph, and
 radiobroadcast services; 1 public telephone in Kabul
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: one link between western Afghanistan and Iran (via
 satellite)

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 5, FM 0, shortwave 2
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: several television stations run by factions and
 local councils which provide intermittent service
 televisions: NA

@Afghanistan:Defense Forces

 Branches: the military still does not exist on a national scale; some
 elements of the former Army, Air and Air Defense Forces, National
 Guard, Border Guard  Forces, National Police Force (Sarandoi), and
 tribal militias still exist but are factionalized among the various
 mujahedin and former regime leaders

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 5,646,789; males fit for
 military service 3,011,777; males reach military age (22) annually
 200,264 (1995 est.)

 Defense expenditures: exchange rate conversion - $450 million, 15% of
 GDP (1990 est.); the new government has not yet adopted a defense
 budget



________________________________________________________________________

ALBANIA

@Albania:Geography

 Location: Southeastern Europe, bordering the Adriatic Sea and Ionian
 Sea, between Greece and Serbia and Montenegro

 Map references: Ethnic Groups in Eastern Europe, Europe

 Area:
 total area: 28,750 sq km
 land area: 27,400 sq km
 comparative area: slightly larger than Maryland

 Land boundaries: total 720 km, Greece 282 km, The Former Yugoslav
 Republic of Macedonia 151 km, Serbia and Montenegro 287 km (114 km
 with Serbia, 173 km with Montenegro)

 Coastline: 362 km

 Maritime claims:
 continental shelf: 200-m depth or to the depth of exploitation
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: the Albanian Government supports protection of
 the rights of ethnic Albanians outside of its borders; Albanian
 majority in Kosovo seeks independence from Serbian Republic; Albanians
 in Macedonia claim discrimination in education, access to public
 sector jobs and representation in government; Albania is involved in a
 bilaterlal dispute with Greece over border demarcation, the treatment
 of Albania's ethnic Greek minority, and migrant Albanian workers in
 Greece

 Climate: mild temperate; cool, cloudy, wet winters; hot, clear, dry
 summers; interior is cooler and wetter

 Terrain: mostly mountains and hills; small plains along coast

 Natural resources: petroleum, natural gas, coal, chromium, copper,
 timber, nickel

 Land use:
 arable land: 21%
 permanent crops: 4%
 meadows and pastures: 15%
 forest and woodland: 38%
 other: 22%

 Irrigated land: 4,230 sq km (1989)

 Environment:
 current issues: deforestation; soil erosion; water pollution from
 industrial and domestic effluents
 natural hazards: destructive earthquakes; tsunami occur along
 southwestern coast
 international agreements: party to - Biodiversity, Climate Change

 Note: strategic location along Strait of Otranto (links Adriatic Sea
 to Ionian Sea and Mediterranean Sea)

@Albania:People

 Population: 3,413,904 (July 1995 est.)
 note: IMF, working with Albanian government figures, estimates the
 population at 3,120,000 in 1993 and that the population has fallen
 since 1990

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 32% (female 520,186; male 563,953)
 15-64 years: 62% (female 1,026,321; male 1,104,371)
 65 years and over: 6% (female 112,252; male 86,821) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 1.16% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 21.7 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 5.22 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: -4.88 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 28.1 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 73.81 years
 male: 70.83 years
 female: 77.02 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 2.71 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Albanian(s)
 adjective: Albanian

 Ethnic divisions: Albanian 95%, Greeks 3%, other 2% (Vlachs, Gypsies,
 Serbs, and Bulgarians) (1989 est.)

 Religions: Muslim 70%, Albanian Orthodox 20%, Roman Catholic 10%
 note: all mosques and churches were closed in 1967 and religious
 observances prohibited; in November 1990, Albania began allowing
 private religious practice

 Languages: Albanian (Tosk is the official dialect), Greek

 Literacy: age 9 and over can read and write (1955)
 total population: 72%
 male: 80%
 female: 63%

 Labor force: 1.5 million (1987)
 by occupation: agriculture 60%, industry and commerce 40% (1986)

@Albania:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Republic of Albania
 conventional short form: Albania
 local long form: Republika e Shqiperise
 local short form: Shqiperia
 former: People's Socialist Republic of Albania

 Digraph: AL

 Type: emerging democracy

 Capital: Tirane

 Administrative divisions: 26 districts (rrethe, singular - rreth);
 Berat, Dibre, Durres, Elbasan, Fier, Gjirokaster, Gramsh, Kolonje,
 Korce, Kruje, Kukes, Lezhe, Librazhd, Lushnje, Mat, Mirdite, Permet,
 Pogradec, Puke, Sarande, Shkoder, Skrapar, Tepelene, Tirane, Tropoje,
 Vlore

 Independence: 28 November 1912 (from Ottoman Empire)

 National holiday: Independence Day, 28 November (1912)

 Constitution: an interim basic law was approved by the People's
 Assembly on 29 April 1991; a draft constitution was rejected by
 popular referendum in the fall of 1994 and a new draft is pending

 Legal system: has not accepted compulsory ICJ jurisdiction

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal and compulsory

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: President of the Republic Sali BERISHA (since 9 April
 1992)
 head of government: Prime Minister of the Council of Ministers
 Aleksander Gabriel MEKSI (since 10 April 1992)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers; appointed by the president

 Legislative branch: unicameral
 People's Assembly (Kuvendi Popullor): elections last held 22 March
 1992; results - DP 62.29%, ASP 25.57%, SDP 4.33%, RP 3.15%, UHP 2.92%,
 other 1.74%; seats - (140 total) DP 92, ASP 38, SDP 7, RP 1, UHP 2
 note: 6 members of the Democratic Party defected making the present
 seating in the Assembly DP 86, ASP 38, SDP 7, DAP 6, RP 1, UHP 2

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court

 Political parties and leaders: there are at least 28 political
 parties; most prominent are the Albanian Socialist Party (ASP;
 formerly the Albania Workers Party), Fatos NANO, first secretary;
 Democratic Party (DP); Albanian Republican Party (RP), Sabri GODO;
 Omonia (Greek minority party), Sotir QIRJAZATI, first secretary;
 Social Democratic Party (SDP), Skender GJINUSHI; Democratic Alliance
 Party (DAP), Neritan CEKA, chairman; Unity for Human Rights Party
 (UHP), Vasil MELO, chairman; Ecology Party (EP), Namik HOTI, chairman

 Member of: BSEC, CCC, CE (guest), EBRD, ECE, FAO, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO,
 ICRM, IDA, IDB, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, IMO, INTELSAT
 (nonsignatory user), INTERPOL, IOC, IOM, ISO, ITU, NACC, OIC, OSCE,
 UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNIDO, UPU, WFTU, WHO, WIPO, WMO, WTO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Lublin Hasan DILJA
 chancery: Suite 1010, 1511 K Street NW, Washington, DC 20005
 telephone: [1] (202) 223-4942, 8187
 FAX: [1] (202) 628-7342

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Joseph E. LAKE
 embassy: Rruga E. Elbansanit 103, Tirane
 mailing address: PSC 59, Box 100 (A), APO AE 09624
 telephone: [355] (42) 328-75, 335-20
 FAX: [355] (42) 322-22

 Flag: red with a black two-headed eagle in the center

@Albania:Economy

 Overview: An extremely poor country by European standards, Albania is
 making the difficult transition to a more open-market economy. The
 economy rebounded in 1993-94 after a severe depression accompanying
 the collapse of the previous centrally planned system in 1990 and
 1991. Stabilization policies - including a strict monetary policy,
 public sector layoffs, and reduced social services - have improved the
 government's fiscal situation and reduced inflation. The recovery was
 spurred by the remittances of some 20% of the population which works
 abroad, mostly in Greece and Italy. These remittances supplement GDP
 and help offset the large foreign trade deficit. Foreign assistance
 and humanitarian aid also supported the recovery. Most agricultural
 land was privatized in 1992, substantially improving peasant incomes.
 Albania's limited industrial sector, now less than one-sixth of GDP,
 continued to decline in 1994. A sharp fall in chromium prices reduced
 hard currency receipts from the mining sector. Large segments of the
 population, especially those living in urban areas, continue to depend
 on humanitarian aid to meet basic food requirements. Unemployment
 remains a severe problem accounting for approximately one-fifth of the
 work force. Growth is expected to continue in 1995, but could falter
 if Albania becomes involved in the conflict in the former Yugoslavia,
 workers' remittances from Greece are reduced, or foreign assistance
 declines.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $3.8 billion (1994
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 11% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $1,110 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 16% (1994)

 Unemployment rate: 18% (1994 est.)

 Budget:
 revenues: $1.1 billion
 expenditures: $1.4 billion, including capital expenditures of $70
 million (1991 est.)

 Exports: $112 million (f.o.b., 1993)
 commodities: asphalt, metals and metallic ores, electricity, crude
 oil, vegetables, fruits, tobacco
 partners: Italy, The Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, Germany,
 Greece, Czech Republic, Slovakia, Poland, Romania, Bulgaria, Hungary

 Imports: $621 million (f.o.b., 1993)
 commodities: machinery, consumer goods, grains
 partners: Italy, The Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, Germany,
 Czech Republic, Slovakia, Romania, Poland, Hungary, Bulgaria, Greece

 External debt: $920 million (1994 est.)

 Industrial production: growth rate -10% (1993 est.); accounts for 16%
 of GDP (1993 est.)

 Electricity:
 capacity: 770,000 kW
 production: 4 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 1,200 kWh (1994)

 Industries: food processing, textiles and clothing, lumber, oil,
 cement, chemicals, mining, basic metals, hydropower

 Agriculture: accounts for 55% of GDP; arable land per capita among
 lowest in Europe; 80% of arable land now in private hands; 60% of the
 work force engaged in farming; produces wide range of temperate-zone
 crops and livestock

 Illicit drugs: transshipment point for Southwest Asian heroin
 transiting the Balkan route and cocaine from South America destined
 for Western Europe; limited opium production

 Economic aid:
 recipient: $303 million (1993)

 Currency: 1 lek (L) = 100 qintars

 Exchange rates: leke (L) per US$1 - 100 (January 1995), 99 (January
 1994), 97 (January 1993), 50 (January 1992), 25 (September 1991)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Albania:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 543 km line connecting Podgorica (Serbia and Montenegro) and
 Shkoder completed August 1986
 standard gauge: 509 km 1.435-m gauge
 narrow gauge: 34 km 0.950-m gauge (1990)

 Highways:
 total: 18,450 km
 paved: 17,450 km
 unpaved: earth 1,000 km (1991)

 Inland waterways: 43 km plus Albanian sections of Lake Scutari, Lake
 Ohrid, and Lake Prespa (1990)

 Pipelines: crude oil 145 km; petroleum products 55 km; natural gas 64
 km (1991)

 Ports: Durres, Sarande, Shergjin, Vlore

 Merchant marine:
 total: 11 cargo ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 52,967 GRT/76,887
 DWT

 Airports:
 total: 11
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 3
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 2
 with unpaved runways over 3,047 m: 2
 with unpaved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 1
 with unpaved runways 1,524 to 2,438 m: 1
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 2

@Albania:Communications

 Telephone system: about 55,000 telephones; about 15 telephones/1,000
 persons
 local: primitive; about 11,000 telephones in Tirane, the capital city
 intercity: obsolete wire system; no longer provides a telephone for
 every village; in 1992, following the fall of the communist
 government, peasants cut the wire to about 1,000 villages and used it
 to build fences
 international: inadequate; carried through the Tirane exchange and
 transmitted through Italy on 240 microwave radio relay circuits and
 through Greece on 150 microwave radio relay circuits

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 17, FM 1, shortwave 0
 radios: 515,000 (1987 est.)

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 9
 televisions: 255,000 (1987 est.)

@Albania:Defense Forces

 Branches: Army, Navy, Air and Air Defense Forces, Interior Ministry
 Troops, Border Guards

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 919,085; males fit for military
 service 755,574; males reach military age (19) annually 33,323 (1995
 est.)

 Defense expenditures: 330 million leke, NA% of GNP (1993); note -
 conversion of defense expenditures into US dollars using the current
 exchange rate could produce misleading results


________________________________________________________________________

ALGERIA

@Algeria:Geography

 Location: Northern Africa, bordering the Mediterranean Sea, between
 Morocco and Tunisia

 Map references: Africa

 Area:
 total area: 2,381,740 sq km
 land area: 2,381,740 sq km
 comparative area: slightly less than 3.5 times the size of Texas

 Land boundaries: total 6,343 km, Libya 982 km, Mali 1,376 km,
 Mauritania 463 km, Morocco 1,559 km, Niger 956 km, Tunisia 965 km,
 Western Sahara 42 km

 Coastline: 998 km

 Maritime claims:
 exclusive fishing zone: 32-52 nm
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: Libya claims part of southeastern Algeria;
 land boundary dispute with Tunisia settled in 1993

 Climate: arid to semiarid; mild, wet winters with hot, dry summers
 along coast; drier with cold winters and hot summers on high plateau;
 sirocco is a hot, dust/sand-laden wind especially common in summer

 Terrain: mostly high plateau and desert; some mountains; narrow,
 discontinuous coastal plain

 Natural resources: petroleum, natural gas, iron ore, phosphates,
 uranium, lead, zinc

 Land use:
 arable land: 3%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 13%
 forest and woodland: 2%
 other: 82%

 Irrigated land: 3,360 sq km (1989 est.)

 Environment:
 current issues: soil erosion from overgrazing and other poor farming
 practices; desertification; dumping of raw sewage, petroleum refining
 wastes, and other industrial effluents is leading to the pollution of
 rivers and coastal waters; Mediterranean Sea, in particular, becoming
 polluted from oil wastes, soil erosion, and fertilizer runoff;
 inadequate supplies of potable water
 natural hazards: mountainous areas subject to severe earthquakes;
 mudslides
 international agreements: party to - Climate Change, Endangered
 Species, Environmental Modification, Ozone Layer Protection, Ship
 Pollution, Wetlands; signed, but not ratified - Biodiversity,
 Desertification, Law of the Sea, Nuclear Test Ban

 Note: second-largest country in Africa (after Sudan)

@Algeria:People

 Population: 28,539,321 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 41% (female 5,678,879; male 5,885,246)
 15-64 years: 56% (female 7,887,885; male 8,033,508)
 65 years and over: 3% (female 557,636; male 496,167) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 2.25% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 29.02 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 6.05 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: -0.49 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 50.3 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 68.01 years
 male: 66.94 years
 female: 69.13 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 3.7 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Algerian(s)
 adjective: Algerian

 Ethnic divisions: Arab-Berber 99%, European less than 1%

 Religions: Sunni Muslim (state religion) 99%, Christian and Jewish 1%

 Languages: Arabic (official), French, Berber dialects

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1990 est.)
 total population: 57%
 male: 70%
 female: 46%

 Labor force: 6.2 million (1992 est.)
 by occupation: government 29.5%, agriculture 22%, construction and
 public works 16.2%, industry 13.6%, commerce and services 13.5%,
 transportation and communication 5.2% (1989)

@Algeria:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Democratic and Popular Republic of Algeria
 conventional short form: Algeria
 local long form: Al Jumhuriyah al Jaza'iriyah ad Dimuqratiyah ash
 Shabiyah
 local short form: Al Jaza'ir

 Digraph: AG

 Type: republic

 Capital: Algiers

 Administrative divisions: 48 provinces (wilayas, singular - wilaya);
 Adrar, Ain Defla, Ain Temouchent, Alger, Annaba, Batna, Bechar,
 Bejaia, Biskra, Blida, Bordj Bou Arreridj, Bouira, Boumerdes, Chlef,
 Constantine, Djelfa, El Bayadh, El Oued, El Tarf, Ghardaia, Guelma,
 Illizi, Jijel, Khenchela, Laghouat, Mascara, Medea, Mila, Mostaganem,
 M'Sila, Naama, Oran, Ouargla, Oum el Bouaghi, Relizane, Saida, Setif,
 Sidi Bel Abbes, Skikda, Souk Ahras, Tamanghasset, Tebessa, Tiaret,
 Tindouf, Tipaza, Tissemsilt, Tizi Ouzou, Tlemcen

 Independence: 5 July 1962 (from France)

 National holiday: Anniversary of the Revolution, 1 November (1954)

 Constitution: 19 November 1976, effective 22 November 1976; revised 3
 November 1988 and 23 February 1989

 Legal system: socialist, based on French and Islamic law; judicial
 review of legislative acts in ad hoc Constitutional Council composed
 of various public officials, including several Supreme Court justices;
 has not accepted compulsory ICJ jurisdiction

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: President Lamine ZEROUAL (since 31 January 1994); next
 election to be held by the end of 1995
 head of government: Prime Minister Mokdad SIFI (since 11 April 1994)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers; appointed by the prime minister

 Legislative branch: unicameral; note - suspended since 1992
 National People's Assembly (Al-Majlis Ech-Chaabi Al-Watani): elections
 first round held on 26 December 1991 (second round canceled by the
 military after President BENDJEDID resigned 11 January 1992,
 effectively suspending the Assembly); results - percent of vote by
 party NA; seats - (281 total); the fundamentalist FIS won 188 of the
 231 seats contested in the first round; note - elections (provincial
 and municipal) were held in June 1990, the first in Algerian history;
 results - FIS 55%, FLN 27.5%, other 17.5%, with 65% of the voters
 participating

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court (Cour Supreme)

 Political parties and leaders: Islamic Salvation Front (FIS, outlawed
 April 1992), Ali BELHADJ, Dr. Abassi MADANI, Abdelkader HACHANI (all
 under arrest), Rabeh KEBIR (self-exile in Germany); National
 Liberation Front (FLN), Abdelhamid MEHRI, Secretary General; Socialist
 Forces Front (FFS), Hocine Ait AHMED, Secretary General
 note: the government established a multiparty system in September 1989
 and, as of 31 December 1990, over 50 legal parties existed

 Member of: ABEDA, AfDB, AFESD, AL, AMF, AMU, CCC, ECA, FAO, G-15,
 G-19, G-24, G-77, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO, ICRM, IDA, IDB, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS,
 ILO, IMF, IMO, INMARSAT, INTELSAT, INTERPOL, IOC, ISO, ITU, NAM,
 OAPEC, OAS (observer), OAU, OIC, OPEC, UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNHCR,
 UNIDO, UNMIH, UPU, WCL, WHO, WIPO, WMO, WTO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Osmane BENCHERIF
 chancery: 2118 Kalorama Road NW, Washington, DC 20008
 telephone: [1] (202) 265-2800

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Ronald E. NEUMANN
 embassy: 4 Chemin Cheikh Bachir El-Ibrahimi, Algiers
 mailing address: B. P. Box 549, Alger-Gare, 16000 Algiers
 telephone: [213] (2) 69-11-86, 69-18-54, 69-38-75
 FAX: [213] (2) 69-39-79
 consulate(s): none (Oran closed June 1993)

 Flag: two equal vertical bands of green (hoist side) and white with a
 red five-pointed star within a red crescent; the crescent, star, and
 color green are traditional symbols of Islam (the state religion)

@Algeria:Economy

 Overview: The hydrocarbons sector is the backbone of the economy,
 accounting for roughly 57% of government revenues, 25% of GDP, and
 almost all export earnings; Algeria has the fifth largest reserves of
 natural gas in the world and ranks fourteenth for oil. Algiers'
 efforts to reform one of the most centrally planned economies in the
 Arab world began after the 1986 collapse of world oil prices plunged
 the country into a severe recession. In 1989, the government launched
 a comprehensive, IMF-supported program to achieve macroeconomic
 stabilization and to introduce market mechanisms into the economy.
 Despite substantial progress toward macroeconomic adjustment, in 1992
 the reform drive stalled as Algiers became embroiled in political
 turmoil. In September 1993, a new government was formed, and one
 priority was the resumption and acceleration of the structural
 adjustment process. Buffeted by the slump in world oil prices and
 burdened with a heavy foreign debt, Algiers concluded a one-year
 standby arrangement with the IMF in April 1994.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $97.1 billion (1994
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 0.2% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $3,480 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 30% (1994 est.)

 Unemployment rate: 30% (1994 est.)

 Budget:
 revenues: $14.3 billion
 expenditures: $17.9 billion (1995 est.)

 Exports: $9.1 billion (f.o.b., 1994)
 commodities: petroleum and natural gas 97%
 partners: Italy 21%, France 16%, US 14%, Germany 13%, Spain 9%

 Imports: $9.2 billion (f.o.b., 1994 est.)
 commodities: capital goods 39.7%, food and beverages 21.7%, consumer
 goods 11.8% (1990)
 partners: France 29%, Italy 14%, Spain 9%, US 9%, Germany 7%

 External debt: $26 billion (1994)

 Industrial production: growth rate NA%; accounts for 35% of GDP
 (including hydrocarbons)

 Electricity:
 capacity: 5,370,000 kW
 production: 18.3 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 587 kWh (1993)

 Industries: petroleum, light industries, natural gas, mining,
 electrical, petrochemical, food processing

 Agriculture: accounts for 12% of GDP (1993) and employs 22% of labor
 force; products- wheat, barley, oats, grapes, olives, citrus, fruits,
 sheep, cattle; net importer of food - grain, vegetable oil, sugar

 Economic aid:
 recipient: US commitments, including Ex-Im (FY70-85), $1.4 billion;
 Western (non-US) countries, ODA and OOF bilateral commitments
 (1970-89), $925 million; OPEC bilateral aid (1979-89), $1.8 billion;
 Communist countries (1970-89), $2.7 billion; net official
 disbursements (1985-89), $375 million

 Currency: 1 Algerian dinar (DA) = 100 centimes

 Exchange rates: Algerian dinars (DA) per US$1 - 42.710 (January 1995),
 35.059 (1994), 23.345 (1993), 21.836 (1992), 18.473 (1991), 8.958
 (1990)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Algeria:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 4,733 km
 standard gauge: 3,576 km 1.435-m gauge (299 km electrified; 215 km
 double track)
 narrow gauge: 1,157 km 1.055-m gauge

 Highways:
 total: 95,576 km
 paved: concrete, bituminous 57,346 km
 unpaved: gravel, crushed stone, earth 38,230 km

 Pipelines: crude oil 6,612 km; petroleum products 298 km; natural gas
 2,948 km

 Ports: Algiers, Annaba, Arzew, Bejaia, Beni Saf, Dellys, Djendjene,
 Ghazaouet, Jijel, Mostaganem, Oran, Skikda, Tenes

 Merchant marine:
 total: 75 ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 903,179 GRT/1,064,211 DWT

 ships by type: bulk 9, cargo 27, chemical tanker 7, liquefied gas
 tanker 9, oil tanker 5, roll-on/roll-off cargo 12, short-sea passenger
 5, specialized tanker 1

 Airports:
 total: 139
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 9
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 23
 with paved runways 1,524 to 2,437 m: 14
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 5
 with paved runways under 914 m: 20
 with unpaved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 3
 with unpaved runways 1,524 to 2,438 m: 24
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 41

@Algeria:Communications

 Telephone system: 822,000 telephones; excellent domestic and
 international service in the north, sparse in the south
 local: NA
 intercity: 12 domestic satellite links; 20 additional satellite links
 are planned
 international: 5 submarine cables; microwave radio relay to Italy,
 France, Spain, Morocco, and Tunisia; coaxial cable to Morocco and
 Tunisia; 2 INTELSAT (1 Atlantic Ocean and 1 Indian Ocean), 1
 Intersputnik, 1 ARABSAT earth station

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 26, FM 0, shortwave 0
 radios: 5.2 million

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 18
 televisions: 1.6 million

@Algeria:Defense Forces

 Branches: National Popular Army, Navy, Air Force, Territorial Air
 Defense, National Gendarmerie

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 7,124,894; males fit for
 military service 4,373,272; males reach military age (19) annually
 313,707 (1995 est.)

 Defense expenditures: exchange rate conversion - $1.3 billion, 2.7% of
 GDP (1994)


________________________________________________________________________

AMERICAN SAMOA

 (territory of the US)

@American Samoa:Geography

 Location: Oceania, group of islands in the South Pacific Ocean, about
 one-half of the way from Hawaii to New Zealand

 Map references: Oceania

 Area:
 total area: 199 sq km
 land area: 199 sq km
 comparative area: slightly larger than Washington, DC
 note: includes Rose Island and Swains Island

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 116 km

 Maritime claims:
 exclusive economic zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: none

 Climate: tropical marine, moderated by southeast trade winds; annual
 rainfall averages 124 inches; rainy season from November to April, dry
 season from May to October; little seasonal temperature variation

 Terrain: five volcanic islands with rugged peaks and limited coastal
 plains, two coral atolls (Rose Island, Swains Island)

 Natural resources: pumice, pumicite

 Land use:
 arable land: 10%
 permanent crops: 5%
 meadows and pastures: 0%
 forest and woodland: 75%
 other: 10%

 Irrigated land: NA sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: limited natural fresh water resources; in many areas
 of the island water supplies come from roof catchments
 natural hazards: typhoons common from December to March
 international agreements: NA

 Note: Pago Pago has one of the best natural deepwater harbors in the
 South Pacific Ocean, sheltered by shape from rough seas and protected
 by peripheral mountains from high winds; strategic location in the
 South Pacific Ocean

@American Samoa:People

 Population: 57,366 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: NA
 15-64 years: NA
 65 years and over: NA

 Population growth rate: 3.82% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 36.21 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 4.01 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: 6 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 18.78 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 72.91 years
 male: 71.03 years
 female: 74.85 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 4.3 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: American Samoan(s)
 adjective: American Samoan

 Ethnic divisions: Samoan (Polynesian) 89%, Caucasian 2%, Tongan 4%,
 other 5%

 Religions: Christian Congregationalist 50%, Roman Catholic 20%,
 Protestant denominations and other 30%

 Languages: Samoan (closely related to Hawaiian and other Polynesian
 languages), English; most people are bilingual

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1980)
 total population: 97%
 male: 98%
 female: 97%

 Labor force: 14,400 (1990)
 by occupation: government 33%, tuna canneries 34%, other 33% (1990)

@American Samoa:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Territory of American Samoa
 conventional short form: American Samoa

 Abbreviation: AS

 Digraph: AQ

 Type: unincorporated and unorganized territory of the US; administered
 by the US Department of Interior, Office of Territorial and
 International Affairs

 Capital: Pago Pago

 Administrative divisions: none (territory of the US)

 Independence: none (territory of the US)

 National holiday: Territorial Flag Day, 17 April (1900)

 Constitution: ratified 1966, in effect 1967

 Legal system: NA

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: President William Jefferson CLINTON (since 20 January
 1993); Vice President Albert GORE, Jr. (since 20 January 1993)
 head of government: Governor A. P. LUTALI (since 3 January 1993);
 Lieutenant Governor Tauese P. SUNIA (since 3 January 1993); election
 last held 3 November 1992 (next to be held NA November 1996); results
 - A. P. LUTALI (Democrat) 53%, Peter Tali COLEMAN (Republican) 36%

 Legislative branch: bicameral Legislative Assembly (Fono)
 House of Representatives: elections last held 3 November 1992 (next to
 be held NA November 1994); results - representatives popularly elected
 from 17 house districts; seats - (21 total, 20 elected, and 1
 nonvoting delegate from Swains Island)
 Senate: elections last held 3 November 1992 (next to be held NA
 November 1996); results - senators elected by village chiefs from 12
 senate districts; seats - (18 total) number of seats by party NA
 US House of Representatives: elections last held 3 November 1992 (next
 to be held NA November 1994); results - Eni R. F. H. FALEOMAVAEGA
 reelected as delegate

 Judicial branch: High Court

 Political parties and leaders: NA

 Member of: ESCAP (associate), INTERPOL (subbureau), IOC, SPC

 Diplomatic representation in US: none (territory of the US)

 US diplomatic representation: none (territory of the US)

 Flag: blue with a white triangle edged in red that is based on the fly
 side and extends to the hoist side; a brown and white American bald
 eagle flying toward the hoist side is carrying two traditional Samoan
 symbols of authority, a staff and a war club

@American Samoa:Economy

 Overview: Economic activity is strongly linked to the US, with which
 American Samoa conducts 80%-90% of its foreign trade. Tuna fishing and
 tuna processing plants are the backbone of the private sector, with
 canned tuna the primary export. The tuna canneries and the government
 are by far the two largest employers. Other economic activities
 include a slowly developing tourist industry. Transfers from the US
 Government add substantially to American Samoa's economic well-being.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $128 million (1991
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: NA%

 National product per capita: $2,600 (1991)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 7% (1990)

 Unemployment rate: 12% (1991)

 Budget:
 revenues: $97 million (includes $43,000,000 in local revenue and
 $54,000,000 in grant revenue);
 expenditures: $NA, including capital expenditures of $NA (FY90/91)

 Exports: $306 million (f.o.b., 1989)
 commodities: canned tuna 93%
 partners: US 99.6%

 Imports: $360.3 million (c.i.f., 1989)
 commodities: materials for canneries 56%, food 8%, petroleum products
 7%, machinery and parts 6%
 partners: US 62%, Japan 9%, NZ 7%, Australia 11%, Fiji 4%, other 7%

 External debt: $NA

 Industrial production: growth rate NA%

 Electricity:
 capacity: 30,000 kW
 production: 90 million kWh
 consumption per capita: 1,505 kWh (1993)

 Industries: tuna canneries (largely dependent on foreign fishing
 vessels), meat canning, handicrafts

 Agriculture: bananas, coconuts, vegetables, taro, breadfruit, yams,
 copra, pineapples, papayas, dairy farming

 Economic aid:
 recipient: $21,042,650 in operational funds and $1,227,000 in
 construction funds for capital improvement projects from the US
 Department of Interior (1991)

 Currency: 1 United States dollar = 100 cents

 Exchange rates: US currency is used

 Fiscal year: 1 October - 30 September

@American Samoa:Transportation

 Railroads: 0 km

 Highways:
 total: 350 km
 paved: 150 km
 unpaved: 200 km

 Ports: Aanu'u (new construction), Auasi, Faleosao, Ofu, Pago Pago,
 Ta'u

 Merchant marine: none

 Airports:
 total: 4
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 1
 with paved runways under 914 m: 3
 note: small airstrips on Fituita and Ofu

@American Samoa:Communications

 Telephone system: 8,399 telephones; good telex, telegraph, and
 facsimile services
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: 1 INTELSAT (Pacific Ocean) and 1 COMSAT earth station

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 1, FM 1, shortwave 0
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 1
 televisions: NA

@American Samoa:Defense Forces

 Note: defense is the responsibility of the US


________________________________________________________________________

ANDORRA

@Andorra:Geography

 Location: Southwestern Europe, between France and Spain

 Map references: Europe

 Area:
 total area: 450 sq km
 land area: 450 sq km
 comparative area: slightly more than 2.5 times the size of Washington,
 DC

 Land boundaries: total 125 km, France 60 km, Spain 65 km

 Coastline: 0 km (landlocked)

 Maritime claims: none; landlocked

 International disputes: none

 Climate: temperate; snowy, cold winters and warm, dry summers

 Terrain: rugged mountains dissected by narrow valleys

 Natural resources: hydropower, mineral water, timber, iron ore, lead

 Land use:
 arable land: 2%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 56%
 forest and woodland: 22%
 other: 20%

 Irrigated land: NA sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: deforestation; overgrazing of mountain meadows
 contributes to soil erosion
 natural hazards: snowslides, avalanches
 international agreements: NA

 Note: landlocked

@Andorra:People

 Population: 65,780 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 18% (female 5,503; male 5,985)
 15-64 years: 70% (female 21,873; male 24,334)
 65 years and over: 12% (female 4,020; male 4,065) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 2.72% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 12.92 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 7.25 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: 21.53 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 7.7 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 78.52 years
 male: 75.65 years
 female: 81.66 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 1.72 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Andorran(s)
 adjective: Andorran

 Ethnic divisions: Spanish 61%, Andorran 30%, French 6%, other 3%

 Religions: Roman Catholic (predominant)

 Languages: Catalan (official), French, Castilian

 Literacy: NA%

 Labor force: NA

@Andorra:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Principality of Andorra
 conventional short form: Andorra
 local long form: Principat d'Andorra
 local short form: Andorra

 Digraph: AN

 Type: parliamentary democracy (since March 1993) that retains as its
 heads of state a co-principality; the two princes are the president of
 France and Spanish bishop of Seo de Urgel, who are represented locally
 by officials called veguers

 Capital: Andorra la Vella

 Administrative divisions: 7 parishes (parroquies, singular -
 parroquia); Andorra, Canillo, Encamp, La Massana, Les Escaldes,
 Ordino, Sant Julia de Loria

 Independence: 1278

 National holiday: Mare de Deu de Meritxell, 8 September

 Constitution: Andorra's first written constitution was drafted in
 1991; adopted 14 March 1993

 Legal system: based on French and Spanish civil codes; no judicial
 review of legislative acts; has not accepted compulsory ICJ
 jurisdiction

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chiefs of state: French Co-Prince Francois MITTERRAND (since 21 May
 1981), represented by Veguer de Franca Jean Pierre COURTOIS (since
 NA); note - COURTOIS is to become French ambassador to Libreville and
 his replacement has not been announced; Spanish Episcopal Co-Prince
 Mgr. Juan MARTI Alanis (since 31 January 1971), represented by Veguer
 Episcopal Francesc BADIA Bata (since NA); two permanent delegates
 (French Prefect Pierre STEINMETZ for the department of
 Pyrenees-Orientales, since NA, and Spanish Vicar General Nemesi
 MARQUES Oste for the Seo de Urgel diocese, since NA)
 head of government: Executive Council President Marc FORNE (since 21
 December 1994) elected by Parliament, following resignation of Oscar
 RIBAS Reig
 cabinet: Executive Council; designated by the executive council
 president

 Legislative branch: unicameral
 General Council of the Valleys: (Consell General de las Valls);
 elections last held 12 December 1993 (next to be held NA); yielded no
 clear winner; results - percent of vote by party NA; seats - (28
 total) number of seats by party NA

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court of Andorra at Perpignan (France) for
 civil cases, the Ecclesiastical Court of the bishop of Seo de Urgel
 (Spain) for civil cases, Tribunal of the Courts (Tribunal des Cortes)
 for criminal cases

 Political parties and leaders: National Democratic Group (AND), Oscar
 RIBAS Reig and Jordi FARRAS; Liberal Union (UL), Francesc CERQUEDA;
 New Democracy (ND), Jaume BARTOMEU; Andorran National Coalition (CNA),
 Antoni CERQUEDA; National Democratic Initiative (IDN), Vincenc MATEU;
 Liberal Union (UL), Marc FORNE
 note: there are two other small parties

 Member of: ECE, IFRCS (associate), INTERPOL, IOC, ITU, UN, UNESCO

 Diplomatic representation in US: Andorra has no mission in the US

 US diplomatic representation: Andorra is included within the Barcelona
 (Spain) Consular District, and the US Consul General visits Andorra
 periodically

 Flag: three equal vertical bands of blue (hoist side), yellow, and red
 with the national coat of arms centered in the yellow band; the coat
 of arms features a quartered shield; similar to the flags of Chad and
 Romania that do not have a national coat of arms in the center

@Andorra:Economy

 Overview: Tourism, the mainstay of Andorra's economy, accounts for
 roughly 80% of GDP. An estimated 13 million tourists visit annually,
 attracted by Andorra's duty-free status and by its summer and winter
 resorts. The banking sector, with its "tax haven" status, also
 contributes substantially to the economy. Agricultural production is
 limited by a scarcity of arable land, and most food has to be
 imported. The principal livestock activity is sheep raising.
 Manufacturing consists mainly of cigarettes, cigars, and furniture.
 Andorra is a member of the EU Customs Union; it is unclear what effect
 the European Single Market will have on the advantages Andorra obtains
 from its duty-free status.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $760 million (1992
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: NA%

 National product per capita: $14,000 (1992 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): NA%

 Unemployment rate: 0%

 Budget:
 revenues: $138 million
 expenditures: $177 million, including capital expenditures of $NA
 (1993)

 Exports: $30 million (f.o.b., 1993 est.)
 commodities: electricity, tobacco products, furniture
 partners: France, Spain

 Imports: $NA
 commodities: consumer goods, food
 partners: France, Spain

 External debt: $NA

 Industrial production: growth rate NA%

 Electricity:
 capacity: 35,000 kW
 production: 140 million kWh
 consumption per capita: 2,570 kWh (1992)

 Industries: tourism (particularly skiing), sheep, timber, tobacco,
 banking

 Agriculture: sheep raising; small quantities of tobacco, rye, wheat,
 barley, oats, and some vegetables

 Economic aid: none

 Currency: 1 French franc (F) = 100 centimes; 1 peseta (Pta) = 100
 centimos; the French and Spanish currencies are used

 Exchange rates: French francs (F) per US$1 - 5.2943 (January 1995),
 5,5520 (1994), 5.6632 (1993), 5.2938 (1992), 5.6421 (1991), 5.4453
 (1990); Spanish pesetas (Ptas) per US$1 - 132.61 (January 1995),
 133.96 (1994), 127.26 (1993), 102.38 (1992), 103.91 (1991), 101.93
 (1990)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Andorra:Transportation

 Railroads: 0 km

 Highways:
 total: 96 km
 paved: NA
 unpaved: NA

 Ports: none

 Airports: none

@Andorra:Communications

 Telephone system: 17,700 telephones; digital microwave network
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: landline circuits to France and Spain

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 1, FM 0, shortwave 0
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 0
 televisions: NA

@Andorra:Defense Forces

 Note: defense is the responsibility of France and Spain


________________________________________________________________________

ANGOLA

@Angola:Geography

 Location: Southern Africa, bordering the South Atlantic Ocean, between
 Namibia and Zaire

 Map references: Africa

 Area:
 total area: 1,246,700 sq km
 land area: 1,246,700 sq km
 comparative area: slightly less than twice the size of Texas

 Land boundaries: total 5,198 km, Congo 201 km, Namibia 1,376 km, Zaire
 2,511 km, Zambia 1,110 km

 Coastline: 1,600 km

 Maritime claims:
 exclusive fishing zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 20 nm

 International disputes: none

 Climate: semiarid in south and along coast to Luanda; north has cool,
 dry season (May to October) and hot, rainy season (November to April)

 Terrain: narrow coastal plain rises abruptly to vast interior plateau

 Natural resources: petroleum, diamonds, iron ore, phosphates, copper,
 feldspar, gold, bauxite, uranium

 Land use:
 arable land: 2%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 23%
 forest and woodland: 43%
 other: 32%

 Irrigated land: NA km2

 Environment:
 current issues: population pressures contributing to overuse of
 pastures and subsequent soil erosion; desertification; deforestation
 of tropical rain forest attributable to the international demand for
 tropical timber and domestic use as a fuel; deforestation contributing
 to loss of biodiversity; soil erosion contributing to water pollution
 and siltation of rivers and dams; inadequate supplies of potable water

 natural hazards: locally heavy rainfall causes periodic flooding on
 the plateau
 international agreements: party to - Law of the Sea; signed, but not
 ratified - Biodiversity, Climate Change, Desertification

 Note: Cabinda is separated from rest of country by Zaire

@Angola:People

 Population: 10,069,501 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 45% (female 2,208,307; male 2,274,533)
 15-64 years: 53% (female 2,641,259; male 2,685,543)
 65 years and over: 2% (female 136,573; male 123,286) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 2.68% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 45.05 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 18.1 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: -0.15 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 142.1 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 46.28 years
 male: 44.18 years
 female: 48.49 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 6.42 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Angolan(s)
 adjective: Angolan

 Ethnic divisions: Ovimbundu 37%, Kimbundu 25%, Bakongo 13%, mestico
 (mixed European and Native African) 2%, European 1%, other 22%

 Religions: indigenous beliefs 47%, Roman Catholic 38%, Protestant 15%
 (est.)

 Languages: Portuguese (official), Bantu and other African languages

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1990 est.)
 total population: 42%
 male: 56%
 female: 28%

 Labor force: 2.783 million economically active
 by occupation: agriculture 85%, industry 15% (1985 est.)

@Angola:Government

 Note: Civil war has been the norm since independence from Portugal on
 11 November 1975; a cease-fire lasted from 31 May 1991 until October
 1992 when the insurgent National Union for the Total Independence of
 Angola (UNITA) refused to accept its defeat in internationally
 monitored elections and fighting resumed throughout much of the
 countryside. The two sides signed another peace accord on 20 November
 1994; the cease-fire is generally holding but most provisions of the
 accord remain to be implemented.

 Names:
 conventional long form: Republic of Angola
 conventional short form: Angola
 local long form: Republica de Angola
 local short form: Angola
 former: People's Republic of Angola

 Digraph: AO

 Type: transitional government nominally a multiparty democracy with a
 strong presidential system

 Capital: Luanda

 Administrative divisions: 18 provinces (provincias, singular -
 provincia); Bengo, Benguela, Bie, Cabinda, Cuando Cubango, Cuanza
 Norte, Cuanza Sul, Cunene, Huambo, Huila, Luanda, Lunda Norte, Lunda
 Sul, Malanje, Moxico, Namibe, Uige, Zaire

 Independence: 11 November 1975 (from Portugal)

 National holiday: Independence Day, 11 November (1975)

 Constitution: 11 November 1975; revised 7 January 1978, 11 August
 1980, 6 March 1991, and 26 August 1992

 Legal system: based on Portuguese civil law system and customary law;
 recently modified to accommodate political pluralism and increased use
 of free markets

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: President Jose Eduardo DOS SANTOS (since 21 September
 1979)
 head of government: Prime Minister Marcolino Jose Carlos MOCO (since 2
 December 1992)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers; appointed by the president

 Legislative branch: unicameral
 National Assembly (Assembleia Nacional): first nationwide, multiparty
 elections were held 29-30 September 1992 with disputed results

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court (Tribunal da Relacao)

 Political parties and leaders: Popular Movement for the Liberation of
 Angola (MPLA), led by Jose Eduardo DOS SANTOS, is the ruling party and
 has been in power since 1975; National Union for the Total
 Independence of Angola (UNITA), led by Jonas SAVIMBI, is a legal party
 despite its history of armed resistance to the government; five minor
 parties have small numbers of seats in the National Assembly

 Other political or pressure groups: Cabindan State Liberation Front
 (FLEC), N'ZITA Tiago, leader of largest faction (FLEC-FAC)
 note: FLEC is waging a small-scale, highly factionalized, armed
 struggle for the independence of Cabinda Province

 Member of: ACP, AfDB, CCC, CEEAC (observer), ECA, FAO, FLS, G-77,
 GATT, IBRD, ICAO, ICRM, IDA, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, IMO,
 INTELSAT, INTERPOL, IOC, IOM, ITU, NAM, OAS (observer), OAU, SADC, UN,
 UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNIDO, UPU, WCL, WFTU, WHO, WIPO, WMO, WTO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Jose Goncalves Martins PATRICIO
 embassy: 1819 L Street NW, Washington, DC 20036, Suite 400
 telephone: [1] (202) 785-1156
 FAX: [1] (202) 785-1258

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Edmund T. DE JARNETTE
 embassy: 32 Rua Houari Boumedienne, Miramar, Luanda
 mailing address: C.P. 6484, Luanda; American Embassy, Luanda,
 Department of State, Washington, D.C. 20521-2550 (pouch)
 telephone: [244] (2) 345-481, 346-418
 FAX: [244] (2) 347-884

 Flag: two equal horizontal bands of red (top) and black with a
 centered yellow emblem consisting of a five-pointed star within half a
 cogwheel crossed by a machete (in the style of a hammer and sickle)

@Angola:Economy

 Overview: Subsistence agriculture provides the main livelihood for
 80%-90% of the population but accounts for less than 15% of GDP. Oil
 production is vital to the economy, contributing about 60% to GDP.
 Despite the signing of a peace accord in November 1994 between the
 Angola government and the UNITA insurgents, sporadic fighting
 continues and many farmers remain reluctant to return to their fields.
 As a result, much of the country's food requirements must still be
 imported. Angola has rich natural resources - notably gold, diamonds,
 and arable land, in addition to large oil deposits - but will need to
 observe the cease-fire, implement the peace agreement, and reform
 government policies if it is to achieve its potential.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $6.1 billion (1994
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: -1% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $620 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 20% average per month (1994 est.)

 Unemployment rate: 15% with considerable underemployment (1993 est.)

 Budget:
 revenues: $928 million
 expenditures: $2.5 billion, including capital expenditures of $963
 million (1992 est.)

 Exports: $3 billion (f.o.b., 1993 est.)
 commodities: oil, diamonds, refined petroleum products, gas, coffee,
 sisal, fish and fish products, timber, cotton
 partners: US, France, Germany, Netherlands, Brazil

 Imports: $1.6 billion (f.o.b., 1992 est.)
 commodities: capital equipment (machinery and electrical equipment),
 food, vehicles and spare parts, textiles and clothing, medicines,
 substantial military deliveries
 partners: Portugal, Brazil, US, France, Spain

 External debt: $11.7 billion (1994 est.)

 Industrial production: growth rate NA%; accounts for about 60% of GDP,
 including petroleum output

 Electricity:
 capacity: 620,000 kW
 production: 1.9 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 189 kWh (1993)

 Industries: petroleum; mining - diamonds, iron ore, phosphates,
 feldspar, bauxite, uranium, and gold; fish processing; food
 processing; brewing; tobacco; sugar; textiles; cement; basic metal
 products

 Agriculture: cash crops - bananas, sugarcane, coffee, sisal, corn,
 cotton, cane, manioc, tobacco; food crops - cassava, corn, vegetables,
 plantains; livestock production accounts for 20%, fishing 4%, forestry
 2% of total agricultural output

 Illicit drugs: increasingly used as a transshipment point for cocaine
 destined for Western Europe

 Economic aid:
 recipient: US commitments, including Ex-Im (FY70-89), $265 million;
 Western (non-US) countries, ODA and OOF bilateral commitments
 (1970-89), $1.105 billion; Communist countries (1970-89), $1.3
 billion; net official disbursements (1985-89), $750 million

 Currency: 1 new kwanza (NKz) = 100 lwei

 Exchange rates: new kwanza (NKz) per US$1 - 900,000 (official rate 25
 April 1995), 1,900,000 (black market rate 6 April 1995), 600,000
 (official rate 10 January 1995), 90,000 (official rate 1 June 1994),
 180,000 (black market rate 1 June 1994); 7,000 (official rate 16
 December 1993), 50,000 (black market rate 16 December 1993); 3,884
 (July 1993); 550 (April 1992); 90 (November 1991); 60 (October 1990)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Angola:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 3,189 km; note - limited trackage in use because of landmines
 still in place from the civil war; majority of the Benguela Railroad
 also closed because of civil war
 narrow gauge: 2,879 km 1.067-m gauge; 310 km 0.600-m gauge

 Highways:
 total: 73,828 km
 paved: bituminous-surface 8,577 km
 unpaved: crushed stone, gravel, improved earth 29,350 km; unimproved
 earth 35,901 km

 Inland waterways: 1,295 km navigable

 Pipelines: crude oil 179 km

 Ports: Ambriz, Cabinda, Lobito, Luanda, Malogo, Namibe, Porto Amboim,
 Soyo

 Merchant marine:
 total: 12 ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 63,776 GRT/99,863 DWT
 ships by type: cargo 11, oil tanker 1

 Airports:
 total: 289
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 4
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 9
 with paved runways 1,524 to 2,437 m: 12
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 6
 with paved runways under 914 m: 93
 with unpaved runways over 3,047 m: 1
 with unpaved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 5
 with unpaved runways 1,524 to 2,438 m: 33
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 126

@Angola:Communications

 Telephone system: 40,300 telephones; 4.1 telephones/1,000 persons;
 high frequency radio used extensively for military links; telephone
 service limited mostly to government and business use
 local: NA
 intercity: limited system of wire, microwave radio relay, and
 troposcatter routes
 international: 2 INTELSAT (Atlantic Ocean) earth stations

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 17, FM 13, shortwave 0
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 6
 televisions: NA

@Angola:Defense Forces

 Branches: Army, Navy, Air and Air Defense Forces, National Police
 Force

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 2,315,717; males fit for
 military service 1,166,082; males reach military age (18) annually
 100,273 (1995 est.)

 Defense expenditures: exchange rate conversion - $1.1 billion, 31% of
 GDP (1993)


________________________________________________________________________

ANGUILLA

 (dependent territory of the UK)

@Anguilla:Geography

 Location: Caribbean, island in the Caribbean Sea, east of Puerto Rico

 Map references: Central America and the Caribbean

 Area:
 total area: 91 sq km
 land area: 91 sq km
 comparative area: about half the size of Washington, DC

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 61 km

 Maritime claims:
 exclusive fishing zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 3 nm

 International disputes: none

 Climate: tropical; moderated by northeast trade winds

 Terrain: flat and low-lying island of coral and limestone

 Natural resources: negligible; salt, fish, lobster

 Land use:
 arable land: NA%
 permanent crops: NA%
 meadows and pastures: NA%
 forest and woodland: NA%
 other: NA% (mostly rock with sparse scrub oak, few trees, some
 commercial salt ponds)

 Irrigated land: NA sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: supplies of potable water sometimes cannot meet
 increasing demand largely because of poor distribution system
 natural hazards: frequent hurricanes and other tropical storms (July
 to October)
 international agreements: NA

@Anguilla:People

 Population: 7,099 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 32% (female 1,129; male 1,115)
 15-64 years: 60% (female 2,101; male 2,126)
 65 years and over: 8% (female 362; male 266) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 0.66% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 24.09 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 8.03 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: -9.44 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 17.3 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 74.1 years
 male: 71.32 years
 female: 76.91 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 3.05 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Anguillan(s)
 adjective: Anguillan

 Ethnic divisions: black African

 Religions: Anglican 40%, Methodist 33%, Seventh-Day Adventist 7%,
 Baptist 5%, Roman Catholic 3%, other 12%

 Languages: English (official)

 Literacy: age 12 and over can read and write (1984)
 total population: 95%
 male: 95%
 female: 95%

 Labor force: 4,400 (1992)
 by occupation: commerce 36%, services 29%, construction 18%,
 transportation and utilities 10%, manufacturing 3%,
 agriculture/fishing/forestry/mining 4%

@Anguilla:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: none
 conventional short form: Anguilla

 Digraph: AV

 Type: dependent territory of the UK

 Capital: The Valley

 Administrative divisions: none (dependent territory of the UK)

 Independence: none (dependent territory of the UK)

 National holiday: Anguilla Day, 30 May

 Constitution: Anguilla Constitutional Orders 1 April 1982; amended
 1990

 Legal system: based on English common law

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: Queen ELIZABETH II (since 6 February 1952),
 represented by Governor Alan W. SHAVE (since 14 August 1992)
 head of government: Chief Minister Hubert HUGHES (since 16 March 1994)

 cabinet: Executive Council; appointed by the governor from the elected
 members of the House of Assembly

 Legislative branch: unicameral
 House of Assembly: elections last held 16 March 1994 (next to be held
 March 1999); results - percent of vote by party NA; seats - (11 total,
 7 elected) ANA 2, AUP 2, ADP 2, independent 1

 Judicial branch: High Court

 Political parties and leaders: Anguilla National Alliance (ANA);
 Anguilla United Party (AUP), Hubert HUGHES; Anguilla Democratic Party
 (ADP), Victor BANKS

 Member of: CARICOM (observer), CDB, INTERPOL (subbureau)

 Diplomatic representation in US: none (dependent territory of the UK)

 US diplomatic representation: none (dependent territory of the UK)

 Flag: two horizontal bands of white (top, almost triple width) and
 light blue with three orange dolphins in an interlocking circular
 design centered in the white band; a new flag may have been in use
 since 30 May 1990

@Anguilla:Economy

 Overview: Anguilla has few natural resources, and the economy depends
 heavily on lobster fishing, offshore banking, tourism, and remittances
 from emigrants. In recent years the economy has benefited from a boom
 in tourism and construction. Development plans center around the
 improvement of the infrastructure, particularly transport and tourist
 facilities, and also light industry.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $49 million (1993
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 7.5% (1992)

 National product per capita: $7,000 (1993 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 3% (1992 est.)

 Unemployment rate: 7% (1992 est.)

 Budget:
 revenues: $13.8 million
 expenditures: $15.2 million, including capital expenditures of $2.4
 million (1992 est.)

 Exports: $556,000 (f.o.b., 1992)
 commodities: lobster and salt
 partners: NA

 Imports: $33.5 million (f.o.b., 1992)
 commodities: NA
 partners: NA

 External debt: $NA

 Industrial production: growth rate NA%

 Electricity:
 capacity: 2,000 kW
 production: 6 million kWh
 consumption per capita: 862 kWh (1992)

 Industries: tourism, boat building, salt

 Agriculture: pigeon peas, corn, sweet potatoes, sheep, goats, pigs,
 cattle, poultry, fishing (including lobster)

 Economic aid:
 recipient: Western (non-US) countries, ODA and OOF bilateral
 commitments (1970-89), $38 million

 Currency: 1 EC dollar (EC$) = 100 cents

 Exchange rates: East Caribbean dollars (EC$) per US$1 - 2.70 (fixed
 rate since 1976)

 Fiscal year: NA

@Anguilla:Transportation

 Railroads: 0 km

 Highways:
 total: 105 km (1992 est.)
 paved: 65 km
 unpaved: gravel and earth 40 km

 Ports: Blowing Point, Road Bay

 Merchant marine: none

 Airports:
 total: 3
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 1
 with paved runways under 914 m: 2

@Anguilla:Communications

 Telephone system: 890 telephones; modern internal telephone system
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: radio relay microwave link to island of Saint Martin

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 3, FM 1, shortwave 0
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 0
 televisions: NA

@Anguilla:Defense Forces

 Note: defense is the responsibility of the UK


________________________________________________________________________

ANTARCTICA

@Antarctica:Geography

 Location: continent mostly south of the Antarctic Circle

 Map references: Antarctic Region

 Area:
 total area: 14 million sq km (est.)
 land area: 14 million sq km (est.)
 comparative area: slightly less than 1.5 times the size of the US
 note: second-smallest continent (after Australia)

 Land boundaries: none, but see entry on International disputes

 Coastline: 17,968 km

 Maritime claims: none, but see entry on International Disputes

 International disputes: Antarctic Treaty defers claims (see Antarctic
 Treaty Summary below); sections (some overlapping) claimed by
 Argentina, Australia, Chile, France (Adelie Land), New Zealand (Ross
 Dependency), Norway (Queen Maud Land), and UK; the US and most other
 nations do not recognize the territorial claims of other nations and
 have made no claims themselves (the US reserves the right to do so);
 no formal claims have been made in the sector between 90 degrees west
 and 150 degrees west

 Climate: severe low temperatures vary with latitude, elevation, and
 distance from the ocean; East Antarctica is colder than West
 Antarctica because of its higher elevation; Antarctic Peninsula has
 the most moderate climate; higher temperatures occur in January along
 the coast and average slightly below freezing

 Terrain: about 98% thick continental ice sheet and 2% barren rock,
 with average elevations between 2,000 and 4,000 meters; mountain
 ranges up to 4,897 meters high; ice-free coastal areas include parts
 of southern Victoria Land, Wilkes Land, the Antarctic Peninsula area,
 and parts of Ross Island on McMurdo Sound; glaciers form ice shelves
 along about half of the coastline, and floating ice shelves constitute
 11% of the area of the continent

 Natural resources: none presently exploited; iron ore, chromium,
 copper, gold, nickel, platinum and other minerals, and coal and
 hydrocarbons have been found in small, uncommercial quantities

 Land use:
 arable land: 0%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 0%
 forest and woodland: 0%
 other: 100% (ice 98%, barren rock 2%)

 Irrigated land: 0 sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: in October 1991 it was reported that the ozone shield,
 which protects the Earth's surface from harmful ultraviolet radiation,
 had dwindled to the lowest level recorded over Antarctica since 1975
 when measurements were first taken
 natural hazards: katabatic (gravity-driven) winds blow coastward from
 the high interior; frequent blizzards form near the foot of the
 plateau; cyclonic storms form over the ocean and move clockwise along
 the coast; volcanism on Deception Island and isolated areas of West
 Antarctica; other seismic activity rare and weak
 international agreements: NA

 Note: the coldest, windiest, highest, and driest continent; during
 summer more solar radiation reaches the surface at the South Pole than
 is received at the Equator in an equivalent period; mostly
 uninhabitable

@Antarctica:People

 Population: no indigenous inhabitants; note - there are seasonally
 staffed research stations
 Summer (January) population: over 4,115 total; Argentina 207,
 Australia 268, Belgium 13, Brazil 80, Chile 256, China NA, Ecuador NA,
 Finland 11, France 78, Germany 32, Greenpeace 12, India 60, Italy 210,
 Japan 59, South Korea 14, Netherlands 10, NZ 264, Norway 23, Peru 39,
 Poland NA, South Africa 79, Spain 43, Sweden 10, UK 116, Uruguay NA,
 US 1,666, former USSR 565 (1989-90)
 Winter (July) population: over 1,046 total; Argentina 150, Australia
 71, Brazil 12, Chile 73, China NA, France 33, Germany 19, Greenpeace
 5, India 1, Japan 38, South Korea 14, NZ 11, Poland NA, South Africa
 12, UK 69, Uruguay NA, US 225, former USSR 313 (1989-90)
 Year-round stations: 42 total; Argentina 6, Australia 3, Brazil 1,
 Chile 3, China 2, Finland 1, France 1, Germany 1, India 1, Japan 2,
 South Korea 1, NZ 1, Poland 1, South Africa 3, UK 5, Uruguay 1, US 3,
 former USSR 6 (1990-91)
 Summer only stations: over 38 total; Argentina 7, Australia 3, Chile
 5, Germany 3, India 1, Italy 1, Japan 4, NZ 2, Norway 1, Peru 1, South
 Africa 1, Spain 1, Sweden 2, UK 1, US numerous, former USSR 5
 (1989-90); note - the disintegration of the former USSR has placed the
 status and future of its Antarctic facilities in doubt; stations may
 be subject to closings at any time because of ongoing economic
 difficulties

@Antarctica:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: none
 conventional short form: Antarctica

 Digraph: AY

 Type:
 Antarctic Treaty Summary: The Antarctic Treaty, signed on 1 December
 1959 and entered into force on 23 June 1961, establishes the legal
 framework for the management of Antarctica. Administration is carried
 out through consultative member meetings - the 18th Antarctic Treaty
 Consultative Meeting was in Japan in April 1993. Currently, there are
 42 treaty member nations: 26 consultative and 16 acceding.
 Consultative (voting) members include the seven nations that claim
 portions of Antarctica as national territory (some claims overlap) and
 19 nonclaimant nations. The US and some other nations that have made
 no claims have reserved the right to do so. The US does not recognize
 the claims of others. The year in parentheses indicates when an
 acceding nation was voted to full consultative (voting) status, while
 no date indicates the country was an original 1959 treaty signatory.
 Claimant nations are - Argentina, Australia, Chile, France, New
 Zealand, Norway, and the UK. Nonclaimant consultative nations are -
 Belgium, Brazil (1983), China (1985), Ecuador (1990), Finland (1989),
 Germany (1981), India (1983), Italy (1987), Japan, South Korea (1989),
 Netherlands (1990), Peru (1989), Poland (1977), South Africa, Spain
 (1988), Sweden (1988), Uruguay (1985), the US, and Russia. Acceding
 (nonvoting) members, with year of accession in parentheses, are -
 Austria (1987), Bulgaria (1978), Canada (1988), Colombia (1988), Cuba
 (1984), Czech Republic (1993), Denmark (1965), Greece (1987),
 Guatemala (1991), Hungary (1984), North Korea (1987), Papua New Guinea
 (1981), Romania (1971), Slovakia (1993), Switzerland (1990), and
 Ukraine (1992).
 Article 1: area to be used for peaceful purposes only; military
 activity, such as weapons testing, is prohibited, but military
 personnel and equipment may be used for scientific research or any
 other peaceful purpose
 Article 2: freedom of scientific investigation and cooperation shall
 continue
 Article 3: free exchange of information and personnel in cooperation
 with the UN and other international agencies
 Article 4: does not recognize, dispute, or establish territorial
 claims and no new claims shall be asserted while the treaty is in
 force
 Article 5: prohibits nuclear explosions or disposal of radioactive
 wastes
 Article 6: includes under the treaty all land and ice shelves south of
 60 degrees 00 minutes south
 Article 7: treaty-state observers have free access, including aerial
 observation, to any area and may inspect all stations, installations,
 and equipment; advance notice of all activities and of the
 introduction of military personnel must be given
 Article 8: allows for jurisdiction over observers and scientists by
 their own states
 Article 9: frequent consultative meetings take place among member
 nations
 Article 10: treaty states will discourage activities by any country in
 Antarctica that are contrary to the treaty
 Article 11: disputes to be settled peacefully by the parties concerned
 or, ultimately, by the ICJ
 Articles 12, 13, 14: deal with upholding, interpreting, and amending
 the treaty among involved nations
 Other agreements: more than 170 recommendations adopted at treaty
 consultative meetings and ratified by governments include - Agreed
 Measures for the Conservation of Antarctic Fauna and Flora (1964);
 Convention for the Conservation of Antarctic Seals (1972); Convention
 on the Conservation of Antarctic Marine Living Resources (1980); a
 mineral resources agreement was signed in 1988 but was subsequently
 rejected; in 1991 the Protocol on Environmental Protection to the
 Antarctic Treaty was signed and awaits ratification; this agreement
 provides for the protection of the Antarctic environment through five
 specific annexes on marine pollution, fauna, and flora, environmental
 impact assessments, waste management, and protected areas; it also
 prohibits all activities relating to mineral resources except
 scientific research; 14 parties have ratified Protocol as of April
 1995

 Legal system: US law, including certain criminal offenses by or
 against US nationals, such as murder, may apply to areas not under
 jurisdiction of other countries. Some US laws directly apply to
 Antarctica. For example, the Antarctic Conservation Act, 16 U.S.C.
 section 2401 et seq., provides civil and criminal penalties for the
 following activities, unless authorized by regulation of statute: The
 taking of native mammals or birds; the introduction of nonindigenous
 plants and animals; entry into specially protected or scientific
 areas; the discharge or disposal of pollutants; and the importation
 into the US of certain items from Antarctica. Violation of the
 Antarctic Conservation Act carries penalties of up to $10,000 in fines
 and 1 year in prison. The Departments of Treasury, Commerce,
 Transportation, and Interior share enforcement responsibilities.
 Public Law 95-541, the US Antarctic Conservation Act of 1978, requires
 expeditions from the US to Antarctica to notify, in advance, the
 Office of Oceans and Polar Affairs, Room 5801, Department of State,
 Washington, DC 20520, which reports such plans to other nations as
 required by the Antarctic Treaty. For more information contact Permit
 Office, Office of Polar Programs, National Science Foundation,
 Arlington, Virginia 22230 (703-306-1031).

@Antarctica:Economy

 Overview: No economic activity at present except for fishing off the
 coast and small-scale tourism, both based abroad.

@Antarctica:Transportation

 Ports: none; offshore anchorage

 Airports: 42 landing facilities at different locations operated by 15
 national governments party to the Treaty; one additional air facility
 operated by commercial (nongovernmental) tourist organization;
 helicopter pads at 36 of these locations; runways at 14 locations are
 gravel, sea ice, glacier ice, or compacted snow surface suitable for
 wheeled fixed-wing aircraft; no paved runways; 15 locations have
 snow-surface skiways limited to use by ski-equipped planes - 11
 runways/skiways 1,000 to 3,000 m, 5 runways/skiways less than 1,000 m,
 8 runways/skiways greater than 3,000 m, and 5 of unspecified or
 variable length; airports generally subject to severe restrictions and
 limitations resulting from extreme seasonal and geographic conditions;
 airports do not meet ICAO standards; advance approval from the
 respective governmental or non-governmental operating organization
 required for landing

@Antarctica:Communications

 Telephone system:
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: NA

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM NA, FM NA, shortwave NA
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: NA
 televisions: NA

@Antarctica:Defense Forces

 Note: the Antarctic Treaty prohibits any measures of a military
 nature, such as the establishment of military bases and
 fortifications, the carrying out of military maneuvers, or the testing
 of any type of weapon; it permits the use of military personnel or
 equipment for scientific research or for any other peaceful purposes


________________________________________________________________________

ANTIGUA AND BARBUDA

@Antigua And Barbuda:Geography

 Location: Caribbean, islands between the Caribbean Sea and the North
 Atlantic Ocean, east-southeast of Puerto Rico

 Map references: Central America and the Caribbean

 Area:
 total area: 440 sq km
 land area: 440 sq km
 comparative area: slightly less than 2.5 times the size of Washington,
 DC
 note: includes Redonda

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 153 km

 Maritime claims:
 contiguous zone: 24 nm
 continental shelf: 200 nm or to the edge of the continental margin
 exclusive economic zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: none

 Climate: tropical marine; little seasonal temperature variation

 Terrain: mostly low-lying limestone and coral islands with some higher
 volcanic areas

 Natural resources: negligible; pleasant climate fosters tourism

 Land use:
 arable land: 18%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 7%
 forest and woodland: 16%
 other: 59%

 Irrigated land: NA sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: water management - a major concern because of limited
 natural fresh water resources - is further hampered by the clearing of
 trees to increase crop production, causing rainfall to run off quickly

 natural hazards: hurricanes and tropical storms (July to October);
 periodic droughts
 international agreements: party to - Biodiversity, Climate Change,
 Environmental Modification, Hazardous Wastes, Law of the Sea, Marine
 Dumping, Nuclear Test Ban, Ozone Layer Protection, Ship Pollution,
 Whaling

@Antigua And Barbuda:People

 Population: 65,176 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 25% (female 8,062; male 8,390)
 15-64 years: 69% (female 22,342; male 22,334)
 65 years and over: 6% (female 2,231; male 1,817) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 0.68% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 17.08 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 5.35 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: -4.91 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 17.8 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 73.4 years
 male: 71.32 years
 female: 75.57 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 1.68 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Antiguan(s), Barbudan(s)
 adjective: Antiguan, Barbudan

 Ethnic divisions: black African, British, Portuguese, Lebanese, Syrian

 Religions: Anglican (predominant), other Protestant sects, some Roman
 Catholic

 Languages: English (official), local dialects

 Literacy: age 15 and over has completed five or more years of
 schooling (1960)
 total population: 89%
 male: 90%
 female: 88%

 Labor force: 30,000
 by occupation: commerce and services 82%, agriculture 11%, industry 7%
 (1983)

@Antigua And Barbuda:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: none
 conventional short form: Antigua and Barbuda

 Digraph: AC

 Type: parliamentary democracy

 Capital: Saint John's

 Administrative divisions: 6 parishes and 2 dependencies*; Barbuda*,
 Redonda*, Saint George, Saint John, Saint Mary, Saint Paul, Saint
 Peter, Saint Philip

 Independence: 1 November 1981 (from UK)

 National holiday: Independence Day, 1 November (1981)

 Constitution: 1 November 1981

 Legal system: based on English common law

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: Queen ELIZABETH II (since 6 February 1952),
 represented by Governor General James B. CARLISLE (since NA 1993)
 head of government: Prime Minister Lester Bryant BIRD (since 8 March
 1994)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers; appointed by the governor general on
 the advice of the prime minister

 Legislative branch: bicameral Parliament
 Senate: 17 member body appointed by the governor general
 House of Representatives: elections last held 8 March 1994 (next to be
 held NA 1999); results - percent of vote by party NA; seats - (17
 total) ALP 11, UPP 5, independent 1

 Judicial branch: Eastern Caribbean Supreme Court

 Political parties and leaders: Antigua Labor Party (ALP), Lester
 Bryant BIRD; United Progressive Party (UPP), Baldwin SPENCER

 Other political or pressure groups: United Progressive Party (UPP),
 headed by Baldwin SPENCER, a coalition of three opposition political
 parties - the United National Democratic Party (UNDP); the Antigua
 Caribbean Liberation Movement (ACLM); and the Progressive Labor
 Movement (PLM); Antigua Trades and Labor Union (ATLU), headed by
 William ROBINSON

 Member of: ACP, C, CARICOM, CDB, ECLAC, FAO, G-77, GATT, IBRD, ICAO,
 ICFTU, ICRM, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS (associate), ILO, IMF, IMO, INTELSAT
 (nonsignatory user), INTERPOL, IOC, ISO (subscriber), ITU, NAM
 (observer), OAS, OECS, OPANAL, UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UPU, WCL, WFTU,
 WHO, WMO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Patrick Albert LEWIS
 chancery: 3216 New Mexico Avenue NW, Washington, DC 20016
 telephone: [1] (202) 362-5211, 5166, 5122
 FAX: [1] (202) 362-5225
 consulate(s) general: Miami

 US diplomatic representation: the post was closed 30 June 1994; the US
 Ambassador to Barbados is accredited to Antigua and Barbuda

 Flag: red with an inverted isosceles triangle based on the top edge of
 the flag; the triangle contains three horizontal bands of black (top),
 light blue, and white with a yellow rising sun in the black band

@Antigua And Barbuda:Economy

 Overview: The economy is primarily service oriented, with tourism the
 most important determinant of economic performance. In 1993, tourism
 made a direct contribution to GDP of about 17%, and also spurred
 growth in other sectors such as construction and transport. While only
 accounting for roughly 5% of GDP in 1993, agricultural production
 increased by 4%. Tourist arrivals remained strong in 1994.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $400 million (1993
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 3.4% (1993)

 National product per capita: $6,000 (1993 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 7% (1993)

 Unemployment rate: 6% (1992 est.)

 Budget:
 revenues: $105 million
 expenditures: $161 million, including capital expenditures of $56
 million (1992)

 Exports: $54.7 million (f.o.b., 1992)
 commodities: petroleum products 48%, manufactures 23%, food and live
 animals 4%, machinery and transport equipment 17%
 partners: OECS 26%, Barbados 15%, Guyana 4%, Trinidad and Tobago 2%,
 US 0.3%

 Imports: $260.9 million (f.o.b., 1992)
 commodities: food and live animals, machinery and transport equipment,
 manufactures, chemicals, oil
 partners: US 27%, UK 16%, Canada 4%, OECS 3%, other 50%

 External debt: $250 million (1990 est.)

 Industrial production: growth rate -4.9% (1993 est.); accounts for
 6.5% of GDP

 Electricity:
 capacity: 52,100 kW
 production: 95 million kWh
 consumption per capita: 1,242 kWh (1993)

 Industries: tourism, construction, light manufacturing (clothing,
 alcohol, household appliances)

 Agriculture: accounts for 5% of GDP; expanding output of cotton,
 fruits, vegetables, and livestock; other crops - bananas, coconuts,
 cucumbers, mangoes, sugarcane; not self-sufficient in food

 Illicit drugs: a long-time but relatively minor transshipment point
 for narcotics bound for the US and Europe and recent transshipment
 point for heroin from Europe to the US; more significant as a drug
 money laundering center

 Economic aid:
 recipient: US commitments (1985-88), $10 million; Western (non-US)
 countries, ODA and OOF bilateral commitments (1970-89), $50 million

 Currency: 1 EC dollar (EC$) = 100 cents

 Exchange rates: East Caribbean dollars (EC$) per US$1 - 2.70 (fixed
 rate since 1976)

 Fiscal year: 1 April - 31 March

@Antigua And Barbuda:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 77 km
 narrow gauge: 64 km 0.760-m gauge; 13 km 0.610-m gauge (used almost
 exclusively for handling sugar cane)

 Highways:
 total: 240 km
 paved: NA
 unpaved: NA

 Ports: Saint John's

 Merchant marine:
 total: 304 ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 1,188,113 GRT/1,651,190
 DWT
 ships by type: bulk 7, cargo 216, chemical tanker 8, container 48,
 liquefied gas tanker 3, oil tanker 1, refrigerated cargo 10,
 roll-on/roll-off cargo 11
 note: a flag of convenience registry

 Airports:
 total: 3
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 1
 with paved runways under 914 m: 2

@Antigua And Barbuda:Communications

 Telephone system: 6,700 telephones; good automatic telephone system
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: 1 coaxial submarine cable; 1 INTELSAT (Atlantic Ocean)
 earth station; tropospheric scatter links with Saba and Guadeloupe

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 4, FM 2, shortwave 2
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 2
 televisions: NA

@Antigua And Barbuda:Defense Forces

 Branches: Royal Antigua and Barbuda Defense Force, Royal Antigua and
 Barbuda Police Force (includes the Coast Guard)

 Defense expenditures: exchange rate conversion - $1.4 million, 1% of
 GDP (FY90/91)


________________________________________________________________________

ARCTIC OCEAN

@Arctic Ocean:Geography

 Location: body of water mostly north of the Arctic Circle

 Map references: Arctic Region

 Area:
 total area: 14.056 million sq km
 comparative area: slightly more than 1.5 times the size of the US;
 smallest of the world's four oceans (after Pacific Ocean, Atlantic
 Ocean, and Indian Ocean)
 note: includes Baffin Bay, Barents Sea, Beaufort Sea, Chukchi Sea,
 East Siberian Sea, Greenland Sea, Hudson Bay, Hudson Strait, Kara Sea,
 Laptev Sea, Northwest Passage, and other tributary water bodies

 Coastline: 45,389 km

 International disputes: some maritime disputes (see littoral states);
 Svalbard is the focus of a maritime boundary dispute between Norway
 and Russia

 Climate: polar climate characterized by persistent cold and relatively
 narrow annual temperature ranges; winters characterized by continuous
 darkness, cold and stable weather conditions, and clear skies; summers
 characterized by continuous daylight, damp and foggy weather, and weak
 cyclones with rain or snow

 Terrain: central surface covered by a perennial drifting polar icepack
 that averages about 3 meters in thickness, although pressure ridges
 may be three times that size; clockwise drift pattern in the Beaufort
 Gyral Stream, but nearly straight line movement from the New Siberian
 Islands (Russia) to Denmark Strait (between Greenland and Iceland);
 the ice pack is surrounded by open seas during the summer, but more
 than doubles in size during the winter and extends to the encircling
 land masses; the ocean floor is about 50% continental shelf (highest
 percentage of any ocean) with the remainder a central basin
 interrupted by three submarine ridges (Alpha Cordillera, Nansen
 Cordillera, and Lomonsov Ridge); maximum depth is 4,665 meters in the
 Fram Basin

 Natural resources: sand and gravel aggregates, placer deposits,
 polymetallic nodules, oil and gas fields, fish, marine mammals (seals
 and whales)

 Environment:
 current issues: endangered marine species include walruses and whales;
 fragile ecosystem slow to change and slow to recover from disruptions
 or damage
 natural hazards: ice islands occasionally break away from northern
 Ellesmere Island; icebergs calved from glaciers in western Greenland
 and extreme northeastern Canada; permafrost in islands; virtually
 icelocked from October to June; ships subject to superstructure icing
 from October to May
 international agreements: NA

 Note: major chokepoint is the southern Chukchi Sea (northern access to
 the Pacific Ocean via the Bering Strait); strategic location between
 North America and Russia; shortest marine link between the extremes of
 eastern and western Russia, floating research stations operated by the
 US and Russia; maximum snow cover in March or April about 20 to 50
 centimeters over the frozen ocean and lasts about 10 months

@Arctic Ocean:Government

 Digraph: XQ

@Arctic Ocean:Economy

 Overview: Economic activity is limited to the exploitation of natural
 resources, including petroleum, natural gas, fish, and seals.

@Arctic Ocean:Transportation

 Ports: Churchill (Canada), Murmansk (Russia), Prudhoe Bay (US)

 Note: sparse network of air, ocean, river, and land routes; the
 Northwest Passage (North America) and Northern Sea Route (Eurasia) are
 important seasonal waterways

@Arctic Ocean:Communications

 Telephone system:
 international: no submarine cables

________________________________________________________________________

ARGENTINA

@Argentina:Geography

 Location: Southern South America, bordering the South Atlantic Ocean,
 between Chile and Uruguay

 Map references: South America

 Area:
 total area: 2,766,890 sq km
 land area: 2,736,690 sq km
 comparative area: slightly less than three-tenths the size of the US

 Land boundaries: total 9,665 km, Bolivia 832 km, Brazil 1,224 km,
 Chile 5,150 km, Paraguay 1,880 km, Uruguay 579 km

 Coastline: 4,989 km

 Maritime claims:
 contiguous zone: 24 nm
 continental shelf: 200 nm or to the edge of the continental margin
 exclusive economic zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: short section of the boundary with Uruguay is
 in dispute; short section of the boundary with Chile is indefinite;
 claims British-administered Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas); claims
 British-administered South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands;
 territorial claim in Antarctica

 Climate: mostly temperate; arid in southeast; subantarctic in
 southwest

 Terrain: rich plains of the Pampas in northern half, flat to rolling
 plateau of Patagonia in south, rugged Andes along western border

 Natural resources: fertile plains of the pampas, lead, zinc, tin,
 copper, iron ore, manganese, petroleum, uranium

 Land use:
 arable land: 9%
 permanent crops: 4%
 meadows and pastures: 52%
 forest and woodland: 22%
 other: 13%

 Irrigated land: 17,600 sq km (1989 est.)

 Environment:
 current issues: erosion results from inadequate flood controls and
 improper land use practices; irrigated soil degradation;
 desertification; air pollution in Buenos Aires and other major cites;
 water pollution in urban areas; rivers becoming polluted due to
 increased pesticide and fertilizer use
 natural hazards: Tucuman and Mendoza areas in the Andes subject to
 earthquakes; pamperos are violent windstorms that can strike the
 Pampas and northeast; heavy flooding
 international agreements: party to - Antarctic-Environmental Protocol,
 Antarctic Treaty, Biodiversity, Climate Change, Endangered Species,
 Environmental Modification, Hazardous Wastes, Marine Dumping, Nuclear
 Test Ban, Ozone Layer Protection, Ship Pollution, Wetlands, Whaling;
 signed, but not ratified - Desertification, Law of the Sea, Marine
 Life Conservation

 Note: second-largest country in South America (after Brazil);
 strategic location relative to sea lanes between South Atlantic and
 South Pacific Oceans (Strait of Magellan, Beagle Channel, Drake
 Passage)

@Argentina:People

 Population: 34,292,742 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 28% (female 4,706,793; male 4,903,589)
 15-64 years: 62% (female 10,680,074; male 10,689,728)
 65 years and over: 10% (female 1,922,552; male 1,390,006) (July 1995
 est.)

 Population growth rate: 1.11% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 19.51 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 8.62 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: 0.19 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 28.8 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 71.51 years
 male: 68.22 years
 female: 74.97 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 2.65 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Argentine(s)
 adjective: Argentine

 Ethnic divisions: white 85%, mestizo, Indian, or other nonwhite groups
 15%

 Religions: nominally Roman Catholic 90% (less than 20% practicing),
 Protestant 2%, Jewish 2%, other 6%

 Languages: Spanish (official), English, Italian, German, French

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1990 est.)
 total population: 95%
 male: 96%
 female: 95%

 Labor force: 10.9 million
 by occupation: agriculture 12%, industry 31%, services 57% (1985 est.)

@Argentina:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Argentine Republic
 conventional short form: Argentina
 local long form: Republica Argentina
 local short form: Argentina

 Digraph: AR

 Type: republic

 Capital: Buenos Aires

 Administrative divisions: 23 provinces (provincias, singular -
 provincia), and 1 federal district* (distrito federal); Buenos Aires;
 Catamarca; Chaco; Chubut; Cordoba; Corrientes; Distrito Federal*;
 Entre Rios; Formosa; Jujuy; La Pampa; La Rioja; Mendoza; Misiones;
 Neuquen; Rio Negro; Salta; San Juan; San Luis; Santa Cruz; Santa Fe;
 Santiago del Estero; Tierra del Fuego, Antartida e Islas del Atlantico
 Sur; Tucuman
 note: the US does not recognize any claims to Antarctica or
 Argentina's claims to the Falkland Islands

 Independence: 9 July 1816 (from Spain)

 National holiday: Revolution Day, 25 May (1810)

 Constitution: 1 May 1853; revised August 1994

 Legal system: mixture of US and West European legal systems; has not
 accepted compulsory ICJ jurisdiction

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state and head of government: President Carlos Saul MENEM
 (since 8 July 1989); Vice President (position vacant); election last
 held 14 May 1995 (next to be held NA May 1999); results - Carlos Saul
 MENEM was reelected
 cabinet: Cabinet; appointed by the president

 Legislative branch: bicameral National Congress (Congreso Nacional)
 Senate: elections last held May 1989, but provincial elections in late
 1991 set the stage for indirect elections by provincial senators for
 one-third of 48 seats in the national senate in May 1992; seats (48
 total) - PJ 29, UCR 11, others 7, vacant 1
 Chamber of Deputies: elections last held 3 October 1993 ( next to be
 held October 1995); elections are held every two years and half of the
 total membership is elected each time for four year terms; seats -
 (257 total) PJ 122, UCR 83, MODIN 7, UCD 5, other 40

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court (Corte Suprema)

 Political parties and leaders: Justicialist Party (PJ), Carlos Saul
 MENEM, Peronist umbrella political organization; Radical Civic Union
 (UCR),Raul ALFONSIN, moderately left-of-center party; Union of the
 Democratic Center (UCD), Jorge AGUADO, conservative party; Dignity and
 Independence Political Party (MODIN), Aldo RICO, right-wing party;
 Grand Front (Frente Grande), Carlos ALVAREZ, center-left coalition;
 several provincial parties

 Other political or pressure groups: Peronist-dominated labor movement;
 General Confederation of Labor (CGT; Peronist-leaning umbrella labor
 organization); Argentine Industrial Union (manufacturers'
 association); Argentine Rural Society (large landowners' association);
 business organizations; students; the Roman Catholic Church; the Armed
 Forces

 Member of: AfDB, AG (observer), Australia Group, BCIE, CCC, ECLAC,
 FAO, G- 6, G-11, G-15, G-19, G-24, G-77, GATT, IADB, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO,
 ICC, ICFTU, ICRM, IDA, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, IMO, INMARSAT,
 INTELSAT, INTERPOL, IOC, IOM, ISO, ITU, LAES, LAIA, MERCOSUR, MINURSO,
 MTCR, NSG (observer), OAS, ONUSAL, OPANAL, PCA, RG, UN, UNAVEM II,
 UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNFICYP, UNHCR, UNIDO, UNIKOM, UNITAR, UNMIH, UNOMOZ,
 UNPROFOR, UNTSO, UNU, UPU, WCL, WFTU, WHO, WIPO, WMO, WTO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Raul Enrique GRANILLO OCAMPO
 chancery: 1600 New Hampshire Avenue NW, Washington, DC 20009
 telephone: [1] (202) 939-6400 through 6403
 consulate(s) general: Atlanta, Chicago, Houston, Los Angeles, Miami,
 New Orleans, New York, San Francisco, and San Juan (Puerto Rico)

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador James R. CHEEK
 embassy: 4300 Colombia, 1425 Buenos Aires
 mailing address: Unit 4334; APO AA 34034
 telephone: [54] (1) 777-4533, 4534
 FAX: [54] (1) 777-0197

 Flag: three equal horizontal bands of light blue (top), white, and
 light blue; centered in the white band is a radiant yellow sun with a
 human face known as the Sun of May

@Argentina:Economy

 Overview: Argentina, rich in natural resources, benefits also from a
 highly literate population, an export-oriented agricultural sector,
 and a diversified industrial base. Nevertheless, following decades of
 mismanagement and statist policies, the economy in the late 1980s was
 plagued with huge external debts and recurring bouts of
 hyperinflation. Elected in 1989, in the depths of recession, President
 MENEM has implemented a comprehensive economic restructuring program
 that shows signs of putting Argentina on a path of stable, sustainable
 growth. Argentina's currency has traded at par with the US dollar
 since April 1991, and inflation has fallen to its lowest level in 20
 years. Argentines have responded to the relative price stability by
 repatriating flight capital and investing in domestic industry. The
 economy registered an impressive 6% advance in 1994, fueled largely by
 inflows of foreign capital and strong domestic consumption spending.
 The government's major short term objective is encouraging exports,
 e.g., by reducing domestic costs of production. At the start of 1995,
 the government had to deal with the spillover from international
 financial movements associated with the devaluation of the Mexican
 peso. In addition, unemployment had become a serious issue for the
 government. Despite average annual 7% growth in 1991-94, unemployment
 surprisingly has doubled - due mostly to layoffs in government bureaus
 and in privatized industrial firms and utilities and, to a lesser
 degree, to illegal immigration. Much remains to be done in the 1990s
 in dismantling the old statist barriers to growth, extending the
 recent economic gains, and bringing down the rate of unemployment.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $270.8 billion (1994
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 6% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $7,990 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 3.9% (1994 est.)

 Unemployment rate: 12% (1994 est.)

 Budget:
 revenues: $48.46 billion
 expenditures: $46.5 billion, including capital expenditures of $3.5
 billion (1994 est.)

 Exports: $15.7 billion (f.o.b., 1994 est.)
 commodities: meat, wheat, corn, oilseed, manufactures
 partners: US 12%, Brazil, Italy, Japan, Netherlands

 Imports: $21.4 billion (c.i.f., 1994 est.)
 commodities: machinery and equipment, chemicals, metals, fuels and
 lubricants, agricultural products
 partners: US 22%, Brazil, Germany, Bolivia, Japan, Italy, Netherlands

 External debt: $73 billion (April 1994)

 Industrial production: growth rate 12.5% accounts for 31% of GDP (1994
 est.)

 Electricity:
 capacity: 17,330,000 kW
 production: 54.8 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 1,610 kWh (1993)

 Industries: food processing, motor vehicles, consumer durables,
 textiles, chemicals and petrochemicals, printing, metallurgy, steel

 Agriculture: accounts for 8% of GDP (including fishing); produces
 abundant food for both domestic consumption and exports; among world's
 top five exporters of grain and beef; principal crops - wheat, corn,
 sorghum, soybeans, sugar beets

 Illicit drugs: increasing use as a transshipment country for cocaine
 headed for the US and Europe

 Economic aid:
 recipient: US commitments, including Ex-Im (FY70-89), $1 billion;
 Western (non-US) countries, ODA and OOF bilateral commitments
 (1970-89), $4.4 billion; Communist countries (1970-89), $718 million

 Currency: 1 nuevo peso argentino = 100 centavos

 Exchange rates: pesos per US$1 - 0.99870 (December 1994), 0.99901
 (1994), 0.99895 (1993), 0.99064 (1992), 0.95355 (1991), 0.48759 (1990)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Argentina:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 34,572 km
 broad gauge: NA km 1.676-m gauge
 standard gauge: NA km 1.435-m
 narrow gauge: 400 km 0.750-m gauge; NA km 1.000-m gauge (209 km
 electrified)

 Highways:
 total: 208,350 km
 paved: 57,000 km
 unpaved: gravel 39,500 km; improved/unimproved earth 111,850 km

 Inland waterways: 11,000 km navigable

 Pipelines: crude oil 4,090 km; petroleum products 2,900 km; natural
 gas 9,918 km

 Ports: Bahia Blanca, Buenos Aires, Comodoro Rivadavia, Concepcion del
 Uruguay, La Plata, Mar del Plata, Necochea, Rio Gallegos, Rosario,
 Santa Fe, Ushuaia

 Merchant marine:
 total: 44 ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 434,525 GRT/667,501 DWT
 ships by type: bulk 3, cargo 21, chemical tanker 1, container 4, oil
 tanker 8, railcar carrier 1, refrigerated cargo 5, roll-on/roll-off
 cargo 1

 Airports:
 total: 1,602
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 5
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 25
 with paved runways 1,524 to 2,437 m: 55
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 48
 with paved runways under 914 m: 703
 with unpaved runways over 3,047 m: 2
 with unpaved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 1
 with unpaved runways 1,524 to 2,438 m: 70
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 693

@Argentina:Communications

 Telephone system: 2,650,000 telephones; 12,000 public telephones; 78
 telephones/1,000 persons; extensive modern system but many families do
 not have telephones; microwave widely used; however, during
 rainstorms, the telephone system frequently grounds out, even in
 Buenos Aires
 local: NA
 intercity: microwave radio relay and domestic satellite network with
 40 earth stations
 international: 2 INTELSAT (Atlantic Ocean) earth stations

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 171, FM 0, shortwave 13
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 231
 televisions: NA

@Argentina:Defense Forces

 Branches: Argentine Army, Navy of the Argentine Republic, Argentine
 Air Force, National Gendarmerie, Argentine Naval Prefecture (Coast
 Guard only), National Aeronautical Police Force

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 8,573,780; males fit for
 military service 6,954,584; males reach military age (20) annually
 301,166 (1995 est.)

 Defense expenditures: $NA, NA% of GDP


________________________________________________________________________

ARMENIA

@Armenia:Geography

 Location: Southwestern Asia, east of Turkey

 Map references: Commonwealth of Independent States - European States

 Area:
 total area: 29,800 sq km
 land area: 28,400 sq km
 comparative area: slightly larger than Maryland

 Land boundaries: total 1,254 km, Azerbaijan (east) 566 km, Azerbaijan
 (south) 221 km, Georgia 164 km, Iran 35 km, Turkey 268 km

 Coastline: 0 km (landlocked)

 Maritime claims: none; landlocked

 International disputes: supports ethnic Armenians in Nagorno-Karabakh
 in their separatist conflict against the Azerbaijani government;
 traditional demands on former Armenian lands in Turkey have subsided

 Climate: highland continental, hot summers, cold winters

 Terrain: high Armenian Plateau with mountains; little forest land;
 fast flowing rivers; good soil in Aras River valley

 Natural resources: small deposits of gold, copper, molybdenum, zinc,
 alumina

 Land use:
 arable land: 17%
 permanent crops: 3%
 meadows and pastures: 20%
 forest and woodland: 0%
 other: 60%

 Irrigated land: 3,050 sq km (1990)

 Environment:
 current issues: soil pollution from toxic chemicals such as DDT;
 energy blockade, the result of conflict with Azerbaijan, has led to
 deforestation as citizens scavenge for firewood; pollution of Hrazdan
 (Razdan) and Aras Rivers; the draining of Sevana Lich, a result of its
 use as a source for hydropower, threatens drinking water supplies
 natural hazards: occasionally severe earthquakes; droughts
 international agreements: party to - Biodiversity, Climate Change,
 Nuclear Test Ban, Wetlands; signed, but not ratified - Desertification

 Note: landlocked

@Armenia:People

 Population: 3,557,284 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 31% (female 542,664; male 570,998)
 15-64 years: 61% (female 1,103,171; male 1,076,226)
 65 years and over: 8% (female 154,784; male 109,441) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 0.94% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 22.79 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 6.66 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: -6.68 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 26 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 72.36 years
 male: 68.94 years
 female: 75.95 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 3.06 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Armenian(s)
 adjective: Armenian

 Ethnic divisions: Armenian 93%, Azeri 3%, Russian 2%, other (mostly
 Yezidi Kurds) 2% (1989)
 note: as of the end of 1994, most Azeris had emigrated from Armenia

 Religions: Armenian Orthodox 94%

 Languages: Armenian 96%, Russian 2%, other 2%

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1989)
 total population: 99%
 male: 99%
 female: 98%

 Labor force: 1.578 million
 by occupation: industry and construction 34%, agriculture and forestry
 31%, other 35% (1992)

@Armenia:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Republic of Armenia
 conventional short form: Armenia
 local long form: Hayastani Hanrapetut'yun
 local short form: Hayastan
 former: Armenian Soviet Socialist Republic; Armenian Republic

 Digraph: AM

 Type: republic

 Capital: Yerevan

 Administrative divisions: 37 regions (shrjanner, singular - shrjan)
 and 23 cities* (kaghakner, singular - kaghak); Abovyan*, Akhuryani
 Shrjan, Alaverdi*, Amasiayi Shrjan, Anii Shrjan, Aparani Shrjan,
 Aragatsi Shrjan, Ararat*, Ararati Shrjan, Armaviri Shrjan, Artashat*,
 Artashati Shrjan, Art'ik*, Art'iki Shrjan, Ashots'k'i Shrjan,
 Ashtarak*, Ashtaraki Shrjan, Baghramyani Shrjan, Ch'arents'avan*,
 Dilijan*, Ejmiatsin*, Ejmiatsni Shrjan, Goris*, Gorisi Shrjan,
 Gugark'i Shrjan, Gyumri*, Hoktemberyan*, Hrazdan*, Hrazdani Shrjan,
 Ijevan*, Ijevani Shrjan, Jermuk*, Kamo*, Kamoyi Shrjan, Kapan*, Kapani
 Shrjan, Kotayk'i Shrjan, Krasnoselski Shrjan, Martunu Shrjan, Masisi
 Shrjan, Meghru Shrjan, Metsamor*, Nairii Shrjan, Noyemberyani Shrjan,
 Sevan*, Sevani Shrjan, Sisiani Shrjan, Spitak*, Spitaki Shrjan,
 Step'anavan*, Step'anavani Shrjan, T'alini Shrjan, Tashiri Shrjan,
 Taushi Shrjan, T'umanyani Shrjan, Vanadzor*, Vardenisi Shrjan, Vayk'i
 Shrjan, Yeghegnadzori Shrjan, Yerevan*

 Independence: 28 May 1918 (First Armenian Republic); 23 September 1991
 (from Soviet Union)

 National holiday: Referendum Day, 21 September

 Constitution: adopted NA April 1978; referendum on new constitution to
 be held 5 July 1995

 Legal system: based on civil law system

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: President Levon Akopovich TER-PETROSYAN (since October
 1991) election last held 16 October 1991 (next to be held NA 1996);
 results - Levon Akopovich TER-PETROSYAN 86%; radical nationalists
 about 7%; note - Levon Akopovich TER-PETROSYAN was elected Chairman of
 the Armenian Supreme Soviet 4 August 1990 before becoming president
 head of government: Prime Minister Hrant BAGRATYAN (since 16 February
 1993); First Deputy Prime Minister Vigen CHITECHYAN (since 16 February
 1993)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers; appointed by the president

 Legislative branch: unicameral
 Supreme Soviet: elections last held 20 May 1990 (next to be held 5
 July 1995); results - percent of vote by party NA; seats - (260 total)
 non-aligned 136, ANM 52, DPA 17, Democratic Liberal Party 17, ARF 12,
 NDU 9, Christian Democratic Party 1, Constitutional Rights Union 1,
 ONS 1, Republican Party 1, Nagorno-Karabakh representatives 13

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court

 Political parties and leaders: Armenian National Movement (ANM),
 Ter-Husik LAZARYAN, chairman; National Democratic Union (NDU), David
 VARTANYAN, chairman; Armenian Revolutionary Federation (ARF,
 Dashnaktsutyun); note - banned until reorganized; Democratic Party of
 Armenia (DPA; Communist Party), Aram SARKISYAN, chairman; Christian
 Democratic Party, Azat ARSHAKYAN, chairman; Greens Party, Hakob
 SANASARIAN, chairman; Democratic Liberal Party, Rouben MIRZAKHANYAN,
 chairman; Republican Party, Ashot NAVARSARDYAN, chairman; Union for
 Self-Determination (ONS), Paruir AIRIKYAN, chairman

 Member of: BSEC, CCC, CIS, EBRD, ECE, ESCAP, FAO, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO,
 IDA, IFAD, ILO, IMF, INTELSAT, INTERPOL, IOC, IOM, ITU, NACC, NAM
 (observer), OSCE, PFP, UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNIDO, UPU, WHO, WIPO, WMO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Ruben SHUGARIAN
 chancery: Suite 210, 1660 L Street NW, Washington, DC 20036
 telephone: [1] (202) 628-5766
 FAX: [1] (202) 628-5769

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Harry J. GILMORE
 embassy: 18 Gen Bagramian, Yerevan
 mailing address: use embassy street address
 telephone: [7] (8852) 151-144, 524-661
 FAX: [7] (8852) 151-138

 Flag: three equal horizontal bands of red (top), blue, and gold

@Armenia:Economy

 Overview: Under the old Soviet central planning system, Armenia had
 developed a more modern industrial sector, supplying machine building
 equipment, textiles, and other manufactured goods to sister republics
 in exchange for raw materials and energy resources. Armenia is a large
 food importer and its mineral deposits (gold, bauxite) are small. The
 economic decline in recent years (1991-94) has been particularly
 severe due to the ongoing conflict over the ethnic Armenian-dominated
 region of Nagorno-Karabakh in Azerbaijan. Azerbaijan and Turkey have
 blockaded pipeline and railroad traffic to Armenia for its support of
 the Karabakh Armenians. This has left Armenia with chronic energy
 shortages because of a lack of capacity and frequent disruptions of
 natural gas deliveries through unstable Georgia, as well as
 difficulties in obtaining other types of fuel. In addition, bread is
 strictly rationed and there are shortages of other goods. In 1994, the
 economy seemed to bottom out. The government has managed to increase
 its financial and budgetary discipline, bringing inflation down from
 around 40% per month in first half 1994 to single digits in second
 half 1994 and the first quarter of 1995. A full economic recovery
 cannot be expected until the conflict is settled and the blockade
 lifted.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $8.1 billion (1994
 estimate as extrapolated from World Bank estimate for 1992)

 National product real growth rate: -2% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $2,290 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 27% per month average (1994 est.)

 Unemployment rate: 6.5% of officially registered unemployed but large
 numbers of underemployed (1994 est.)

 Budget:
 revenues: $NA
 expenditures: $NA, including capital expenditures of $NA

 Exports: $43 million to countries outside the FSU (f.o.b., 1994)
 commodities: gold and jewelry, aluminum, transport equipment,
 electrical equipment
 partners: Iran, Russia, Turkmenistan, Georgia

 Imports: $120 million from countries outside the FSU (c.i.f., 1994)
 commodities: grain, other foods, fuel, other energy
 partners: Iran, Russia, Turkmenistan, Georgia, US, EU

 External debt: $NA

 Industrial production: growth rate 7% (1994 est.); accounts for 41% of
 GDP

 Electricity:
 capacity: 4,620,000 kW
 production: 5.7 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 1,620 kWh (1994)

 Industries: traditionally diverse, including (as a percent of output
 of former USSR) metalcutting machine tools (5.5%), forging-pressing
 machines (1.9%), electric motors (9%), tires (1.5%), knitted wear
 (4.4%), hosiery (3.0%), shoes (2.2%), silk fabric (0.8%), washing
 machines (2.0%), chemicals, trucks, watches, instruments, and
 microelectronics (1990); currently, much of industry is shut down

 Agriculture: only 17% of land area is arable; employs 31% of labor
 force as residents increasingly turn to subsistence agriculture;
 fruits (especially grapes) and vegetable farming, minor livestock
 sector; vineyards near Yerevan are famous for brandy and other
 liqueurs

 Illicit drugs: illicit cultivator of cannabis mostly for domestic
 consumption; used as a transshipment point for illicit drugs to
 Western Europe

 Economic aid:
 recipient: considerable humanitarian aid, mostly food and energy
 products, from US and EU; Russia granted 60 billion rubles in
 technical credits in late 1994 and approved a 110 billion ruble credit
 almost half of which was to go toward the restart of the Metsamor
 nuclear power plant

 Currency: 1 dram = 100 luma (introduced new currency in November 1993)

 Exchange rates: dram per US$1 - 406 (end December 1994)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Armenia:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 840 km in common carrier service; does not include industrial
 lines
 broad gauge: 840 km 1.520-m gauge (1990)

 Highways:
 total: 11,300 km
 paved: 10,500 km
 unpaved: earth 800 km (1990)

 Inland waterways: NA km

 Pipelines: natural gas 900 km (1991)

 Ports: none

 Airports:
 total: 11
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 2
 with paved runways 1,524 to 2,437 m: 1
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 2
 with unpaved runways 1,524 to 2,438 m: 2
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 3
 with unpaved runways under 914 m: 1

@Armenia:Communications

 Telephone system: about 650,000 telephones; 177 telephones/1,000
 persons; progress on installation of fiber optic cable and
 construction of facilities for mobile cellular phone service remains
 in the negotiation phase for joint venture agreement
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: international connections to other former republics of
 the USSR are by landline or microwave and to other countries by
 satellite and by leased connection through the Moscow international
 gateway switch; 1 INTELSAT satellite link

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM NA, FM NA, shortwave NA
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: NA; note - 100% of population receives Armenian
 and Russian TV programs
 televisions: NA

@Armenia:Defense Forces

 Branches: Army, Air and Air Defense Forces, National Guard, Security
 Forces (internal and border troops)

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 877,414; males fit for military
 service 699,167; males reach military age (18) annually 28,634 (1995
 est.)

 Defense expenditures: 250 million rubles, NA% of GDP (1992 est.); note
 - conversion of the military budget into US dollars using the current
 exchange rate could produce misleading results


________________________________________________________________________

ARUBA

 (part of the Dutch realm)

@Aruba:Geography

 Location: Caribbean, island in the Caribbean Sea, north of Venezuela

 Map references: Central America and the Caribbean

 Area:
 total area: 193 sq km
 land area: 193 sq km
 comparative area: slightly larger than Washington, DC

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 68.5 km

 Maritime claims:
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: none

 Climate: tropical marine; little seasonal temperature variation

 Terrain: flat with a few hills; scant vegetation

 Natural resources: negligible; white sandy beaches

 Land use:
 arable land: 0%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 0%
 forest and woodland: 0%
 other: 100%

 Irrigated land: NA sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: NA
 natural hazards: lies outside the Caribbean hurricane belt
 international agreements: NA

@Aruba:People

 Population: 65,974 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 23% (female 7,377; male 7,726)
 15-64 years: 69% (female 24,269; male 21,141)
 65 years and over: 8% (female 3,223; male 2,238) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 0.65% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 14.6 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 6.17 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: -1.91 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 8.3 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 76.56 years
 male: 72.89 years
 female: 80.42 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 1.82 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Aruban(s)
 adjective: Aruban

 Ethnic divisions: mixed European/Caribbean Indian 80%

 Religions: Roman Catholic 82%, Protestant 8%, Hindu, Muslim,
 Confucian, Jewish

 Languages: Dutch (official), Papiamento (a Spanish, Portuguese, Dutch,
 English dialect), English (widely spoken), Spanish

 Literacy: NA%

 Labor force: NA
 by occupation: most employment is in the tourist industry (1995)

@Aruba:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: none
 conventional short form: Aruba

 Digraph: AA

 Type: part of the Dutch realm; full autonomy in internal affairs
 obtained in 1986 upon separation from the Netherlands Antilles

 Capital: Oranjestad

 Administrative divisions: none (self-governing part of the
 Netherlands)

 Independence: none (part of the Dutch realm; in 1990, Aruba requested
 and received from the Netherlands cancellation of the agreement to
 automatically give independence to the island in 1996)

 National holiday: Flag Day, 18 March

 Constitution: 1 January 1986

 Legal system: based on Dutch civil law system, with some English
 common law influence

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: Queen BEATRIX Wilhelmina Armgard (since 30 April
 1980), represented by Governor General Olindo KOOLMAN (since 1 January
 1992)
 head of government: Prime Minister Jan (Henny) H. EMAN (since 29 July
 1994)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers; appointed with the advice and approval
 of the legislature

 Legislative branch: unicameral
 Legislature (Staten): elections last held 29 July 1994 (next to be
 held by NA July 1998); results - percent of vote by party NA; seats -
 (21 total) AVP 10, MEP 9, OLA 2

 Judicial branch: Joint High Court of Justice

 Political parties and leaders: Electoral Movement Party (MEP), Nelson
 ODUBER; Aruban People's Party (AVP), Jan (Henny) H. EMAN; National
 Democratic Action (ADN), Pedro Charro KELLY; New Patriotic Party
 (PPN), Eddy WERLEMEN; Aruban Patriotic Party (PPA), Benny NISBET;
 Aruban Democratic Party (PDA), Leo BERLINSKI; Democratic Action '86
 (AD '86), Arturo ODUBER; Organization for Aruban Liberty (OLA),
 Glenbert CROES
 note: governing coalition includes the MEP, PPA, and ADN

 Member of: ECLAC (associate), INTERPOL, IOC, UNESCO (associate), WCL,
 WTO (associate)

 Diplomatic representation in US: none (self-governing part of the
 Netherlands)

 US diplomatic representation: none (self-governing part of the
 Netherlands)

 Flag: blue with two narrow horizontal yellow stripes across the lower
 portion and a red, four-pointed star outlined in white in the upper
 hoist-side corner

@Aruba:Economy

 Overview: Tourism is the mainstay of the Aruban economy, although
 offshore banking and oil refining and storage are also important. The
 rapid growth of the tourism sector over the last decade has resulted
 in a substantial expansion of other activities. Construction has
 boomed, with hotel capacity five times the 1985 level. Additionally,
 the reopening of the country's oil refinery in 1993, a major source of
 employment and foreign exchange earnings, has further spurred growth.
 Aruba's small labor force and less than 1% unemployment rate have led
 to a large number of unfilled job vacancies despite sharp rises in
 wage rates in recent years.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $1.1 billion (1993
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 5% (1993 est.)

 National product per capita: $17,000 (1993 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 7% (1994 est.)

 Unemployment rate: 0.6% (1992)

 Budget:
 revenues: $145 million
 expenditures: $185 million, including capital expenditures of $42
 million (1988)

 Exports: $1.3 billion (including oil re-exports) (f.o.b., 1993 est.)
 commodities: mostly refined petroleum products
 partners: US 64%, EC

 Imports: $1.6 billion (f.o.b., 1993 est.)
 commodities: food, consumer goods, manufactures, petroleum products,
 crude oil for refining and re-export
 partners: US 8%, EC

 External debt: $81 million (1987)

 Industrial production: growth rate NA%

 Electricity:
 capacity: 90,000 kW
 production: 330 million kWh
 consumption per capita: 4,761 kWh (1993)

 Industries: tourism, transshipment facilities, oil refining

 Agriculture: poor quality soils and low rainfall limit agricultural
 activity to the cultivation of aloes, some livestock, and fishing

 Illicit drugs: drug money laundering center and transit point for
 narcotics bound for the US and Europe

 Economic aid:
 recipient: Western (non-US) countries ODA and OOF bilateral
 commitments (1980-89), $220 million

 Currency: 1 Aruban florin (Af.) = 100 cents

 Exchange rates: Aruban florins (Af.) per US$1 - 1.7900 (fixed rate
 since 1986)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Aruba:Transportation

 Railroads: 0 km

 Highways:
 total: NA
 paved: NA
 unpaved: NA

 Ports: Barcadera, Oranjestad, Sint Nicolaas

 Merchant marine: none

 Airports:
 total: 2
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 1
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 1
 note: government-owned airport east of Oranjestad accepts
 transatlantic flights

@Aruba:Communications

 Telephone system: 72,168 telephones; 1,100 telephones/1,000 persons;
 more than adequate
 local: NA
 intercity: extensive interisland microwave radio relay links
 international: 1 submarine cable to Sint Maarten

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 4, FM 4, shortwave 0
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 1
 televisions: NA

@Aruba:Defense Forces

 Note: defense is the responsibility of the Netherlands


________________________________________________________________________

ASHMORE AND CARTIER ISLANDS

 (territory of Australia)

@Ashmore And Cartier Islands:Geography

 Location: Southeastern Asia, islands in the Indian Ocean, northwest of
 Australia

 Map references: Southeast Asia

 Area:
 total area: 5 sq km
 land area: 5 sq km
 comparative area: about 8.5 times the size of The Mall in Washington,
 DC
 note: includes Ashmore Reef (West, Middle, and East Islets) and
 Cartier Island

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 74.1 km

 Maritime claims:
 contiguous zone: 12 nm
 continental shelf: 200-m depth or to depth of exploitation
 exclusive fishing zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 3 nm

 International disputes: none

 Climate: tropical

 Terrain: low with sand and coral

 Natural resources: fish

 Land use:
 arable land: 0%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 0%
 forest and woodland: 0%
 other: 100% (all grass and sand)

 Irrigated land: 0 sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: NA
 natural hazards: surrounded by shoals and reefs which can pose
 maritime hazards
 international agreements: NA

 Note: Ashmore Reef National Nature Reserve established in August 1983

@Ashmore And Cartier Islands:People

 Population: no indigenous inhabitants; note - there are only seasonal
 caretakers

@Ashmore And Cartier Islands:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Territory of Ashmore and Cartier Islands
 conventional short form: Ashmore and Cartier Islands

 Digraph: AT

 Type: territory of Australia administered by the Australian Ministry
 for the Environment, Sport, and Territories

 Capital: none; administered from Canberra, Australia

 Administrative divisions: none (territory of Australia)

 Independence: none (territory of Australia)

 Legal system: relevant laws of the Northern Territory of Australia

 Diplomatic representation in US: none (territory of Australia)

 US diplomatic representation: none (territory of Australia)

@Ashmore And Cartier Islands:Economy

 Overview: no economic activity

@Ashmore And Cartier Islands:Transportation

 Ports: none; offshore anchorage only

@Ashmore And Cartier Islands:Defense Forces

 Note: defense is the responsibility of Australia; periodic visits by
 the Royal Australian Navy and Royal Australian Air Force


________________________________________________________________________

ATLANTIC OCEAN

@Atlantic Ocean:Geography

 Location: body of water between Africa, Antarctica, and the Western
 Hemisphere

 Map references: World

 Area:
 total area: 82.217 million sq km
 comparative area: slightly less than nine times the size of the US;
 second-largest of the world's four oceans (after the Pacific Ocean,
 but larger than Indian Ocean or Arctic Ocean)
 note: includes Baltic Sea, Black Sea, Caribbean Sea, Davis Strait,
 Denmark Strait, Drake Passage, Gulf of Mexico, Mediterranean Sea,
 North Sea, Norwegian Sea, Scotia Sea, Weddell Sea, and other tributary
 water bodies

 Coastline: 111,866 km

 International disputes: some maritime disputes (see littoral states)

 Climate: tropical cyclones (hurricanes) develop off the coast of
 Africa near Cape Verde and move westward into the Caribbean Sea;
 hurricanes can occur from May to December, but are most frequent from
 August to November

 Terrain: surface usually covered with sea ice in Labrador Sea, Denmark
 Strait, and Baltic Sea from October to June; clockwise warm water gyre
 (broad, circular system of currents) in the northern Atlantic,
 counterclockwise warm water gyre in the southern Atlantic; the ocean
 floor is dominated by the Mid-Atlantic Ridge, a rugged north-south
 centerline for the entire Atlantic basin; maximum depth is 8,605
 meters in the Puerto Rico Trench

 Natural resources: oil and gas fields, fish, marine mammals (seals and
 whales), sand and gravel aggregates, placer deposits, polymetallic
 nodules, precious stones

 Environment:
 current issues: endangered marine species include the manatee, seals,
 sea lions, turtles, and whales; driftnet fishing is exacerbating
 declining fish stocks and contributing to international disputes;
 municipal sludge pollution off eastern US, southern Brazil, and
 eastern Argentina; oil pollution in Caribbean Sea, Gulf of Mexico,
 Lake Maracaibo, Mediterranean Sea, and North Sea; industrial waste and
 municipal sewage pollution in Baltic Sea, North Sea, and Mediterranean
 Sea
 natural hazards: icebergs common in Davis Strait, Denmark Strait, and
 the northwestern Atlantic Ocean from February to August and have been
 spotted as far south as Bermuda and the Madeira Islands; icebergs from
 Antarctica occur in the extreme southern Atlantic Ocean; ships subject
 to superstructure icing in extreme northern Atlantic from October to
 May and extreme southern Atlantic from May to October; persistent fog
 can be a maritime hazard from May to September
 international agreements: NA

 Note: major choke points include the Dardanelles, Strait of Gibraltar,
 access to the Panama and Suez Canals; strategic straits include the
 Strait of Dover, Straits of Florida, Mona Passage, The Sound
 (Oresund), and Windward Passage; the Equator divides the Atlantic
 Ocean into the North Atlantic Ocean and South Atlantic Ocean

@Atlantic Ocean:Government

 Digraph: ZH

@Atlantic Ocean:Economy

 Overview: The Atlantic Ocean provides some of the world's most heavily
 trafficked sea routes, between and within the Eastern and Western
 Hemispheres. Other economic activity includes the exploitation of
 natural resources, e.g., fishing, the dredging of aragonite sands (The
 Bahamas), and production of crude oil and natural gas (Caribbean Sea,
 Gulf of Mexico, and North Sea).

@Atlantic Ocean:Transportation

 Ports: Alexandria (Egypt), Algiers (Algeria), Antwerp (Belgium),
 Barcelona (Spain), Buenos Aires (Argentina), Casablanca (Morocco),
 Colon (Panama), Copenhagen (Denmark), Dakar (Senegal), Gdansk
 (Poland), Hamburg (Germany), Helsinki (Finland), Las Palmas (Canary
 Islands, Spain), Le Havre (France), Lisbon (Portugal), London (UK),
 Marseille (France), Montevideo (Uruguay), Montreal (Canada), Naples
 (Italy), New Orleans (US), New York (US), Oran (Algeria), Oslo
 (Norway), Piraeus (Greece), Rio de Janeiro (Brazil), Rotterdam
 (Netherlands), Saint Petersburg (Russia), Stockholm (Sweden)

 Note: Kiel Canal and Saint Lawrence Seaway are two important waterways

@Atlantic Ocean:Communications

 Telephone system:
 international: numerous submarine cables with most between continental
 Europe and the UK, North America and the UK, and in the Mediterranean;
 numerous direct links across Atlantic via INTELSAT satellite network

________________________________________________________________________

AUSTRALIA

@Australia:Geography

 Location: Oceania, continent between the Indian Ocean and the South
 Pacific Ocean

 Map references: Oceania

 Area:
 total area: 7,686,850 sq km
 land area: 7,617,930 sq km
 comparative area: slightly smaller than the US
 note: includes Macquarie Island

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 25,760 km

 Maritime claims:
 contiguous zone: 24 nm
 continental shelf: 200 nm or to the edge of the continental margin
 exclusive economic zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: territorial claim in Antarctica (Australian
 Antarctic Territory)

 Climate: generally arid to semiarid; temperate in south and east;
 tropical in north

 Terrain: mostly low plateau with deserts; fertile plain in southeast

 Natural resources: bauxite, coal, iron ore, copper, tin, silver,
 uranium, nickel, tungsten, mineral sands, lead, zinc, diamonds,
 natural gas, petroleum

 Land use:
 arable land: 6%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 58%
 forest and woodland: 14%
 other: 22%

 Irrigated land: 18,800 sq km (1989 est.)

 Environment:
 current issues: soil erosion from overgrazing, industrial development,
 urbanization, and poor farming practices; soil salinity rising due to
 the use of poor quality water; desertification; clearing for
 agricultural purposes threatens the natural habitat of many unique
 animal and plant species; the Great Barrier Reef off the northeast
 coast, the largest coral reef in the world, is threatened by increased
 shipping and its popularity as a tourist site; limited natural fresh
 water resources
 natural hazards: cyclones along the coast; severe droughts
 international agreements: party to - Antarctic-Environmental Protocol,
 Antarctic Treaty, Biodiversity, Climate Change, Endangered Species,
 Environmental Modification, Hazardous Wastes, Law of the Sea, Marine
 Dumping, Marine Life Conservation, Nuclear Test Ban, Ozone Layer
 Protection, Ship Pollution, Tropical Timber 83, Wetlands, Whaling;
 signed, but not ratified - Desertification

 Note: world's smallest continent but sixth-largest country; population
 concentrated along the eastern and southeastern coasts; regular,
 tropical, invigorating, sea breeze known as "the Doctor" occurs along
 the west coast in the summer

@Australia:People

 Population: 18,322,231 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 22% (female 1,929,366; male 2,032,238)
 15-64 years: 67% (female 6,017,362; male 6,181,887)
 65 years and over: 11% (female 1,227,004; male 934,374) (July 1995
 est.)

 Population growth rate: 1.31% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 14.13 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 7.37 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: 6.33 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 7.1 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 77.78 years
 male: 74.67 years
 female: 81.04 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 1.82 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Australian(s)
 adjective: Australian

 Ethnic divisions: Caucasian 95%, Asian 4%, aboriginal and other 1%

 Religions: Anglican 26.1%, Roman Catholic 26%, other Christian 24.3%

 Languages: English, native languages

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1980 est.)
 total population: 100%
 male: 100%
 female: 100%

 Labor force: 8.63 million (September 1991)
 by occupation: finance and services 33.8%, public and community
 services 22.3%, wholesale and retail trade 20.1%, manufacturing and
 industry 16.2%, agriculture 6.1% (1987)

@Australia:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Commonwealth of Australia
 conventional short form: Australia

 Digraph: AS

 Type: federal parliamentary state

 Capital: Canberra

 Administrative divisions: 6 states and 2 territories*; Australian
 Capital Territory*, New South Wales, Northern Territory*, Queensland,
 South Australia, Tasmania, Victoria, Western Australia

 Dependent areas: Ashmore and Cartier Islands, Christmas Island, Cocos
 (Keeling) Islands, Coral Sea Islands, Heard Island and McDonald
 Islands, Norfolk Island

 Independence: 1 January 1901 (federation of UK colonies)

 National holiday: Australia Day, 26 January (1788)

 Constitution: 9 July 1900, effective 1 January 1901

 Legal system: based on English common law; accepts compulsory ICJ
 jurisdiction, with reservations

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal and compulsory

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: Queen ELIZABETH II (since 6 February 1952),
 represented by Governor General William George HAYDEN (since 16
 February 1989)
 head of government: Prime Minister Paul John KEATING (since 20
 December 1991); Deputy Prime Minister Brian HOWE (since 4 June 1991)
 cabinet: Cabinet; prime minister selects his cabinet from members of
 the House and Senate

 Legislative branch: bicameral Federal Parliament
 Senate: elections last held 13 March 1993 (next to be held by NA
 1996); results - percent of vote by party NA; seats - (76 total)
 Liberal-National 36, Labor 30, Australian Democrats 7, Greens 2,
 independents 1
 House of Representatives: elections last held 13 March 1993 (next to
 be held by NA 1996); results - percent of vote by party NA; seats -
 (147 total) Labor 80, Liberal-National 65, independent 2

 Judicial branch: High Court

 Political parties and leaders:
 government: Australian Labor Party, Paul John KEATING
 opposition: Liberal Party, John HOWARD; National Party, Timothy
 FISCHER; Australian Democratic Party, Cheryl KERNOT; Green Party,
 leader NA

 Other political or pressure groups: Australian Democratic Labor Party
 (anti-Communist Labor Party splinter group); Peace and Nuclear
 Disarmament Action (Nuclear Disarmament Party splinter group)

 Member of: AfDB, AG (observer), ANZUS, APEC, AsDB, Australia Group,
 BIS, C, CCC, CP, EBRD, ESCAP, FAO, G- 8, GATT, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO, ICC,
 ICFTU, ICRM, IDA, IEA, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, IMO, INMARSAT,
 INTELSAT, INTERPOL, IOC, IOM, ISO, ITU, MINURSO, MTCR, NAM (guest),
 NEA, NSG, OECD, PCA, SPARTECA, SPC, SPF, UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNFICYP,
 UNHCR, UNIDO, UNOSOM, UNTSO, UNU, UPU, WFTU, WHO, WIPO, WMO, ZC

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Donald Eric RUSSELL
 chancery: 1601 Massachusetts Avenue NW, Washington, DC 20036
 telephone: [1] (202) 797-3000
 FAX: [1] (202) 797-3168
 consulate(s) general: Atlanta, Honolulu, Houston, Los Angeles, New
 York, Pago Pago (American Samoa), and San Francisco

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Edward J. PERKINS
 embassy: Moonah Place, Yarralumla, Canberra, Australian Capital
 Territory 2600
 mailing address: APO AP 96549
 telephone: [61] (6) 270-5000
 FAX: [61] (6) 270-5970
 consulate(s) general: Melbourne, Perth, and Sydney
 consulate(s): Brisbane

 Flag: blue with the flag of the UK in the upper hoist-side quadrant
 and a large seven-pointed star in the lower hoist-side quadrant; the
 remaining half is a representation of the Southern Cross constellation
 in white with one small five-pointed star and four, larger,
 seven-pointed stars

@Australia:Economy

 Overview: Australia has a prosperous Western-style capitalist economy,
 with a per capita GDP comparable to levels in industrialized West
 European countries. Rich in natural resources, Australia is a major
 exporter of agricultural products, minerals, metals, and fossil fuels.
 Primary products account for more than 60% of the value of total
 exports, so that, as in 1983-84, a downturn in world commodity prices
 can have a big impact on the economy. The government is pushing for
 increased exports of manufactured goods, but competition in
 international markets continues to be severe. Australia has suffered
 from the low growth and high unemployment characterizing the OECD
 countries in the early 1990s. In 1992-93 the economy recovered slowly
 from the prolonged recession of 1990-91, a major restraining factor
 being weak world demand for Australia's exports. Growth picked up so
 strongly in 1994 that the government felt the need for fiscal and
 monetary tightening by yearend. Australia's GDP grew 6.4% in 1994,
 largely due to increases in industrial output and business investment.
 A severe drought in 1994 is expected to reduce the value of
 Australia's net farm production by $825 million in the twelve months
 through June 1995, but rising world commodity prices are likely to
 boost rural exports by 7.7% to $14.5 billion in 1995/96, according to
 government statistics.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $374.6 billion (1994
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 6.4% (1994)

 National product per capita: $20,720 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 2.5% (1994)

 Unemployment rate: 8.9% (December 1994)

 Budget:
 revenues: $83.8 billion
 expenditures: $92.3 billion, including capital expenditures of $NA
 (FY93/94)

 Exports: $50.4 billion (1994)
 commodities: coal, gold, meat, wool, alumina, wheat, machinery and
 transport equipment
 partners: Japan 25%, US 11%, South Korea 6%, NZ 5.7%, UK, Taiwan,
 Singapore, Hong Kong (1992)

 Imports: $51.1 billion (1994)
 commodities: machinery and transport equipment, computers and office
 machines, crude oil and petroleum products
 partners: US 23%, Japan 18%, UK 6%, Germany 5.7%, NZ 4% (1992)

 External debt: $147.2 billion (1994)

 Industrial production: growth rate 3.9% (FY93/94); accounts for 32% of
 GDP

 Electricity:
 capacity: 34,540,000 kW
 production: 155 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 8,021 kWh (1993)

 Industries: mining, industrial and transportation equipment, food
 processing, chemicals, steel

 Agriculture: accounts for 5% of GDP and over 30% of export revenues;
 world's largest exporter of beef and wool, second-largest for mutton,
 and among top wheat exporters; major crops - wheat, barley, sugarcane,
 fruit; livestock - cattle, sheep, poultry

 Illicit drugs: Tasmania is one of the world's major suppliers of licit
 opiate products; government maintains strict controls over areas of
 opium poppy cultivation and output of poppy straw concentrate

 Economic aid:
 donor: ODA and OOF commitments (1970-89), $10.4 billion

 Currency: 1 Australian dollar ($A) = 100 cents

 Exchange rates: Australian dollars ($A) per US$1 - 1.3058 (January
 1995), 1.3667 (1994), 1.4704 (1993), 1.3600 (1992), 1.2835 (1991),
 1.2799 (1990)

 Fiscal year: 1 July - 30 June

@Australia:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 40,478 km (1,130 km electrified; 183 km dual gauge)
 broad gauge: 7,970 km 1.600-m gauge
 standard gauge: 16,201 km 1.435-m gauge
 narrow gauge: 16,307 km 1.067-m gauge

 Highways:
 total: 837,872 km
 paved: 243,750 km
 unpaved: gravel, crushed stone, stabilized earth 228,396 km;
 unimproved earth 365,726 km

 Inland waterways: 8,368 km; mainly by small, shallow-draft craft

 Pipelines: crude oil 2,500 km; petroleum products 500 km; natural gas
 5,600 km

 Ports: Adelaide, Brisbane, Cairns, Darwin, Devonport, Fremantle,
 Geelong, Hobart (Tasmania), Launceton (Tasmania), Mackay, Melbourne,
 Sydney, Townsville

 Merchant marine:
 total: 81 ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 2,620,536 GRT/3,801,970
 DWT
 ships by type: bulk 30, cargo 7, chemical tanker 3, combination bulk
 2, container 7, liquefied gas tanker 6, oil tanker 18,
 roll-on/roll-off cargo 7, short-sea passenger 1

 Airports:
 total: 480
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 9
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 15
 with paved runways 1,524 to 2,437 m: 128
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 125
 with paved runways under 914 m: 31
 with unpaved runways 1,524 to 2,438 m: 23
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 149

@Australia:Communications

 Telephone system: 8,700,000 telephones; good international and
 domestic service
 local: NA
 intercity: domestic satellite service
 international: submarine cables to New Zealand, Papua New Guinea, and
 Indonesia; 10 INTELSAT (4 Indian Ocean and 6 Pacific Ocean) earth
 stations

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 258, FM 67, shortwave 0
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 134
 televisions: NA

@Australia:Defense Forces

 Branches: Australian Army, Royal Australian Navy, Royal Australian Air
 Force

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 4,934,175; males fit for
 military service 4,274,900; males reach military age (17) annually
 131,852 (1995 est.)

 Defense expenditures: exchange rate conversion - $7.2 billion, 2.2% of
 GDP (FY94/95)


________________________________________________________________________

AUSTRIA

@Austria:Geography

 Location: Central Europe, north of Italy

 Map references: Europe

 Area:
 total area: 83,850 sq km
 land area: 82,730 sq km
 comparative area: slightly smaller than Maine

 Land boundaries: total 2,496 km, Czech Republic 362 km, Germany 784
 km, Hungary 366 km, Italy 430 km, Liechtenstein 37 km, Slovakia 91 km,
 Slovenia 262 km, Switzerland 164 km

 Coastline: 0 km (landlocked)

 Maritime claims: none; landlocked

 International disputes: none

 Climate: temperate; continental, cloudy; cold winters with frequent
 rain in lowlands and snow in mountains; cool summers with occasional
 showers

 Terrain: in the west and south mostly mountains (Alps); along the
 eastern and northern margins mostly flat or gently sloping

 Natural resources: iron ore, petroleum, timber, magnesite, aluminum,
 lead, coal, lignite, copper, hydropower

 Land use:
 arable land: 17%
 permanent crops: 1%
 meadows and pastures: 24%
 forest and woodland: 39%
 other: 19%

 Irrigated land: 40 sq km (1989)

 Environment:
 current issues: some forest degradation caused by air and soil
 pollution; soil pollution results from the use of agricultural
 chemicals; air pollution results from emissions by coal- and oil-fired
 power stations and industrial plants and from trucks transiting
 Austria between northern and southern Europe
 natural hazards: NA
 international agreements: party to - Air Pollution, Air
 Pollution-Nitrogen Oxides, Air Pollution-Sulphur 85, Air
 Pollution-Volatile Organic Compounds, Antarctic Treaty, Biodiversity,
 Climate Change, Endangered Species, Environmental Modification,
 Hazardous Wastes, Nuclear Test Ban, Ozone Layer Protection, Ship
 Pollution, Tropical Timber 83, Wetlands; signed, but not ratified -
 Air Pollution-Sulpher 94, Antarctic-Environmental Protocol, Law of the
 Sea, Whaling

 Note: landlocked; strategic location at the crossroads of central
 Europe with many easily traversable Alpine passes and valleys; major
 river is the Danube; population is concentrated on eastern lowlands
 because of steep slopes, poor soils, and low temperatures elsewhere

@Austria:People

 Population: 7,986,664 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 17% (female 681,087; male 711,127)
 15-64 years: 67% (female 2,672,554; male 2,677,100)
 65 years and over: 16% (female 791,762; male 453,034) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 0.35% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 11.21 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 10.27 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: 2.5 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 6.9 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 76.9 years
 male: 73.7 years
 female: 80.27 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 1.48 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Austrian(s)
 adjective: Austrian

 Ethnic divisions: German 99.4%, Croatian 0.3%, Slovene 0.2%, other
 0.1%

 Religions: Roman Catholic 85%, Protestant 6%, other 9%

 Languages: German

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1974 est.)
 total population: 99%

 Labor force: 3.47 million (1989)
 by occupation: services 56.4%, industry and crafts 35.4%, agriculture
 and forestry 8.1%
 note: an estimated 200,000 Austrians are employed in other European
 countries; foreign laborers in Austria number 177,840, about 5% of
 labor force (1988)

@Austria:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Republic of Austria
 conventional short form: Austria
 local long form: Republik Oesterreich
 local short form: Oesterreich

 Digraph: AU

 Type: federal republic

 Capital: Vienna

 Administrative divisions: 9 states (bundeslaender, singular -
 bundesland); Burgenland, Kaernten, Niederoesterreich, Oberoesterreich,
 Salzburg, Steiermark, Tirol, Vorarlberg, Wien

 Independence: 12 November 1918 (from Austro-Hungarian Empire)

 National holiday: National Day, 26 October (1955)

 Constitution: 1920; revised 1929 (reinstated 1 May 1945)

 Legal system: civil law system with Roman law origin; judicial review
 of legislative acts by a Constitutional Court; separate administrative
 and civil/penal supreme courts; has not accepted compulsory ICJ
 jurisdiction

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal; compulsory for presidential
 elections

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: President Thomas KLESTIL (since 8 July 1992); election
 last held 24 May 1992 (next to be held 1996); results of second ballot
 - Thomas KLESTIL 57%, Rudolf STREICHER 43%
 head of government: Chancellor Franz VRANITZKY (since 16 June 1986);
 Vice Chancellor Erhard BUSEK (since 2 July 1991)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers; chosen by the president on the advice
 of the chancellor

 Legislative branch: bicameral Federal Assembly (Bundesversammlung)
 Federal Council (Bundesrat): consists of 63 members representing each
 of the provinces on the basis of population, but with each province
 having at least 3 representatives
 National Council (Nationalrat): elections last held 9 October 1994
 (next to be held October 1998); results - SPOE 34.9%, OEVP 27.7%, FPOE
 22.5%, Greens 7.3%, LF 6.0% other 1.6%; seats - (183 total) SPOE 65,
 OEVP 52, FPOE 42, Greens 13, LF 11

 Judicial branch: Supreme Judicial Court (Oberster Gerichtshof) for
 civil and criminal cases, Administrative Court
 (Verwaltungsgerichtshof) for bureaucratic cases, Constitutional Court
 (Verfassungsgerichtshof) for constitutional cases

 Political parties and leaders: Social Democratic Party of Austria
 (SPOE), Franz VRANITZKY, chairman; Austrian People's Party (OEVP),
 Erhard BUSEK, chairman; Freedom Movement (F) (was the Freedom Party of
 Austria, FPOE), Joerg HAIDER, chairman; Communist Party (KPOE), Walter
 SILBERMAYER, chairman; The Greens, Madeleine PETROVIC; Liberal Forum
 (LF), Heide SCHMIDT

 Other political or pressure groups: Federal Chamber of Commerce and
 Industry; Austrian Trade Union Federation (primarily Socialist); three
 composite leagues of the Austrian People's Party (OEVP) representing
 business, labor, and farmers; OEVP-oriented League of Austrian
 Industrialists; Roman Catholic Church, including its chief lay
 organization, Catholic Action

 Member of: AfDB, AG (observer), AsDB, Australia Group, BIS, CCC, CE,
 CEI, CERN, EBRD, ECE, EFTA, ESA, EU, FAO, G- 9, GATT, IADB, IAEA,
 IBRD, ICAO, ICC, ICFTU, ICRM, IDA, IEA, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF,
 IMO, INTELSAT, INTERPOL, IOC, IOM, ISO, ITU, MINURSO, MTCR, NAM
 (guest), NEA, NSG, OAS (observer), OECD, ONUSAL, OSCE, PCA, UN,
 UNAMIR, UNCTAD, UNDOF, UNESCO, UNFICYP, UNHCR, UNIDO, UNIKOM, UNMIH,
 UNOMIL, UNOMOZ, UNTSO, UPU, WCL, WFTU, WHO, WIPO, WMO, WTO, ZC

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Helmut TUERK
 chancery: 3524 International Court NW, Washington, DC 20008-3035
 telephone: [1] (202) 895-6700
 FAX: [1] (202) 895-6750
 consulate(s) general: Chicago, Los Angeles, and New York

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Swanee G. HUNT
 chancery: Boltzmanngasse 16, A-1091, Vienna
 mailing address: use embassy street address
 telephone: [43] (1) 313-39
 FAX: [43] (1) 310-0682
 consulate(s) general: none (Salzburg closed September 1993)

 Flag: three equal horizontal bands of red (top), white, and red

@Austria:Economy

 Overview: Austria boasts a prosperous and stable market economy with a
 sizable but falling proportion of nationalized industry and with
 extensive welfare benefits. Thanks to its raw material endowment, a
 technically skilled labor force, and strong links to German industrial
 firms, Austria occupies specialized niches in European industry and
 services (tourism, banking) and produces almost enough food to feed
 itself with only 8% of the labor force in agriculture. After 11
 consecutive years of growth, the Austrian economy experienced a mild
 recession in 1993, but growth resumed in 1994. Unemployment is 4.3%
 and will likely stay at that level as companies adjust to the
 competition of EU membership beginning 1 January 1995. To prepare for
 EU membership, Austria's government has taken measures to open the
 economy by introducing a major tax reform, privatizing state-owned
 firms, and liberalizing cross-border capital movements. Problems for
 the 1990s include an aging population, the high level of industrial
 subsidies, and the struggle to keep welfare benefits within budgetary
 capabilities - the deficit climbed to over 4% of GDP in 1994.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $139.3 billion (1994
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 2.5% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $17,500 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 3% (1994)

 Unemployment rate: 4.3% (1994 est.)

 Budget:
 revenues: $52.2 billion
 expenditures: $60.3 billion, including capital expenditures of $NA
 (1993 est.)

 Exports: $44.1 billion (1994 est.)
 commodities: machinery and equipment, iron and steel, lumber,
 textiles, paper products, chemicals
 partners: EC 63.5% (Germany 38.9%), EFTA 9.0%, Eastern Europe/FSU
 12.3%, Japan 1.5%, US 3.4% (1993)

 Imports: $53.8 billion (1994 est.)
 commodities: petroleum, foodstuffs, machinery and equipment, vehicles,
 chemicals, textiles and clothing, pharmaceuticals
 partners: EC 66.8% (Germany 41.3%), EFTA 6.7%, Eastern Europe/FSU
 7.5%, Japan 4.4%, US 4.4% (1993)

 External debt: $21.5 billion (1994 est.)

 Industrial production: growth rate 2.5% (1994 est.)

 Electricity:
 capacity: 17,230,000 kW
 production: 50.2 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 5,824 kWh (1993)

 Industries: foods, iron and steel, machines, textiles, chemicals,
 electrical, paper and pulp, tourism, mining, motor vehicles

 Agriculture: accounts for 3.2% of GDP (including forestry); principal
 crops and animals - grains, fruit, potatoes, sugar beets, sawn wood,
 cattle, pigs, poultry; 80%-90% self-sufficient in food

 Illicit drugs: transshipment point for Southwest Asian heroin
 transiting the Balkan route and Eastern Europe

 Economic aid:
 donor: ODA and OOF commitments (1970-89), $2.4 billion

 Currency: 1 Austrian schilling (S) = 100 groschen

 Exchange rates: Austrian schillings (S) per US$1 - 10.774 (January
 1995), 11.422 (1994), 11.632 (1993), 10.989 (1992), 11.676 (1991),
 11.370 (1990)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Austria:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 5,624 km
 standard gauge: 5,269 km 1.435-m gauge (3,162 km electrified)
 narrow gauge: 355 km 1.000-m and 0.760-m gauge (84 km electrified)
 (1994)

 Highways:
 total: 110,000 km
 paved: 35,000 km (including 1,554 km of autobahn)
 unpaved: mostly gravel and earth 75,000 km (1992)

 Inland waterways: 446 km

 Pipelines: crude oil 554 km; petroleum products 171 km; natural gas
 2,611 km

 Ports: Linz, Vienna

 Merchant marine:
 total: 32 ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 152,885 GRT/235,719 DWT
 ships by type: bulk 3, cargo 25, oil tanker 1, refrigerated cargo 2,
 roll-on/roll-off cargo 1

 Airports:
 total: 55
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 1
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 5
 with paved runways 1,524 to 2,437 m: 1
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 3
 with paved runways under 914 m: 41
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 4

@Austria:Communications

 Telephone system: 4,014,000 telephones; highly developed and efficient

 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: 2 INTELSAT (1 Atlantic Ocean and 1 Indian Ocean), and
 EUTELSAT earth stations

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 6, FM 21 (repeaters 545), shortwave 0
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 47 (repeaters 870)
 televisions: NA

@Austria:Defense Forces

 Branches: Army (includes Flying Division)

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 2,026,567; males fit for
 military service 1,695,879; males reach military age (19) annually
 46,821 (1995 est.)

 Defense expenditures: exchange rate conversion - about $1.8 billion,
 0.9% of GDP (1994)


________________________________________________________________________

AZERBAIJAN

 Note--Azerbaijan continues to be plagued by an unresolved
 seven-year-old conflict with Armenian separatists over its
 Nagorno-Karabakh region. The Karabakh Armenians have declared
 independence and seized almost 20% of the country's territory,
 creating almost 1 million Azeri displaced persons in the process. Both
 sides have generally observed a Russian-mediated cease-fire in place
 since May 1994, and support the OSCE-mediated peace process, now
 entering its fourth year. Nevertheless, Baku and Xankandi
 (Stepanakert) remain far apart on most substantive issues from the
 placement and composition of a peacekeeping force to the enclave's
 ultimate political status, and prospects for a negotiated settlement
 remain dim.

@Azerbaijan:Geography

 Location: Southwestern Asia, bordering the Caspian Sea, between Iran
 and Russia

 Map references: Commonwealth of Independent States - European States

 Area:
 total area: 86,600 sq km
 land area: 86,100 sq km
 comparative area: slightly larger than Maine
 note: includes the exclave of Naxcivan Autonomous Republic and the
 Nagorno-Karabakh region; the region's autonomy was abolished by
 Azerbaijani Supreme Soviet on 26 November 1991

 Land boundaries: total 2,013 km, Armenia (west) 566 km, Armenia
 (southwest) 221 km, Georgia 322 km, Iran (south) 432 km, Iran
 (southwest) 179 km, Russia 284 km, Turkey 9 km

 Coastline: 0 km (landlocked)
 note: Azerbaijan borders the Caspian Sea (800 km, est.)

 Maritime claims: none; landlocked

 International disputes: violent and longstanding dispute with ethnic
 Armenians of Nagorno-Karabakh over its status; Caspian Sea boundaries
 are not yet determined

 Climate: dry, semiarid steppe

 Terrain: large, flat Kur-Araz Lowland (much of it below sea level)
 with Great Caucasus Mountains to the north, Qarabag (Karabakh) Upland
 in west; Baku lies on Abseron (Apsheron) Peninsula that juts into
 Caspian Sea

 Natural resources: petroleum, natural gas, iron ore, nonferrous
 metals, alumina

 Land use:
 arable land: 18%
 permanent crops: 4%
 meadows and pastures: 25%
 forest and woodland: 0%
 other: 53%

 Irrigated land: 14,010 sq km (1990)

 Environment:
 current issues: local scientists consider the Abseron (Apsheron)
 Peninsula (including Baku and Sumqayit) and the Caspian Sea to be the
 ecologically most devastated area in the world because of severe air,
 water, and soil pollution; soil pollution results from the use of DDT
 as a pesticide and also from toxic defoliants used in the production
 of cotton
 natural hazards: droughts; some lowland areas threatened by rising
 levels of the Caspian Sea
 international agreements: signed, but not ratified - Biodiversity,
 Climate Change

 Note: landlocked

@Azerbaijan:People

 Population: 7,789,886 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 33% (female 1,241,952; male 1,315,313)
 15-64 years: 61% (female 2,437,810; male 2,307,496)
 65 years and over: 6% (female 303,926; male 183,389) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 1.32% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 22.05 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 6.56 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: -2.32 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 33.9 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 71.09 years
 male: 67.4 years
 female: 74.97 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 2.64 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Azerbaijani(s)
 adjective: Azerbaijani

 Ethnic divisions: Azeri 90%, Dagestani Peoples 3.2%, Russian 2.5%,
 Armenian 2.3%, other 2% (1995 est.)
 note: almost all Armenians live in the separatist Nagorno-Karabakh
 region

 Religions: Muslim 93.4%, Russian Orthodox 2.5%, Armenian Orthodox
 2.3%, other 1.8% (1995 est.)
 note: religious affiliation is still nominal in Azerbaijan; actual
 practicing adherents are much lower

 Languages: Azeri 89%, Russian 3%, Armenian 2%, other 6% (1995 est.)

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1989)
 total population: 97%
 male: 99%
 female: 96%

 Labor force: 2.789 million
 by occupation: agriculture and forestry 32%, industry and construction
 26%, other 42% (1990)

@Azerbaijan:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Azerbaijani Republic
 conventional short form: Azerbaijan
 local long form: Azarbaycan Respublikasi
 local short form: none
 former: Azerbaijan Soviet Socialist Republic

 Digraph: AJ

 Type: republic

 Capital: Baku (Baki)

 Administrative divisions: 59 rayons (rayonlar; rayon - singular), 11
 cities* (saharlar; sahar - singular), 1 autonomous republic** (muxtar
 respublika); Abscron Rayonu, Agcabadi Rayonu, Agdam Rayonu, Agdas
 Rayonu, Agstafa Rayonu, Agsu Rayonu, AliBayramli Sahari*, Astara
 Rayonu, Baki Sahari*, Balakan Rayonu, Barda Rayonu, Beylaqan Rayonu,
 Bilasuvar Rayonu, Cabrayil Rayonu, Calilabad Rayonu, Daskasan Rayonu,
 Davaci Rayonu, Fuzuli Rayonu, Gadabay Rayonu, Ganca Sahari*, Goranboy
 Rayonu, Goycay Rayonu, Haciqabul Rayonu, Imisli Rayonu, Ismayilli
 Rayonu, Kalbacar Rayonu, Kurdamir Rayonu, Lacin Rayonu, Lankaran
 Rayonu, Lankaran Sahari*, Lerik Rayonu, Masalli Rayonu, Mingacevir
 Sahari*, Naftalan Sahari*, Naxcivan Muxtar Respublikasi**, Neftcala
 Rayonu, Oguz Rayonu, Qabala Rayonu, Qax Rayonu, Qazax Rayonu, Qobustan
 Rayonu, Quba Rayonu, Qubadli Rayonu, Qusar Rayonu, Saatli Rayonu,
 Sabirabad Rayonu, Saki Rayonu, Saki Sahari*, Salyan Rayonu, Samaxi
 Rayonu, Samkir Rayonu, Samux Rayonu, Siyazan Rayonu, Sumqayit Sahari*,
 Susa Rayonu, Susa Sahari*, Tartar Rayonu, Tovuz Rayonu, Ucar Rayonu,
 Xacmaz Rayonu, Xankandi Sahari*, Xanlar Rayonu, Xizi Rayonu, Xocali
 Rayonu, Xocavand Rayonu, Yardimb Rayonu, Yevlax Rayonu, Yevlax
 Sahari*, Zangilan Rayonu, Zaqatala Rayonu, Zardab Rayonu

 Independence: 30 August 1991 (from Soviet Union)

 National holiday: Independence Day, 28 May

 Constitution: adopted NA April 1978; writing a new constitution

 Legal system: based on civil law system

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: President Heydar ALIYEV (since 18 June 1993); election
 last held 3 October 1993 (next to be held NA); results - Heydar ALIYEV
 won 97% of vote
 head of government: Acting Prime Minister Fuad QULIYEV (since 9
 October 1994); First Deputy Prime Ministers Abbas ABBASOV, Samed
 SADYKOV, Vahid AKHMEDOV (since NA)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers; appointed by the president and
 confirmed by the Mejlis

 Legislative branch: unicameral
 National Assembly (Milli Mejlis): elections last held 30 September and
 14 October 1990 for the Supreme Soviet (next expected to be held
 September 1995 for the National Assembly); seats for Supreme Soviet -
 (360 total) Communists 280, Democratic Bloc 45 (grouping of opposition
 parties), other 15, vacant 20; note - on 19 May 1992 the Supreme
 Soviet was prorogued in favor of a Popular Front-dominated National
 Council; seats - (50 total) Popular Front 25, opposition elements 25
 note: since June 1993 ALIYEV has rotated in several supporters to
 replace Popular Front adherents

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court

 Political parties and leaders: Azerbaijan Popular Front (APF), Ebulfez
 ELCIBEY, chairman; Musavat Party, Isa GAMBAR, chairman; National
 Independence Party, Etibar MAMEDOV, chairman; Social Democratic Party
 (SDP), Araz ALIZADE, chairman; Communist Party, Ramiz AKHMEDOV,
 chairman; People's Freedom Party, Yunus OGUZ, chairman; Independent
 Social Democratic Party, Arif YUNUSOV and Leila YUNOSOVA, cochairmen;
 New Azerbaijan Party, Heydar ALIYEV, chairman; Boz Gurd Party,
 Iskander HAMIDOV, chairman; Azerbaijan Democratic Independence Party,
 Qabil HUSEYNLI, chairman; Islamic Party of Azerbaijan, Ali Akram,
 chairman; Ana Veten Party, Fazail AGAMALIYEV; Azerbaijan Democratic
 Party, Sardar Jalaloglu MAMEDOV; Azerbaijan Democratic Party of
 Proprietors (DPOP), Makhmud MAMEDOV; Azerbaijan Patriotic Solidarity
 Party, Sabir RUSTAMHANLI; Azerbaijan Republic Reform Party, Fuad
 ASADOV; Communist Party of Azerbaijan (unregistered), Sayad SAYADOV;
 Equality of the Peoples Party, Faukhraddin AYDAYEV; Independent
 Azerbaijan Party, Nizami SULEYMANOV; Labor Party of Azerbaijan,
 Sabutai HAJIYEV; Liberal-Democratic Party of Azerbaijan, Lyudmila
 NIKOLAYEVNA; National Enlightenment Party, Hajy Osman EFENDIYEV;
 National Liberation Party, Panak SHAKHSEVEV; Peasant Party, Firuz
 MUSTAFAYEV; Radical Party of Azerbaijan, Malik SHARIFOV; United
 Azerbaijan Party, Kerrar ABILOV; Vetan Adzhagy Party, Zakir TAGIYEV

 Other political or pressure groups: self-proclaimed Armenian
 Nagorno-Karabakh Republic; Talysh independence movement

 Member of: BSEC, CCC, CIS, EBRD, ECE, ECO, ESCAP, IBRD, ICAO, IDB,
 IFAD, ILO, IMF, INTELSAT, INTERPOL, IOC, ITU, NACC, OIC, OSCE, PFP,
 UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UPU, WHO, WMO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Hafiz Mir Jalal PASHAYEV
 chancery: (temporary) Suite 700, 927 15th Street NW, Washington, DC
 20005
 telephone: [1] (202) 842-0001
 FAX: [1] (202) 842-0004

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Richard D. KAUZLARICH
 embassy: Azadliq Prospect 83, Baku
 mailing address: use embassy street address
 telephone: [9] (9412) 96-00-19, 98-03-37
 FAX: [9] (9412) 98-37-55

 Flag: three equal horizontal bands of blue (top), red, and green; a
 crescent and eight-pointed star in white are centered in red band

@Azerbaijan:Economy

 Overview: Azerbaijan is less developed industrially than either
 Armenia or Georgia, the other Transcaucasian states. It resembles the
 Central Asian states in its majority nominally Muslim population, high
 structural unemployment, and low standard of living. The economy's
 most prominent products are oil, cotton, and gas. Production from the
 Caspian oil and gas field has been in decline for several years, but
 the November 1994 ratification of the $7.5 billion oil deal with a
 consortium of Western companies should generate the funds needed to
 spur future industrial development. Azerbaijan accounted for 1.5% to
 2% of the capital stock and output of the former Soviet Union.
 Azerbaijan shares all the formidable problems of the ex-Soviet
 republics in making the transition from a command to a market economy,
 but its considerable energy resources brighten its long-term
 prospects. Baku has only recently begun making progress on economic
 reform, and old economic ties and structures have yet to be replaced.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $13.8 billion (1994
 estimate as extrapolated from World Bank estimate for 1992)

 National product real growth rate: -22% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $1,790 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 28% monthly average (1994)

 Unemployment rate: 0.9% includes officially registered unemployed;
 also large numbers of other unemployed and underemployed workers
 (December 1994)

 Budget:
 revenues: $167.5 million
 expenditures: $234.6 million, including capital expenditures of $NA
 (1994)

 Exports: $366 million to non-FSU countries (f.o.b., 1994)
 commodities: oil and gas, chemicals, oilfield equipment, textiles,
 cotton (1991)
 partners: mostly CIS and European countries

 Imports: $296 million from non-FSU countries (c.i.f., 1994)
 commodities: machinery and parts, consumer durables, foodstuffs,
 textiles (1991)
 partners: European countries

 External debt: $NA

 Industrial production: growth rate -25% (1994)

 Electricity:
 capacity: 4,900,000 kW
 production: 17.5 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 2,270 kWh (1994)

 Industries: petroleum and natural gas, petroleum products, oilfield
 equipment; steel, iron ore, cement; chemicals and petrochemicals;
 textiles

 Agriculture: cotton, grain, rice, grapes, fruit, vegetables, tea,
 tobacco; cattle, pigs, sheep and goats

 Illicit drugs: illicit cultivator of cannabis and opium poppy; mostly
 for CIS consumption; limited government eradication program;
 transshipment point for illicit drugs to Western Europe

 Economic aid:
 recipient: wheat from Turkey

 Currency: 1 manat = 100 gopik

 Exchange rates: manats per US$1 - 4500 (April 1995), 4168 (end of
 December 1994)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Azerbaijan:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 2,090 km in common carrier service; does not include industrial
 lines
 broad gauge: 2,090 km 1.520-m gauge (1990)

 Highways:
 total: 36,700 km
 paved or graveled: 31,800 km
 unpaved: earth 4,900 km (1990)

 Pipelines: crude oil 1,130 km; petroleum products 630 km; natural gas
 1,240 km

 Ports: Baku (Baki)

 Airports:
 total: 69
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 2
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 6
 with paved runways 1,524 to 2,437 m: 17
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 3
 with paved runways under 914 m: 1
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 7
 with unpaved runways under 914 m: 33

@Azerbaijan:Communications

 Telephone system: 710,000 telephones; 90 telephones/1,000 persons
 (1991); 202,000 persons waiting for telephone installations (January
 1991); domestic telephone service is of poor quality and inadequate
 local: a joint venture to establish a cellular telephone system
 (Bakcel) in the Baku area is supposed to become operational in 1994
 intercity: NA
 international: connections to other former USSR republics by cable and
 microwave and to other countries via the Moscow international gateway
 switch; INTELSAT link installed in late 1992 in Baku with Turkish
 financial assistance with access to 200 countries through Turkey;
 since August 1993 an earth station near Baku has provided direct
 communications with New York through Russia's Stationar-11 satellite

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM NA, FM NA, shortwave NA
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: NA; domestic and Russian TV programs are received
 locally and Turkish and Iranian TV is received from an INTELSAT
 satellite through a receive-only earth station
 televisions: NA

@Azerbaijan:Defense Forces

 Branches: Army, Air Force, Navy, Maritime Border Guard, National
 Guard, Security Forces (internal and border troops)

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 1,927,955; males fit for
 military service 1,553,736; males reach military age (18) annually
 68,407 (1995 est.)

 Defense expenditures: 70.5 billion rubles, 10% of GDP (1993 budget
 allocation); note - conversion of the military budget into US dollars
 using the current exchange rate could produce misleading results


________________________________________________________________________

THE BAHAMAS

@The Bahamas:Geography

 Location: Caribbean, chain of islands in the North Atlantic Ocean,
 southeast of Florida

 Map references: Central America and the Caribbean

 Area:
 total area: 13,940 sq km
 land area: 10,070 sq km
 comparative area: slightly larger than Connecticut

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 3,542 km

 Maritime claims:
 continental shelf: 200-m depth or to the depth of exploitation
 exclusive fishing zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 3 nm

 International disputes: none

 Climate: tropical marine; moderated by warm waters of Gulf Stream

 Terrain: long, flat coral formations with some low rounded hills

 Natural resources: salt, aragonite, timber

 Land use:
 arable land: 1%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 0%
 forest and woodland: 32%
 other: 67%

 Irrigated land: NA sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: coral reef decay
 natural hazards: hurricanes and other tropical storms that cause
 extensive flood and wind damage
 international agreements: party to - Biodiversity, Climate Change,
 Endangered Species, Hazardous Wastes, Law of the Sea, Nuclear Test
 Ban, Ozone Layer Protection, Ship Pollution

 Note: strategic location adjacent to US and Cuba; extensive island
 chain

@The Bahamas:People

 Population: 256,616 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 28% (female 35,924; male 36,504)
 15-64 years: 66% (female 87,868; male 82,780)
 65 years and over: 6% (female 8,247; male 5,293) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 1.09% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 19.23 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 5.79 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: -2.56 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 24.3 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 72.12 years
 male: 67.37 years
 female: 76.97 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 2.01 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Bahamian(s)
 adjective: Bahamian

 Ethnic divisions: black 85%, white 15%

 Religions: Baptist 32%, Anglican 20%, Roman Catholic 19%, Methodist
 6%, Church of God 6%, other Protestant 12%, none or unknown 3%, other
 2%

 Languages: English, Creole (among Haitian immigrants)

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write but definition of
 literary not available (1963 est.)
 total population: 90%
 male: 90%
 female: 89%

 Labor force: 136,900 (1993)
 by occupation: government 30%, hotels and restaurants 25%, business
 services 10%, agriculture 5% (1989)

@The Bahamas:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Commonwealth of The Bahamas
 conventional short form: The Bahamas

 Digraph: BF

 Type: commonwealth

 Capital: Nassau

 Administrative divisions: 21 districts; Acklins and Crooked Islands,
 Bimini, Cat Island, Exuma, Freeport, Fresh Creek, Governor's Harbour,
 Green Turtle Cay, Harbour Island, High Rock, Inagua, Kemps Bay, Long
 Island, Marsh Harbour, Mayaguana, New Providence, Nicholls Town and
 Berry Islands, Ragged Island, Rock Sound, Sandy Point, San Salvador
 and Rum Cay

 Independence: 10 July 1973 (from UK)

 National holiday: National Day, 10 July (1973)

 Constitution: 10 July 1973

 Legal system: based on English common law

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: Queen ELIZABETH II (since 6 February 1952),
 represented by Governor General Sir Clifford DARLING (since 2 January
 1992)
 head of government: Prime Minister Hubert A. INGRAHAM (since 19 August
 1992)
 cabinet: Cabinet; appointed by the governor on the prime minister's
 recommendation

 Legislative branch: bicameral Parliament
 Senate: a 16-member body appointed by the governor general
 House of Assembly: elections last held 19 August 1992 (next to be held
 by August 1997); results - percent of vote by party NA; seats - (49
 total) FNM 32, PLP 17

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court

 Political parties and leaders: Progressive Liberal Party (PLP), Sir
 Lynden O. PINDLING; Free National Movement (FNM), Hubert Alexander
 INGRAHAM;

 Member of: ACP, C, CARICOM, CCC, CDB, ECLAC, FAO, G-77, IADB, IBRD,
 ICAO, ICFTU, ICRM, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, IMO, INMARSAT, INTELSAT,
 INTERPOL, IOC, ITU, NAM, OAS, OPANAL, UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNIDO, UPU,
 WHO, WIPO, WMO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Timothy Baswell DONALDSON
 chancery: 2220 Massachusetts Avenue NW, Washington, DC 20008
 telephone: [1] (202) 319-2660
 FAX: [1] (202) 319-2668
 consulate(s) general: Miami and New York

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Sidney WILLIAMS
 embassy: Mosmar Building, Queen Street, Nassau
 mailing address: P. O. Box N-8197, Nassau
 telephone: [1] (809) 322-1181, 328-2206
 FAX: [1] (809) 328-7838

 Flag: three equal horizontal bands of aquamarine (top), gold, and
 aquamarine with a black equilateral triangle based on the hoist side

@The Bahamas:Economy

 Overview: The Bahamas is a stable, developing nation whose economy is
 based primarily on tourism and offshore banking. Tourism alone
 provides about 50% of GDP and directly or indirectly employs about
 50,000 people or 40% of the local work force. The economy has
 slackened in recent years, as the annual increase in the number of
 tourists slowed. Nonetheless, per capita GDP is one of the highest in
 the region.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $4.4 billion (1994
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 3.5% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $15,900 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 2.7% (1994)

 Unemployment rate: 13.1% (1993)

 Budget:
 revenues: $696 million
 expenditures: $756 million, including capital expenditures of $NA
 (FY94/95)

 Exports: $257 million (f.o.b., 1993 est.)
 commodities: pharmaceuticals, cement, rum, crawfish, refined petroleum
 products
 partners: US 51%, UK 7%, Norway 7%, France 6%, Italy 5%

 Imports: $1.15 billion (f.o.b,,1993 est.)
 commodities: foodstuffs, manufactured goods, crude oil, vehicles,
 electronics
 partners: US 55%, Japan 17%, Nigeria 12%, Denmark 7%, Norway 6%

 External debt: $455 million (December 1993)

 Industrial production: growth rate 3% (1990); accounts for 15% of GDP

 Electricity:
 capacity: 424,000 kW
 production: 929 million kWh
 consumption per capita: 3,200 kWh (1993)

 Industries: tourism, banking, cement, oil refining and transshipment,
 salt production, rum, aragonite, pharmaceuticals, spiral welded steel
 pipe

 Agriculture: accounts for 5% of GDP; dominated by small-scale
 producers; principal products - citrus fruit, vegetables, poultry;
 large net importer of food

 Illicit drugs: transshipment point for cocaine and marijuana bound for
 US and Europe; also a money-laundering center

 Economic aid:
 recipient: US commitments, including Ex-Im (FY85-89), $1 million;
 Western (non-US) countries, ODA and OOF bilateral commitments
 (1970-89), $345 million

 Currency: 1 Bahamian dollar (B$) = 100 cents

 Exchange rates: Bahamian dollar (B$) per US$1 - 1.00 (fixed rate)

 Fiscal year: 1 July - 30 June

@The Bahamas:Transportation

 Railroads: 0 km

 Highways:
 total: 2,400 km
 paved: 1,350 km
 unpaved: gravel 1,050 km

 Ports: Freeport, Matthew Town, Nassau

 Merchant marine:
 total: 936 ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 21,815,474
 GRT/35,253,416 DWT
 ships by type: bulk 162, cargo 181, chemical tanker 39, combination
 bulk 9, combination ore/oil 19, container 52, liquefied gas tanker 20,
 oil tanker 182, passenger 55, refrigerated cargo 146, roll-on/roll-off
 cargo 43, short-sea passenger 16, vehicle carrier 12
 note: a flag of convenience registry; includes 46 countries among
 which are UK 158 ships, Norway 125, Greece 100, US 94, Denmark 80,
 Netherlands 53, France 36, Finland 35, Japan 35, Sweden 25

 Airports:
 total: 60
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 2
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 1
 with paved runways 1,524 to 2,437 m: 16
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 11
 with paved runways under 914 m: 22
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 8

@The Bahamas:Communications

 Telephone system: 99,000 telephones; totally automatic system; highly
 developed
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: tropospheric scatter and submarine cable links to
 Florida; 3 coaxial submarine cables; 1 INTELSAT (Atlantic Ocean) earth
 station

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 3, FM 2, shortwave 0
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 1
 televisions: NA

@The Bahamas:Defense Forces

 Branches: Royal Bahamas Defense Force (Coast Guard only), Royal
 Bahamas Police Force

 Defense expenditures: exchange rate conversion - $65 million, 2.7% of
 GDP (1990)


________________________________________________________________________

BAHRAIN

@Bahrain:Geography

 Location: Middle East, archipelago in the Persian Gulf, east of Saudi
 Arabia

 Map references: Middle East

 Area:
 total area: 620 sq km
 land area: 620 sq km
 comparative area: slightly less than 3.5 times the size of Washington,
 DC

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 161 km

 Maritime claims:
 contiguous zone: 24 nm
 continental shelf: extending to boundaries to be determined
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: territorial dispute with Qatar over the Hawar
 Islands; maritime boundary with Qatar

 Climate: arid; mild, pleasant winters; very hot, humid summers

 Terrain: mostly low desert plain rising gently to low central
 escarpment

 Natural resources: oil, associated and nonassociated natural gas, fish

 Land use:
 arable land: 2%
 permanent crops: 2%
 meadows and pastures: 6%
 forest and woodland: 0%
 other: 90%

 Irrigated land: 10 sq km (1989 est.)

 Environment:
 current issues: desertification resulting from the degradation of
 limited arable land, periods of drought, and dust storms; coastal
 degradation (damage to coastlines, coral reefs, and sea vegetation)
 resulting from oil spills and other discharges from large tankers, oil
 refineries, and distribution stations; no natural fresh water
 resources so that groundwater and sea water are the only sources for
 all water needs
 natural hazards: periodic droughts; dust storms
 international agreements: party to - Climate Change, Hazardous Wastes,
 Law of the Sea, Ozone Layer Protection; signed, but not ratified -
 Biodiversity

 Note: close to primary Middle Eastern petroleum sources; strategic
 location in Persian Gulf through which much of Western world's
 petroleum must transit to reach open ocean

@Bahrain:People

 Population: 575,925 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 31% (female 87,398; male 89,976)
 15-64 years: 67% (female 152,363; male 231,586)
 65 years and over: 2% (female 7,051; male 7,551) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 2.58% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 24.12 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 3.31 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: 4.95 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 18 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 73.94 years
 male: 71.46 years
 female: 76.49 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 3.12 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Bahraini(s)
 adjective: Bahraini

 Ethnic divisions: Bahraini 63%, Asian 13%, other Arab 10%, Iranian 8%,
 other 6%

 Religions: Shi'a Muslim 70%, Sunni Muslim 30%

 Languages: Arabic, English, Farsi, Urdu

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1991)
 total population: 84%
 male: 89%
 female: 77%

 Labor force: 140,000
 by occupation: industry and commerce 85%, agriculture 5%, services 5%,
 government 3% (1982)
 note: 42% of labor force is Bahraini

@Bahrain:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: State of Bahrain
 conventional short form: Bahrain
 local long form: Dawlat al Bahrayn
 local short form: Al Bahrayn

 Digraph: BA

 Type: traditional monarchy

 Capital: Manama

 Administrative divisions: 12 districts (manatiq, singular - mintaqah);
 Al Hadd, Al Manamah, Al Mintaqah al Gharbiyah, Al Mintaqah al Wusta,
 Al Mintaqah ash Shamaliyah, Al Muharraq, Ar Rifa'wa al Mintaqah al
 Janubiyah, Jidd Hafs, Madinat Hamad, Madinat 'Isa, Mintaqat Juzur
 Hawar, Sitrah

 Independence: 15 August 1971 (from UK)

 National holiday: Independence Day, 16 December (1961)

 Constitution: 26 May 1973, effective 6 December 1973

 Legal system: based on Islamic law and English common law

 Suffrage: none

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: Amir ISA bin Salman Al Khalifa (since 2 November
 1961); Heir Apparent HAMAD bin Isa bin Salman Al Khalifa (son of the
 Amir, born 28 January 1950)
 head of government: Prime Minister KHALIFA bin Salman Al Khalifa
 (since 19 January 1970)
 cabinet: Cabinet

 Legislative branch: unicameral National Assembly was dissolved 26
 August 1975 and legislative powers were assumed by the Cabinet;
 appointed Advisory Council established 16 December 1992

 Judicial branch: High Civil Appeals Court

 Political parties and leaders: political parties prohibited; several
 small, clandestine leftist and Islamic fundamentalist groups are
 active

 Member of: ABEDA, AFESD, AL, AMF, ESCWA, FAO, G-77, GATT, GCC, IBRD,
 ICAO, ICRM, IDB, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, IMO, INMARSAT, INTELSAT, INTERPOL,
 IOC, ISO (correspondent), ITU, NAM, OAPEC, OIC, UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO,
 UNIDO, UPU, WFTU, WHO, WMO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Muhammad ABD AL-GHAFFAR al-Abdallah
 chancery: 3502 International Drive NW, Washington, DC 20008
 telephone: [1] (202) 342-0741, 342-0742
 consulate(s) general: New York

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador David M. RANSOM
 embassy: Building No. 979, Road 3119 (next to Ahli Sports Club), Zinj
 District, Manama
 mailing address: FPO AE 09834-5100; P.O. Box 26431, Manama
 (International Mail)
 telephone: [973] 273300; afterhours [973] 275-126
 FAX: [973] 272594

 Flag: red with a white serrated band (eight white points) on the hoist
 side

@Bahrain:Economy

 Overview: Tiny in area, Bahrain is well-to-do in economic resources
 and per capita income. Petroleum production and processing account for
 about 80% of export receipts, 60% of government revenues, and 30% of
 GDP. Economic conditions have fluctuated with the changing fortunes of
 oil since 1985, for example, during and following the Gulf crisis of
 1990-91. With its highly developed communication and transport
 facilities Bahrain is home to numerous multinational firms with
 business in the Gulf. A large share of exports consists of petroleum
 products made from imported crude. Prospects for 1995 are good, with
 private enterprise the main driving force, e.g., in banking and
 construction. Unemployment, especially among the young, and the
 depletion of both oil and underground water resources are major
 long-term economic problems.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $7.1 billion (1994
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 2.2% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $12,100 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 2% (1994 est.)

 Unemployment rate: 15% (1991 est.)

 Budget:
 revenues: $1.2 billion (1989)
 expenditures: $1.6 billion, including capital expenditures of $NA
 (1992)

 Exports: $3.69 billion (f.o.b., 1993 est.)
 commodities: petroleum and petroleum products 80%, aluminum 7%
 partners: Japan 11%, UAE 5%, South Korea 4%, India 4%, Saudi Arabia 3%
 (1992)

 Imports: $3.83 billion (f.o.b., 1993 est.)
 commodities: nonoil 59%, crude oil 41%
 partners: Saudi Arabia 47%, UK 7%, Japan 7%, US 6%, Germany 5% (1992)

 External debt: $2.6 billion (1993)

 Industrial production: growth rate 13% (1992); accounts for 38% of
 GDP, including petroleum

 Electricity:
 capacity: 1,050,000 kW
 production: 3.3 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 5,453 kWh (1993)

 Industries: petroleum processing and refining, aluminum smelting,
 offshore banking, ship repairing

 Agriculture: including fishing, accounts for less than 2% of GDP; not
 self-sufficient in food production; heavily subsidized sector produces
 fruit, vegetables, poultry, dairy products, shrimp, fish

 Economic aid:
 recipient: US commitments, including Ex-Im (FY70-79), $24 million;
 Western (non-US) countries, ODA and OOF bilateral commitments
 (1970-89), $45 million; OPEC bilateral aid (1979-89), $9.8 billion

 Currency: 1 Bahraini dinar (BD) = 1,000 fils

 Exchange rates: Bahraini dinars (BD) per US$1 - 0.3760 (fixed rate)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Bahrain:Transportation

 Railroads: 0 km

 Highways:
 total: 2,670 km
 paved: 2,010 km
 unpaved: 660 km (1991 est.)

 Pipelines: crude oil 56 km; petroleum products 16 km; natural gas 32
 km

 Ports: Manama, Mina' Salman, Sitrah

 Merchant marine:
 total: 6 ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 79,949 GRT/120,900 DWT
 ships by type: bulk 1, cargo 4, chemical tanker 1

 Airports:
 total: 4
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 2
 with paved runways under 914 m: 1
 with unpaved runways 1,524 to 2,438 m: 1

@Bahrain:Communications

 Telephone system: 98,000 telephones; 170 telephones/1,000 persons;
 modern system; good domestic services; excellent international
 connections
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: 2 INTELSAT (1 Atlantic Ocean and 1 Indian Ocean) and 1
 ARABSAT earth station; tropospheric scatter to Qatar, UAE; microwave
 radio relay to Saudi Arabia; submarine cable to Qatar, UAE, and Saudi
 Arabia

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 2, FM 3, shortwave 0
 radios: 60 million

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 2
 televisions: 21 million

@Bahrain:Defense Forces

 Branches: Army, Navy, Air Force, Air Defense, Coast Guard, Police
 Force

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 210,725; males fit for military
 service 117,414; males reach military age (15) annually 4,346 (1995
 est.)

 Defense expenditures: exchange rate conversion - $247 million, 5.5% of
 GDP (1994)


________________________________________________________________________

BAKER ISLAND

 (territory of the US)

@Baker Island:Geography

 Location: Oceania, atoll in the North Pacific Ocean, about one-half of
 the way from Hawaii to Australia

 Map references: Oceania

 Area:
 total area: 1.4 sq km
 land area: 1.4 sq km
 comparative area: about 2.3 times the size of The Mall in Washington,
 DC

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 4.8 km

 Maritime claims:
 exclusive economic zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: none

 Climate: equatorial; scant rainfall, constant wind, burning sun

 Terrain: low, nearly level coral island surrounded by a narrow
 fringing reef

 Natural resources: guano (deposits worked until 1891)

 Land use:
 arable land: 0%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 0%
 forest and woodland: 0%
 other: 100%

 Irrigated land: 0 sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: no natural fresh water resources
 natural hazards: the narrow fringing reef surrounding the island can
 be a maritime hazard
 international agreements: NA

 Note: treeless, sparse, and scattered vegetation consisting of
 grasses, prostrate vines, and low growing shrubs; primarily a nesting,
 roosting, and foraging habitat for seabirds, shorebirds, and marine
 wildlife

@Baker Island:People

 Population: uninhabited; note - American civilians evacuated in 1942
 after Japanese air and naval attacks during World War II; occupied by
 US military during World War II, but abandoned after the war; public
 entry is by special-use permit only and generally restricted to
 scientists and educators; a cemetery and cemetery ruins are located
 near the middle of the west coast

@Baker Island:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: none
 conventional short form: Baker Island

 Digraph: FQ

 Type: unincorporated territory of the US administered by the Fish and
 Wildlife Service of the US Department of the Interior as part of the
 National Wildlife Refuge system

 Capital: none; administered from Washington, DC

@Baker Island:Economy

 Overview: no economic activity

@Baker Island:Transportation

 Ports: none; offshore anchorage only; note - there is one boat landing
 area along the middle of the west coast

 Airports: 1 abandoned World War II runway of 1,665 m

 Note: there is a day beacon near the middle of the west coast

@Baker Island:Defense Forces

 Note: defense is the responsibility of the US; visited annually by the
 US Coast Guard


________________________________________________________________________

BANGLADESH

@Bangladesh:Geography

 Location: Southern Asia, bordering the Bay of Bengal, between Burma
 and India

 Map references: Asia

 Area:
 total area: 144,000 sq km
 land area: 133,910 sq km
 comparative area: slightly smaller than Wisconsin

 Land boundaries: total 4,246 km, Burma 193 km, India 4,053 km

 Coastline: 580 km

 Maritime claims:
 contiguous zone: 18 nm
 continental shelf: up to the outer limits of the continental margin
 exclusive economic zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: a portion of the boundary with India is in
 dispute; water-sharing problems with upstream riparian India over the
 Ganges

 Climate: tropical; cool, dry winter (October to March); hot, humid
 summer (March to June); cool, rainy monsoon (June to October)

 Terrain: mostly flat alluvial plain; hilly in southeast

 Natural resources: natural gas, arable land, timber

 Land use:
 arable land: 67%
 permanent crops: 2%
 meadows and pastures: 4%
 forest and woodland: 16%
 other: 11%

 Irrigated land: 27,380 sq km (1989)

 Environment:
 current issues: many people are landless and forced to live on and
 cultivate flood-prone land; limited access to potable water;
 water-borne diseases prevalent; water pollution especially of fishing
 areas results from the use of commercial pesticides; intermittent
 water shortages because of falling water tables in the northern and
 central parts of the country; soil degradation; deforestation; severe
 overpopulation
 natural hazards: droughts, cyclones; much of the country routinely
 flooded during the summer monsoon season
 international agreements: party to - Biodiversity, Climate Change,
 Endangered Species, Environmental Modification, Hazardous Wastes,
 Nuclear Test Ban, Ozone Layer Protection, Wetlands; signed, but not
 ratified - Desertification, Law of the Sea

@Bangladesh:People

 Population: 128,094,948 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 40% (female 25,195,262; male 26,352,299)
 15-64 years: 57% (female 34,862,105; male 37,867,705)
 65 years and over: 3% (female 1,761,336; male 2,056,241) (July 1995
 est.)

 Population growth rate: 2.32% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 34.62 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 11.43 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: 0 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 104.6 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 55.46 years
 male: 55.69 years
 female: 55.22 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 4.39 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Bangladeshi(s)
 adjective: Bangladesh

 Ethnic divisions: Bengali 98%, Biharis 250,000, tribals less than 1
 million

 Religions: Muslim 83%, Hindu 16%, Buddhist, Christian, other

 Languages: Bangla (official), English

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1990)
 total population: 35%
 male: 47%
 female: 22%

 Labor force: 50.1 million
 by occupation: agriculture 65%, services 21%, industry and mining 14%
 (1989)
 note: extensive export of labor to Saudi Arabia, UAE, and Oman (1991)

@Bangladesh:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: People's Republic of Bangladesh
 conventional short form: Bangladesh
 former: East Pakistan

 Digraph: BG

 Type: republic

 Capital: Dhaka

 Administrative divisions: 4 divisions; Chittagong, Dhaka, Khulna,
 Rajshahi

 Independence: 16 December 1971 (from Pakistan)

 National holiday: Independence Day, 26 March (1971)

 Constitution: 4 November 1972, effective 16 December 1972, suspended
 following coup of 24 March 1982, restored 10 November 1986, amended
 many times

 Legal system: based on English common law

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: President Abdur Rahman BISWAS (since 8 October 1991);
 election last held 8 October 1991 (next to be held by NA October
 1996); results - Abdur Rahman BISWAS received 52.1% of parliamentary
 vote
 head of government: Prime Minister Khaleda ZIAur RAHMAN (since 20
 March 1991)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers; appointed by the president

 Legislative branch: unicameral
 National Parliament (Jatiya Sangsad): elections last held 27 February
 1991 (next to be held by February 1996); results - percent of vote by
 party NA; seats - (330 total, 300 elected and 30 seats reserved for
 women) BNP 168, AL 93, JP 35, JI 20, BCP 5, National Awami Party
 (Muzaffar) 1, Workers Party 1, JSD 1, Ganotantri Party 1, Islami Oikya
 Jote 1, NDP 1, independents 3

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court

 Political parties and leaders: Bangladesh Nationalist Party (BNP),
 Khaleda ZIAur RAHMAN; Awami League (AL), Sheikh Hasina WAJED; Jatiyo
 Party (JP), Hussain Mohammad ERSHAD (in jail); Jamaat-E-Islami (JI),
 Ali KHAN; Bangladesh Communist Party (BCP), Saifuddin Ahmed MANIK;
 National Awami Party (Muzaffar); Workers Party, leader NA; Jatiyo
 Samajtantik Dal (JSD), Serajul ALAM KHAN; Ganotantri Party, leader NA;
 Islami Oikya Jote, leader NA; National Democratic Party (NDP), leader
 NA; Muslim League, Khan A. SABUR; Democratic League, Khondakar
 MUSHTAQUE Ahmed; Democratic League, Khondakar MUSHTAQUE Ahmed; United
 People's Party, Kazi ZAFAR Ahmed

 Member of: AsDB, C, CCC, CP, ESCAP, FAO, G-77, GATT, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO,
 ICFTU, ICRM, IDA, IDB, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, IMO, INMARSAT,
 INTELSAT, INTERPOL, IOC, IOM, ISO, ITU, MINURSO, NAM, OIC, SAARC, UN,
 UNAMIR, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNIDO, UNIKOM, UNOMIG, UNOMIL, UNOMOZ, UNOMUR,
 UNOSOM, UNPROFOR, UNU, UPU, WCL, WFTU, WHO, WIPO, WMO, WTO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Humayun KABIR
 chancery: 2201 Wisconsin Avenue NW, Washington, DC 20007
 telephone: [1] (202) 342-8372 through 8376
 consulate(s) general: New York

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador David N. MERRILL
 embassy: Diplomatic Enclave, Madani Avenue, Baridhara, Dhaka
 mailing address: G. P. O. Box 323, Dhaka 1212
 telephone: [880] (2) 884700 through 884722
 FAX: [880] (2) 883-744

 Flag: green with a large red disk slightly to the hoist side of
 center; green is the traditional color of Islam

@Bangladesh:Economy

 Overview: Despite sustained domestic and international efforts to
 improve economic and demographic prospects, Bangladesh remains one of
 the world's poorest, most densely populated, and least developed
 nations. Its economy is overwhelmingly agricultural, with the
 cultivation of rice the single most important activity in the economy.
 Major impediments to growth include frequent cyclones and floods, the
 inefficiency of state-owned enterprises, a rapidly growing labor force
 that cannot be absorbed by agriculture, delays in exploiting energy
 resources (natural gas), and inadequate power supplies. Excellent rice
 crops and expansion of the export garment industry led to real growth
 of 4% in 1992 and again in 1993. Policy measures intended to reduce
 government regulation of private industry, to curb population growth,
 and to expand employment opportunities have had only partial success
 given the serious nature of Bangladesh's basic problems.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $130.1 billion (1994
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 4.5% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $1,040 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 4.3% (1992 est.)

 Unemployment rate: NA%

 Budget:
 revenues: $2.8 billion
 expenditures: $4.1 billion, including capital expenditures of $1.8
 billion (FY92/93)

 Exports: $2.38 billion (1993)
 commodities: garments, jute and jute goods, leather, shrimp
 partners: US 33%, Western Europe 39% (Germany 8.4%, Italy 6%) (FY91/92
 est.)

 Imports: $3.99 billion (1993)
 commodities: capital goods, petroleum, food, textiles
 partners: Hong Kong 7.5%, Singapore 7.4%, China 7.4%, Japan 7.1%
 (FY91/92 est.)

 External debt: $13.5 billion (June 1993)

 Industrial production: growth rate 6.9% (FY92/93 est.); accounts for
 9.4% of GDP

 Electricity:
 capacity: 2,740,000 kW
 production: 9.2 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 70 kWh (1993)

 Industries: jute manufacturing, cotton textiles, food processing,
 steel, fertilizer

 Agriculture: accounts for 33% of GDP, 65% of employment, and one-fifth
 of exports; world's largest exporter of jute; commercial products -
 jute, rice, wheat, tea, sugarcane, potatoes, beef, milk, poultry;
 shortages include wheat, vegetable oils, cotton

 Illicit drugs: transit country for illegal drugs produced in
 neighboring countries

 Economic aid:
 recipient: US commitments, including Ex-Im (FY70-89), $3.4 billion;
 Western (non-US) countries, ODA and OOF bilateral commitments
 (1980-89), $11.65 million; OPEC bilateral aid (1979-89), $6.52
 million; Communist countries (1970-89), $1.5 billion

 Currency: 1 taka (Tk) = 100 poiska

 Exchange rates: taka (Tk) per US$1 - 40.250 (January 1995), 40.212
 (1994), 39.567 (1993), 38.951 (1992), 36.596 (1991), 34.569 (1990)

 Fiscal year: 1 July - 30 June

@Bangladesh:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 2,892 km
 broad gauge: 978 km 1.676-m gauge
 narrow gauge: 1,914 km 1.000-m gauge (1992)

 Highways:
 total: 7,240 km
 paved: 3,840 km
 unpaved: 3,400 km (1985)

 Inland waterways: 5,150-8,046 km navigable waterways (includes
 2,575-3,058 km main cargo routes)

 Pipelines: natural gas 1,220 km

 Ports: Barisal, Chandpur, Chittagong, Cox's Bazar, Dacca, Khulna,
 Mongla (includes Chalna), Narayanganj

 Merchant marine:
 total: 38 ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 293,304 GRT/428,013 DWT
 ships by type: bulk 2, cargo 31, oil tanker 2, refrigerated cargo 3

 Airports:
 total: 16
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 2
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 2
 with paved runways 1,524 to 2,437 m: 4
 with paved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 1
 with paved runways under 914 m: 7

@Bangladesh:Communications

 Telephone system: 241,250 telephones; 1 telephone/522 persons; poor
 domestic telephone service
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: 2 INTELSAT (Indian Ocean) earth stations; adequate
 international radio communications and landline service

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 9, FM 6, shortwave 0
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 11
 televisions: NA

@Bangladesh:Defense Forces

 Branches: Army, Navy, Air Force
 paramilitary forces: Bangladesh Rifles, Bangladesh Ansars, Armed
 Police Reserve, Village Defense Parties, National Cadet Corps

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 33,039,035; males fit for
 military service 19,607,817 (1995 est.)

 Defense expenditures: exchange rate conversion - $448 million, 1.7% of
 GDP (FY93/94)


________________________________________________________________________

BARBADOS

@Barbados:Geography

 Location: Caribbean, island between the Caribbean Sea and the North
 Atlantic Ocean, northeast of Venezuela

 Map references: Central America and the Caribbean

 Area:
 total area: 430 sq km
 land area: 430 sq km
 comparative area: slightly less than 2.5 times the size of Washington,
 DC

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 97 km

 Maritime claims:
 exclusive economic zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: none

 Climate: tropical; rainy season (June to October)

 Terrain: relatively flat; rises gently to central highland region

 Natural resources: petroleum, fishing, natural gas

 Land use:
 arable land: 77%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 9%
 forest and woodland: 0%
 other: 14%

 Irrigated land: NA sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: pollution of coastal waters from waste disposal by
 ships; soil erosion; illegal solid waste disposal threatens
 contamination of aquifers
 natural hazards: hurricanes (especially June to October); periodic
 landslides
 international agreements: party to - Climate Change, Endangered
 Species, Law of the Sea, Marine Dumping, Ozone Layer Protection, Ship
 Pollution; signed, but not ratified - Biodiversity

 Note: easternmost Caribbean island

@Barbados:People

 Population: 256,395 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 24% (female 30,175; male 31,507)
 15-64 years: 66% (female 86,103; male 82,727)
 65 years and over: 10% (female 15,849; male 10,034) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 0.24% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 15.45 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 8.27 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: -4.82 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 19.2 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 74.16 years
 male: 71.47 years
 female: 77.06 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 1.78 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Barbadian(s)
 adjective: Barbadian

 Ethnic divisions: African 80%, European 4%, other 16%

 Religions: Protestant 67% (Anglican 40%, Pentecostal 8%, Methodist 7%,
 other 12%), Roman Catholic 4%, none 17%, unknown 3%, other 9% (1980)

 Languages: English

 Literacy: age 15 and over has ever attended school (1970)
 total population: 99%
 male: 99%
 female: 99%

 Labor force: 124,800 (1992)
 by occupation: services and government 41%, commerce 15%,
 manufacturing and construction 18%, transportation, storage,
 communications, and financial institutions 8%, agriculture 6%,
 utilities 2% (1992 est.)

@Barbados:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: none
 conventional short form: Barbados

 Digraph: BB

 Type: parliamentary democracy

 Capital: Bridgetown

 Administrative divisions: 11 parishes; Christ Church, Saint Andrew,
 Saint George, Saint James, Saint John, Saint Joseph, Saint Lucy, Saint
 Michael, Saint Peter, Saint Philip, Saint Thomas
 note: the new city of Bridgetown may be given parish status

 Independence: 30 November 1966 (from UK)

 National holiday: Independence Day, 30 November (1966)

 Constitution: 30 November 1966

 Legal system: English common law; no judicial review of legislative
 acts

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: Queen ELIZABETH II (since 6 February 1952),
 represented by Governor General Dame Nita BARROW (since 6 June 1990)
 head of government: Prime Minister Owen Seymour ARTHUR (since 6
 September 1994); Deputy Prime Minister Billie MILLER (since 6
 September 1994)
 cabinet: Cabinet; appointed by the governor general on advice of the
 prime minister

 Legislative branch: bicameral Parliament
 Senate: consists of a 21-member body appointed by the governor general

 House of Assembly: election last held 6 September 1994 (next to be
 held by January 1999); results - percentage vote by party NA; seats -
 (28 total) DLP 8, BLP 19, NDP 1

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court of Judicature

 Political parties and leaders: Democratic Labor Party (DLP),David
 THOMPSON; Barbados Labor Party (BLP), Owen ARTHUR; National Democratic
 Party (NDP), Richard HAYNES

 Other political or pressure groups: Barbados Workers Union, Leroy
 TROTMAN; People's Progressive Movement, Eric SEALY; Workers' Party of
 Barbados, Dr. George BELLE; Clement Payne Labor Union, David
 COMMISSIONG

 Member of: ACP, C, CARICOM, CDB, ECLAC, FAO, G-77, GATT, IADB, IBRD,
 ICAO, ICFTU, ICRM, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, ILO, IMF, IMO, INTELSAT,
 INTERPOL, IOC, ISO (correspondent), ITU, LAES, NAM, OAS, OPANAL, UN,
 UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNIDO, UPU, WHO, WIPO, WMO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Courtney BLACKMAN
 chancery: 2144 Wyoming Avenue NW, Washington, DC 20008
 telephone: [1] (202) 939-9218, 9219
 FAX: [1] (202) 332-7467
 consulate(s) general: Miami and New York
 consulate(s): Los Angeles

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Jeanette W. HYDE
 embassy: Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Building, Broad Street,
 Bridgetown
 mailing address: P. O. Box 302, Bridgetown; FPO AA 34055
 telephone: [1] (809) 436-4950
 FAX: [1] (809) 429-5246

 Flag: three equal vertical bands of blue (hoist side), yellow, and
 blue with the head of a black trident centered on the gold band; the
 trident head represents independence and a break with the past (the
 colonial coat of arms contained a complete trident)

@Barbados:Economy

 Overview: A per capita income of $9,200 gives Barbados one of the
 highest standards of living of all the small island states of the
 eastern Caribbean. Historically, the economy was based on the
 cultivation of sugarcane and related activities. In recent years,
 however, the economy has diversified into manufacturing and tourism. A
 moderate recovery that began in late 1993 after 3 years of contraction
 is mainly due to increased tourism and expansion in the construction
 sector. Economic prospects for 1995 depend mostly on continued growth
 in the industrialized countries, especially in Europe, which would
 spur further expansion in tourism.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $2.4 billion (1994
 est.)

 National product real growth rate: 3% (1994 est.)

 National product per capita: $9,200 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 2% (1994 est.)

 Unemployment rate: 20.5% (1994 est.)

 Budget:
 revenues: $509 million
 expenditures: $636 million, including capital expenditures of $86
 million (FY94/95 est.)

 Exports: $161 million (f.o.b., 1993 est.)
 commodities: sugar and molasses, rum, other foods and beverages,
 chemicals, electrical components, clothing
 partners: US 13%, UK 10%, Trinidad and Tobago 9%, Windward Islands 8%

 Imports: $703 million (c.i.f., 1993 est.)
 commodities: consumer goods, machinery, foodstuffs, construction
 materials, chemicals, fuel, electrical components
 partners: US 36%, UK 11%, Trinidad and Tobago 11%, Japan 3%

 External debt: $652 million (1991 est.)

 Industrial production: growth rate 2% (FY93/94 est.); accounts for
 about 10% of GDP

 Electricity:
 capacity: 152,100 kW
 production: 510 million kWh
 consumption per capita: 1,841 kWh (1993)

 Industries: tourism, sugar, light manufacturing, component assembly
 for export

 Agriculture: accounts for 6% of GDP; major cash crop is sugarcane;
 other crops - vegetables, cotton; not self-sufficient in food

 Illicit drugs: one of many Caribbean transshipment points for
 narcotics bound for the US and Europe

 Economic aid:
 recipient: US commitments, including Ex-Im (FY70-89), $15 million;
 Western (non-US) countries, ODA and OOF bilateral commitments
 (1970-89), $171 million

 Currency: 1 Barbadian dollar (Bds$) = 100 cents

 Exchange rates: Barbadian dollars (Bds$) per US$1 - 2.0113 (fixed
 rate)

 Fiscal year: 1 April - 31 March

@Barbados:Transportation

 Railroads: 0 km

 Highways:
 total: 1,570 km
 paved: 1,475 km
 unpaved: gravel, earth 95 km

 Ports: Bridgetown

 Merchant marine:
 total: 12 ships (1,000 GRT or over) totaling 61,563 GRT/103,632 DWT
 ships by type: bulk 4, cargo 6, oil tanker 2

 Airports:
 total: 1
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 1

@Barbados:Communications

 Telephone system: 89,000 telephones
 local: island wide automatic telephone system;
 intercity: NA
 international: 1 INTELSAT (Atlantic Ocean) earth station; tropospheric
 scatter link to Trinidad and Saint Lucia

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM 3, FM 2, shortwave 0
 radios: NA

 Television:
 broadcast stations: 2 (1 pay)
 televisions: NA

@Barbados:Defense Forces

 Branches: Royal Barbados Defense Force (includes the Ground Forces and
 Coast Guard), Royal Barbados Police Force

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 71,153; males fit for military
 service 49,488 (1995 est.)

 Defense expenditures: exchange rate conversion - $NA, NA% of GDP


________________________________________________________________________

BASSAS DA INDIA

 (possession of France)

@Bassas Da India:Geography

 Location: Southern Africa, islands in the southern Mozambique Channel,
 about one-half of the way from Madagascar to Mozambique

 Map references: Africa

 Area:
 total area: 0.2 km2
 land area: 0.2 km2
 comparative area: NA

 Land boundaries: 0 km

 Coastline: 35.2 km

 Maritime claims:
 exclusive economic zone: 200 nm
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: claimed by Madagascar

 Climate: tropical

 Terrain: a volcanic rock 2.4 meters high

 Natural resources: none

 Land use:
 arable land: 0%
 permanent crops: 0%
 meadows and pastures: 0%
 forest and woodland: 0%
 other: 100% (all rock)

 Irrigated land: 0 sq km

 Environment:
 current issues: NA
 natural hazards: maritime hazard since it is usually under water
 during high tide and surrounded by reefs; subject to periodic cyclones

 international agreements: NA

@Bassas Da India:People

 Population: uninhabited

@Bassas Da India:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: none
 conventional short form: Bassas da India

 Digraph: BS

 Type: French possession administered by a Commissioner of the
 Republic, resident in Reunion

 Capital: none; administered by France from Reunion

 Independence: none (possession of France)

@Bassas Da India:Economy

 Overview: no economic activity

@Bassas Da India:Transportation

 Ports: none; offshore anchorage only

@Bassas Da India:Defense Forces

 Note: defense is the responsibility of France


________________________________________________________________________

BELARUS

@Belarus:Geography

 Location: Eastern Europe, east of Poland

 Map references: Commonwealth of Independent States - European States

 Area:
 total area: 207,600 sq km
 land area: 207,600 sq km
 comparative area: slightly smaller than Kansas

 Land boundaries: total 3,098 km, Latvia 141 km, Lithuania 502 km,
 Poland 605 km, Russia 959 km, Ukraine 891 km

 Coastline: 0 km (landlocked)

 Maritime claims: none; landlocked

 International disputes: none

 Climate: cold winters, cool and moist summers; transitional between
 continental and maritime

 Terrain: generally flat and contains much marshland

 Natural resources: forest land, peat deposits, small quantities of oil
 and natural gas

 Land use:
 arable land: 29%
 permanent crops: 1%
 meadows and pastures: 15%
 forest and woodland: 0%
 other: 55%

 Irrigated land: 1,490 sq km (1990)

 Environment:
 current issues: soil pollution from pesticide use; southern part of
 the country contaminated with fallout from 1986 nuclear reactor
 accident at Chornobyl'
 natural hazards: NA
 international agreements: party to - Air Pollution, Air
 Pollution-Nitrogen Oxides, Air Pollution-Sulphur 85, Biodiversity,
 Environmental Modification, Marine Dumping, Nuclear Test Ban, Ozone
 Layer Protection; signed, but not ratified - Climate Change, Law of
 the Sea

 Note: landlocked

@Belarus:People

 Population: 10,437,418 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 22% (female 1,126,062; male 1,166,439)
 15-64 years: 65% (female 3,494,891; male 3,293,196)
 65 years and over: 13% (female 913,508; male 443,322) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 0.3% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 12.98 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 11.23 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: 1.27 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 18.6 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 71.03 years
 male: 66.36 years
 female: 75.93 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 1.87 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Belarusian(s)
 adjective: Belarusian

 Ethnic divisions: Byelorussian 77.9%, Russian 13.2%, Polish 4.1%,
 Ukrainian 2.9%, other 1.9%

 Religions: Eastern Orthodox, other

 Languages: Byelorussian, Russian, other

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1989)
 total population: 97%
 male: 99%
 female: 96%

 Labor force: 4.887 million
 by occupation: industry and construction 40%, agriculture and forestry
 21%, other 39% (1992)

@Belarus:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Republic of Belarus
 conventional short form: Belarus
 local long form: Respublika Byelarus'
 local short form: none
 former: Belorussian (Byelorussian) Soviet Socialist Republic

 Digraph: BO

 Type: republic

 Capital: Minsk

 Administrative divisions: 6 voblastsi (singular - voblasts') and one
 municipality* (harady, singular - horad); Brestskaya (Brest),
 Homyel'skaya (Homyel'), Horad Minsk*, Hrodzyenskaya (Hrodna),
 Mahilyowskaya (Mahilyow), Minskaya, Vitsyebskaya (Vitsyebsk)
 note: the administrative centers of the voblastsi are included in
 parentheses

 Independence: 25 August 1991 (from Soviet Union)

 National holiday: Independence Day, 27 July (1990)

 Constitution: adopted 15 March 1994; replaces constitution of April
 1978

 Legal system: based on civil law system

 Suffrage: 18 years of age; universal

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: President Aleksandr LUKASHENKO (since 20 July 1994);
 election held June 24 and 10 July 1994 (next to be held NA 1999);
 Aleksandr LUKASHENKO 80%, Vyacheslav KEBICH 14%
 head of government: Prime Minister Mikhail CHIGIR (since July 1994);
 Deputy Prime Ministers Vladimir GARKUN, Viktor GONCHAR, Sergey LING,
 Mikhail MYASNIKOVICH, Valeriy KOKAREV (since NA)
 cabinet: Council of Ministers
 note: first presidential elections took place in June-July 1994

 Legislative branch: unicameral
 Supreme Soviet: elections last held 4 April 1990 (next to be held 14
 May 1995); results - Communists 87%; seats - (360 total) number of
 seats by party NA; note - 50 seats are for public bodies; the
 Communist Party obtained an overwhelming majority

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court

 Political parties and leaders: Belarusian Popular Front (BPF), Zenon
 POZNYAK, chairman; Party of Popular Accord, Gennadiy KARPENKO; Union
 of Belarusian Entreprenuers, V. N. KARYAGIN; Belarusian Party of
 Communists, Vasiliy NOVIKOV, Viktor CHIKIN, chairmen; Belarus Peasant
 Party, Yevgeniy LUGIN, chairman; Belarusian Socialist Party,
 Vyacheslav KUZNETSOV, chairman; Belarusian Social Democrat Party
 (SDBP), Oleg TRUSOV, Stanislav SHUSHKEVICH, chairmen; Agrarian Party
 of Belarus, Aleksandr DUBKO; United Democratic Party of Belarus
 (UDPB), Aleksandr DOBROVOLSKIY, chairman; Independent Trade Unions,
 Sergey ANTONCHIK, chairman

 Member of: CCC, CE (guest), CEI (associate members), CIS, EBRD, ECE,
 IAEA, IBRD, ICAO, IFC, ILO, IMF, INMARSAT, INTELSAT (nonsignatory
 user), INTERPOL, IOC, ISO, ITU, NACC, OSCE, PCA, PFP, UN, UNCTAD,
 UNESCO, UNIDO, UPU, WHO, WIPO, WMO

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Sergey Nikolayevich MARTYNOV
 chancery: 1619 New Hampshire Avenue NW, Washington, DC 20009
 telephone: [1] (202) 986-1604
 FAX: [1] (202) 986-1805
 consulate(s) general: New York

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Kenneth Spencer YALOWITZ
 embassy: Starovilenskaya #46, Minsk
 mailing address: use embassy street address
 telephone: [7] (0172) 34-65-37

 Flag: three horizontal bands of white (top), red, and white

@Belarus:Economy

 Overview: Belarus ranks among the most developed of the former Soviet
 states, with a relatively modern - by Soviet standards - and diverse
 machine building sector and a robust agriculture sector. It also
 serves as a transport link for Russian oil exports to the Baltic
 states and Eastern and Western Europe. The breakup of the Soviet Union
 and its command economy has resulted in a sharp economic contraction
 as traditional trade ties have collapsed. The Belarusian government
 has lagged behind the governments of most other former Soviet states
 in economic reform, with privatization almost nonexistent. The system
 of state orders and distribution persists. In mid-1994, the Belarusian
 government embarked on an austerity program with IMF support to slash
 state credits and consumer subsidies in order to bring down the budget
 deficit and reduce inflation. However, despite its promising start,
 the regime's drive to reinvigorate the economy has fallen short, and
 the IMF has criticized its failure to implement the reforms that the
 Fund had negotiated. As a result, the IMF has suspended talks on
 introducing a stand-by arrangement. Economic relations with Russia,
 which will have an important bearing on the future course of the
 economy, will be strengthened if Minsk adopts the necessary
 legislation to implement a customs union agreed to in January 1995.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $53.4 billion (1994
 estimate as extrapolated from World Bank estimate for 1992)

 National product real growth rate: -20% (1994)

 National product per capita: $5,130 (1994 est.)

 Inflation rate (consumer prices): 29% per month (1994)

 Unemployment rate: 1.4% officially registered unemployed (December
 1993); large numbers of underemployed workers

 Budget:
 revenues: $NA
 expenditures: $NA, including capital expenditures of $NA

 Exports: $968 million to outside of the FSU countries (f.o.b., 1994)
 commodities: machinery and transport equipment, chemicals, foodstuffs
 partners: Russia, Ukraine, Poland, Bulgaria

 Imports: $534 million from outside the FSU countries (c.i.f., 1994)
 commodities: fuel, natural gas, industrial raw materials, textiles,
 sugar
 partners: Russia, Ukraine, Poland

 External debt: $1.5 billion (July 1994 est.)

 Industrial production: growth rate -19% (1994); accounts for about 40%
 of GDP (1992)

 Electricity:
 capacity: 7,010,000 kW
 production: 31.4 billion kWh
 consumption per capita: 3,010 kWh (1994)

 Industries: employ about 40% of labor force and produced a wide
 variety of products including (in percent share of total output of
 former Soviet Union): tractors (12%); metal-cutting machine tools
 (11%); off-highway dump trucks up to 110-metric-ton load capacity
 (100%); wheel-type earthmovers for construction and mining (100%);
 eight-wheel-drive, high-flotation trucks with cargo capacity of 25
 metric tons for use in tundra and roadless areas (100%); equipment for
 animal husbandry and livestock feeding (25%); motorcycles (21.3%);
 television sets (11%); chemical fibers (28%); fertilizer (18%); linen
 fabric (11%); wool fabric (7%); radios; refrigerators; and other
 consumer goods

 Agriculture: accounts for almost 25% of GDP and 5.7% of total
 agricultural output of former Soviet Union; employs 21% of the labor
 force; in 1988 produced the following (in percent of total Soviet
 production): grain (3.6%), potatoes (12.2%), vegetables (3.0%), meat
 (6.0%), milk (7.0%); net exporter of meat, milk, eggs, flour, potatoes

 Illicit drugs: illicit cultivator of opium poppy and cannabis; mostly
 for the domestic market; transshipment point for illicit drugs to
 Western Europe

 Economic aid: $NA

 Currency: Belarusian rubel (BR)

 Exchange rates: Belarusian rubels per US$1 - 10,600 (end December
 1994)

 Fiscal year: calendar year

@Belarus:Transportation

 Railroads:
 total: 5,570 km in common carrier service; does not include industrial
 lines
 broad gauge: 5,570 km 1.520-m gauge (1990)

 Highways:
 total: 98,200 km
 paved: 66,100 km
 unpaved: earth 32,100 km (1990)

 Inland waterways: NA km

 Pipelines: crude oil 1,470 km; refined products 1,100 km; natural gas
 1,980 km (1992)

 Ports: Mazyr

 Merchant marine:
 note: claims 5% of former Soviet fleet

 Airports:
 total: 118
 with paved runways over 3,047 m: 2
 with paved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 18
 with paved runways 1,524 to 2,437 m: 5
 with paved runways under 914 m: 11
 with unpaved runways over 3,047 m: 1
 with unpaved runways 2,438 to 3,047 m: 6
 with unpaved runways 1,524 to 2,438 m: 4
 with unpaved runways 914 to 1,523 m: 9
 with unpaved runways under 914 m: 62

@Belarus:Communications

 Telephone system: 1,849,000 telephones (December 1991); 18
 telephones/100 persons; telephone service inadequate for the purposes
 of either business or the population; about 70% of the telephones are
 in homes; over 750,000 applications from households for telephones
 remain unsatisfied (1992); new investment centers on international
 connections and business needs; the new BelCel NMT 450 cellular system
 (a joint venture) is now operating in Minsk
 local: NA
 intercity: NA
 international: international traffic is carried by the Moscow
 international gateway switch and also by 2 satellite earth stations
 near Minsk - INTELSAT (through Canada) and EUTELSAT (through the UK)

 Radio:
 broadcast stations: AM NA, FM NA, shortwave 0
 radios: 3.14 million (5,615,000 with multiple speaker systems for
 program diffusion)

 Television:
 broadcast stations: NA
 televisions: 3.538 million

@Belarus:Defense Forces

 Branches: Army, Air Force, Air Defense Force, Republic Security Forces
 (internal and border troops)

 Manpower availability: males age 15-49 2,550,500; males fit for
 military service 1,999,138; males reach military age (18) annually
 71,808 (1995 est.)

 Defense expenditures: 56.5 billion rubles, NA% of GDP (1993 est.);
 note - conversion of the military budget into US dollars using the
 current exchange rate could produce misleading results


________________________________________________________________________

BELGIUM

@Belgium:Geography

 Location: Western Europe, bordering the North Sea, between France and
 the Netherlands

 Map references: Europe

 Area:
 total area: 30,510 sq km
 land area: 30,230 sq km
 comparative area: slightly larger than Maryland

 Land boundaries: total 1,385 km, France 620 km, Germany 167 km,
 Luxembourg 148 km, Netherlands 450 km

 Coastline: 64 km

 Maritime claims:
 continental shelf: median line with neighbors
 exclusive fishing zone: median line with neighbors (extends about 68
 km from coast)
 territorial sea: 12 nm

 International disputes: none

 Climate: temperate; mild winters, cool summers; rainy, humid, cloudy

 Terrain: flat coastal plains in northwest, central rolling hills,
 rugged mountains of Ardennes Forest in southeast

 Natural resources: coal, natural gas

 Land use:
 arable land: 24%
 permanent crops: 1%
 meadows and pastures: 20%
 forest and woodland: 21%
 other: 34%

 Irrigated land: 10 sq km (1989 est.)

 Environment:
 current issues: Meuse River, a major source of drinking water,
 polluted from steel production wastes; other rivers polluted by animal
 wastes and fertilizers; industrial air pollution contributes to acid
 rain in neighboring countries
 natural hazards: flooding is a threat in areas of reclaimed coastal
 land, protected from the sea by concrete dikes
 international agreements: party to - Air Pollution, Air
 Pollution-Sulphur 85, Antarctic Treaty, Endangered Species,
 Environmental Modification, Hazardous Wastes, Marine Dumping, Marine
 Life Conservation, Nuclear Test Ban, Ozone Layer Protection, Ship
 Pollution, Tropical Timber 83, Wetlands; signed, but not ratified -
 Air Pollution-Nitrogen Oxides, Air Pollution-Sulphur 94, Air
 Pollution-Volatile Organic Compounds, Antarctic-Environmental
 Protocol, Biodiversity, Climate Change, Law of the Sea

 Note: crossroads of Western Europe; majority of West European capitals
 within 1,000 km of Brussels which is the seat of the EU

@Belgium:People

 Population: 10,081,880 (July 1995 est.)

 Age structure:
 0-14 years: 18% (female 875,079; male 919,939)
 15-64 years: 66% (female 3,303,219; male 3,363,250)
 65 years and over: 16% (female 969,966; male 650,427) (July 1995 est.)

 Population growth rate: 0.17% (1995 est.)

 Birth rate: 11.46 births/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Death rate: 10.22 deaths/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Net migration rate: 0.5 migrant(s)/1,000 population (1995 est.)

 Infant mortality rate: 7 deaths/1,000 live births (1995 est.)

 Life expectancy at birth:
 total population: 77.21 years
 male: 73.94 years
 female: 80.67 years (1995 est.)

 Total fertility rate: 1.62 children born/woman (1995 est.)

 Nationality:
 noun: Belgian(s)
 adjective: Belgian

 Ethnic divisions: Fleming 55%, Walloon 33%, mixed or other 12%

 Religions: Roman Catholic 75%, Protestant or other 25%

 Languages: Dutch 56%, French 32%, German 1%, legally bilingual 11%
 divided along ethnic lines

 Literacy: age 15 and over can read and write (1980 est.)
 total population: 99%

 Labor force: 4.126 million
 by occupation: services 63.6%, industry 28%, construction 6.1%,
 agriculture 2.3% (1988)

@Belgium:Government

 Names:
 conventional long form: Kingdom of Belgium
 conventional short form: Belgium
 local long form: Royaume de Belgique
 local short form: Belgique

 Digraph: BE

 Type: constitutional monarchy

 Capital: Brussels

 Administrative divisions: 9 provinces (French: provinces, singular -
 province; Flemish: provincien, singular - provincie); Antwerpen,
 Brabant, Hainaut, Liege, Limburg, Luxembourg, Namur, Oost-Vlaanderen,
 West-Vlaanderen

 Independence: 4 October 1830 (from the Netherlands)

 National holiday: National Day, 21 July (ascension of King Leopold to
 the throne in 1831)

 Constitution: 7 February 1831, last revised 14 July 1993; parliament
 approved a constitutional package creating a federal state

 Legal system: civil law system influenced by English constitutional
 theory; judicial review of legislative acts; accepts compulsory ICJ
 jurisdiction, with reservations

 Suffrage: 18 years of age, universal and compulsory

 Executive branch:
 chief of state: King ALBERT II (since 9 August 1993)
 head of government: Prime Minister Jean-Luc DEHAENE (since 6 March
 1992)
 cabinet: Cabinet; the king appoints the ministers who are approved by
 the legislature

 Legislative branch: bicameral Parliament
 Senate: (Flemish - Senaat, French - Senat); elections last held 24
 November 1991 (next to be held by the end of 1995); results - percent
 of vote by party NA; seats - (184 total; of which 106 are directly
 elected; in the 1995 elections, seats will decrease to 71) CVP 20, SP
 14, VLD 13, VU 5, AGALEV 5, VB 5, ROSSEN 1, PS 18, PRL 9, PSC 9, ECOLO
 6, FDF 1
 Chamber of Deputies: (Flemish - Kamer van Volksvertegenwoordigers,
 French - Chambre des Representants); elections last held 24 November
 1991 (next to be held by 21 May 1995); results - CVP 16.7%, PS 13.6%,
 SP 12.0%, VLD 11.9%, PRL 8.2%, PSC 7.8%, VB 6.6%, VU 5.9%, ECOLO 5.1%,
 AGALEV 4.9%, FDF 2.6%, ROSSEM 3.2%, FN 1.5%; seats - (212 total; in
 1995 elections, seats will decrease to 150) CVP 39, PS 35, SP 28, VLD
 26, PRL 20, PSC 18, VB 12, VU 10, ECOLO 10, AGALEV 7, FDF 3, ROSSEM 3,
 FN 1

 Judicial branch: Supreme Court of Justice (Flemish - Hof van Cassatie,
 French - Cour de Cassation)

 Political parties and leaders: Flemish Christian Democrats (CVP -
 Christian People's Party), Johan van HECKE, president; Francophone
 Christian Democrats (PSC - Social Christian Party), Gerard DEPREZ,
 president; Flemish Socialist Party (SP), Louis TOBBACK, president;
 Francophone Socialist Party (PS), Philippe BUSQUIN, president; Flemish
 Liberal Democrats (VLD), Guy VERHOFSTADT, president; Francophone
 Liberal Reform Party (PRL), Jean GOL, president; Francophone
 Democratic Front (FDF), Georges CLERFAYT, president; Volksunie (VU),
 Bert ANCIAUX, president; Vlaams Blok (VB), Karel DILLEN, chairman;
 ROSSEM, Jean Pierre VAN ROSSEM; National Front (FN), Daniel FERET,
 president; AGALEV (Flemish Greens), no president; ECOLO (Francophone
 Ecologists), no president; other minor parties

 Other political or pressure groups: Christian and Socialist Trade
 Unions; Federation of Belgian Industries; numerous other associations
 representing bankers, manufacturers, middle-class artisans, and the
 legal and medical professions; various organizations represent the
 cultural interests of Flanders and Wallonia; various peace groups such
 as the Flemish Action Committee Against Nuclear Weapons and Pax
 Christi

 Member of: ACCT, AfDB, AG (observer), AsDB, Australia Group, Benelux,
 BIS, CCC, CE, CERN, EBRD, EC, ECE, EIB, ESA, FAO, G- 9, G-10, GATT,
 IADB, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO, ICC, ICFTU, ICRM, IDA, IEA, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS,
 ILO, IMF, IMO, INMARSAT, INTELSAT, INTERPOL, IOC, IOM, ISO, ITU,
 MINURSO, MTCR, NACC, NATO, NEA, NSG, OAS (observer), OECD, OSCE, PCA,
 UN, UNCTAD, UNESCO, UNHCR, UNIDO, UNITAR, UNMOGIP, UNPROFOR, UNRWA,
 UNTSO, UPU, WCL, WEU, WHO, WIPO, WMO, WTO, ZC

 Diplomatic representation in US:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Andre ADAM (appointed 3 October 1994)
 chancery: 3330 Garfield Street NW, Washington, DC 20008
 telephone: [1] (202) 333-6900
 FAX: [1] (202) 333-3079
 consulate(s) general: Atlanta, Chicago, Los Angeles, and New York

 US diplomatic representation:
 chief of mission: Ambassador Alan J. BLINKEN
 embassy: 27 Boulevard du Regent, B-1000 Brussels
 mailing address: APO AE 09724; PSC 82, Box 002, Brussels
 telephone: [32] (2) 513 38 30
 FAX: [32] (2) 511 27 25

 Flag: three equal vertical bands of black (hoist side), yellow, and
 red; the design was based on the flag of France

@Belgium:Economy

 Overview: This small private enterprise economy has capitalized on its
 central geographic location, highly developed transport network, and
 diversified industrial and commercial base. Industry is concentrated
 mainly in the populous Flemish area in the north, although the
 government is encouraging reinvestment in the southern region of
 Walloon. With few natural resources Belgium must import substantial
 quantities of raw materials and export a large volume of manufactures,
 making its economy unusually dependent on the state of world markets.
 Three-fourths of its trade is with other EU countries. The economy
 grew at a strong 4% pace during the period 1988-90, slowed to 1% in
 1991-92, dropped by 1.5% in 1993, and recovered with 2.3% growth in
 1994. Belgium's public debt has risen to 140% of GDP, and the
 government is trying to control its expenditures to bring the figure
 more into line with other industrialized countries.

 National product: GDP - purchasing power parity - $181.5 billion (1994
 est.)

